Providence brought us together for more purposes than
were, at first, apparent. I have long hesitated about
publishing
the accompanying narrative, for in England there is
a disposition to cavil at extraordinary facts, but the distance
of America from my place of residence will completely save
me from ridicule. The world must have the truth, and I see
no better means than by resorting to your agency. All I ask
is that you will have the book fairly printed, and that you
will send one copy to my address, Householder-hall,
Dorsetshire
,
England, and another to Capt. Noah Poke, Stonington,
Connecticut, in your own country. My Anna prays for you,
and is ever your friend. Do not forget us.
Yours, most faithfully,
Householder
.On board the Debby and Dolly, Stunnin'tun,
April 1st, 1835.
Author of the Spy
, Esquire,
Dear Sir
,Your favour is come to hand, and found me
in good health, as I hope these few lines will have the same
advantage with you. I have read the book, and must say
there is some truth in it, which, I suppose, is as much as
befalls
any book, the Bible, the Almanac, and the State Laws,
excepted. I remember Sir John well, and shall gainsay
nothing
he testifies to, for the reason that friends should not
contradict each other. I was also acquainted with the four
Monikins he speaks of, though I knew them by differentnames.
Miss Poke says she wonders if it's all true, which I wunt tell
her, seeing that a little unsartainty makes a woman rational.
As to my navigating without geometry, that's a matter that
was'n't worth booking, for it's no cur'osity in these parts,
bating a look at the compass once or twice a day, and so I
take my leave of you, with offers to do any commission for
you among the Sealing Islands, for which I sail to-morrow,
wind and weather permitting.
Yours to sarve,
Noah Poke
.
To the Author of the Spy, Esquire,
town,  County, York State.
P. S. I always told Sir John to steer clear of too much
journalizing, but he did nothing but write, night and day, for
a week; and as you brew, so you must bake. The wind has
chopped, and we shall take our anchor this tide; so no more
at present.
N. B. Sir John is a little out about my eating the
monkey
,
which I did, four years before I fell in with him, down
on the Spanish Main. It was not bad food to the taste, but
it was wonderful narvous to the eye. I r'ally thought I
had got hold of Miss Poke's youngest born.CHAPTER I.
The Author's pedigreealso, that of his Father.
The
philosopher who broaches a new theory is
bound to furnish, at least, some elementary proofs
of the reasonableness of his positions, and the
historian
who ventures to record marvels that have
hitherto been hid from human knowledge, owes it
to a decent regard to the opinions of others, to
produce
some credible testimony in favor of his
veracity
.
I am peculiarly placed in regard to these
two great essentials, having little more than its
plausibility to offer in favor of my philosophy, and
no other witness than myself to establish the
important
facts that are now about to be laid before the
reading world, for the first time. In this dilemma,
I fully feel the weight of responsibility under which
I stand; for there are truths of so little apparent
probability as to appear fictions, and fictions so like
the truth that the ordinary observer is very apt to
affirm that he was an eye-witness to their
existence
:
two facts that all our historians would do
well to bear in mind, since a knowledge of the
circumstances
might spare them the mortification of
having testimony that cost a deal of trouble,
discredited
in the one case, and save a vast deal of
painful and unnecessary labor, in the other. Thrown
upon myself, therefore, for what the French call
les
pices justficatives
of my theories, as well as of
my facts, I see no better way to prepare the reader
to believe me, than by giving an unvarnished
narrative
of my descent, birth, education and life, up
to the time I became a spectator of those
wonderful
facts it is my happiness to record, and with
which it is now his to be made acquainted.
I shall begin with my descent, or pedigree, both
because it is in the natural order of events, and
because
,
in order to turn this portion of my narrative
to a proper account, in the way of giving
credibility
to the rest of it, it may be of use in helping to
trace effects to their causes.
I have generally considered myself on a level
with the most ancient gentlemen of Europe, on the
score of descent, few families being more clearly
and directly traced into the mist of time, than that
of which I am a member. My descent from my
father is undeniably established by the parish
register
,
as well as by the will of that person himself,
and I believe no man could more directly prove the
truth of the whole career of his family, than it is
in my power to show that of my ancestor up to the
hour when he was found, in the second year of his
age, crying with cold and hunger, in the parish of
St. Giles, in the city of Westminster, and in the
United Kingdom of Great Britain. An
orange-woman
had pity on his sufferings. She fed him
with a crust, warmed him with purl, and then
humanely
led him to an individual with whom she
was in the habit of having frequent but angry
interviews
the
parish officer. The case of my
ancestor
was so obscure as to be clear. No one
could tell to whom he belonged, whence he came,
or what was likely to become of him; and as the
law did not admit of the starvation of children in
the street, under circumstances like these, the
parish
officer, after making all proper efforts to induce
2 *
some of the childless and benevolent of his
acquaintance
,
to believe that an infant thus abandoned
was intended as an especial boon from Providence
to each of them in particular, was obliged to
commit
my father to the keeping of one of the regular
nurses of the parish. It was fortunate for the
authenticity
of this pedigree, that such was the result
of the orange-woman's application; for, had my
worthy ancestor been subjected to the happy
accidents
and generous caprices of voluntary charity,
it is more than probable I should be driven to throw
a veil over those important years of his life that
were notoriously passed in the work-house, but
which, in consequence of that occurrence, are now
easily authenticated by valid minutes and
documentary
evidence. Thus it is that there exists no
void in the annals of our family, even that period
which is usually remembered through gossiping and
idle tales in the lives of most men, being matter of
legal record in that of my progenitor, and so
continued
to be down to the day of his presumed
majority
,
since he was indented to a careful master
the moment the parish could with any legality,
putting
decency quite out of the question, get rid of
him. I ought to have said, that the orange-woman,
taking a hint from the sign of a butcher opposite to
whose door my ancestor was found, had very
cleverly
given him the name of Thomas Goldencalf.
This second important transition in the affairs of
my father, might be deemed a presage of his future
fortunes. He was bound apprentice to a trader in
fancy articles, or a shopkeeper who dealt in such
objects as are usually purchased by those who do
not well know what to do with their money. This
trade was of immense advantage to the future
prosperity
of the young adventurer; for, in addition to
the known fact that they who amuse are much
better
paid than they who instruct their
fellow-creatures
,
his situation enabled him to study those
caprices
of men, which, properly improved, are of
themselves a mine of wealth, as well as to gain a
knowledge of the important truth that the greatest
events of this life are much oftener the result of
impulse than of calculation.
I have it by a direct tradition, orally conveyed
from the lips of my ancestor, that no one could
have been more lucky than himself in the
character
of his master. This personage, who came, in
time, to be my maternal grandfather, was one of
those wary traders who encourage others in their
follies, with a view to his own advantage, and the
experience of fifty years had rendered him so
expert
in the practices of his calling, that it was
seldom
he struck out a new vein in his mine, without
finding himself rewarded for the enterprise, by a
success that was fully equal to his expectations.
Tom, he said one day to his apprentice, when
time had produced confidence and awakened
sympathies
between them, thou art a lucky youth, or
the parish officer would never have brought thee
to my door. Thou little knowest the wealth that
is in store for thee, or the treasures that are at thy
command, if thou provest diligent, and in
particular
faithful to my interests.My provident
grandfather
never missed an occasion to throw in a
useful
moral, notwithstanding the general character of
veracity that distinguished his commerce.Now,
what dost think, lad, may be the amount of my
capital?
My ancestor in the male line hesitated to reply,
for, hitherto, his ideas had been confined to the
profits; never having dared to lift his thoughts as
high as that source from which he could not but see
they flowed in a very ample stream; but thrown
upon himself by so unexpected a question, and being
quick at figures, after adding ten per cent. to the
sum which he knew the last year had given as the
nett avails of their joint ingenuity, he named the
amount, in answer to the interrogatory.
My maternal grandfather laughed in the face of
my direct lineal ancestor.
Thou judgest, Tom, he said, when his mirth
was a little abated, by what thou thinkest is the
cost of the actual stock before thine eyes, when thou
should'st take into the account that which I term
our
floating
capital.
Tom pondered a moment, for while he knew that
his master had money in the funds, he did not
account
that as any portion of the available means
connected with his ordinary business; and as for a
floating capital, he did not well see how it could be
of much account, since the disproportion between the
cost and the selling prices of the different articles
in which they dealt was so great, that there was no
particular use in such an investment. As his master,
however, rarely paid for any thing until he was in
possession of returns from it that exceeded the debt
some seven-fold, he began to think the old man was
alluding to the advantages he obtained in the way
of credit, and after a little more cogitation, he
ventured
to say as much.
Again my maternal grandfather indulged in a
hearty fit of laughter.
Thou art clever in thy way, Tom, he said,
and I like the minuteness of thy calculations, for
they show an aptitude for trade; but there is genius
in our calling as well as cleverness. Come hither,
boy, he added, drawing Tom to a window whence
they could see the neighbors on their way to church,
for it was on a Sunday that my two provident
progenitors
indulged in this moral view of humanity,
as best befitted the day, come hither, boy, and
thou shalt see some small portion of that capital
which thou seemest to think hid, stalking abroad
by day-light, and in the open streets. Here, thou
see'st the wife of our neighbor, the pastry-cook;
with what an air she tosses her head and displays
the bauble thou sold'st her yesterday: well, even that
slattern, idle and vain, and little worthy of trust as
she is, carries about with her a portion of my
capital
!
My worthy ancestor stared, for he never knew
the other to be guilty of so great an indiscretion
as to trust a woman whom they both knew bought
more than her husband was willing to pay for.
She gave me a guinea, master, for that which
did not cost a seven-shilling piece!
She did, indeed, Tom, and it was her
vanity
that urged her to it. I trade upon her folly,
younker
,
and upon that of all mankind; now dost not
see with what a capital I carry on affairs? There
there is the maid, carrying the idle hussy's
pattens
in the rear; I drew upon my stock in that
wench's possession, no later than the last week, for
half a crown!
Tom reflected a long time on these allusions of
his provident master, and although he understood
them about as well as they will be understood by
the owners of half the soft humid eyes and sprouting
whiskers among my readers, by dint of cogitation
he came at last to a practical understanding of the
subject, which before he was thirty he had, to use
a French term, pretty well
exploit
.
I learn by unquestionable tradition, received also
from the mouths of his contemporaries, that the
opinions of my ancestor underwent some material
changes between the ages of ten and forty, a
circumstance
that has often led me to reflect that
people
might do well not to be too confident of their
principles, during the pliable period of life, when
the mind, like the tender shoot, is easily bent aside
and subjected to the action of surrounding causes.
During the earlier years of the plastic age, my
ancestor was observed to betray strong feelings of
compassion at the sight of charity-children, nor
was he ever known to pass a child, especially a
boy that was still in petticoats, and who was crying
with hunger in the streets, without sharing his own
crust with him. Indeed, his practice on this head
was said to be steady and uniform, whenever the
rencontre took place after my worthy father had
had his own sympathies quickened by a good
dinner
;
a fact that may be imputed to a keener sense
of the pleasure he was about to confer.
After sixteen, he was known to converse
occasionally
on the subject of politics, a topic, on which
he came to be both expert and eloquent before
twenty. His usual theme was justice and the
sacred
rights of man, concerning which he
sometimes
uttered very pretty sentiments, and such as
were altogether becoming in one who was at the
bottom of the great social pot that was then, as
now, actively boiling, and where he was made to
feel most, the heat that kept it in ebullition. I am
assured that on the subject of taxation, and on that
of the wrongs of America and Ireland, there were
few youths in the parish who could discourse with
more zeal and unction. About this time, too, he
was heard shouting Wilkes and Liberty! in the
public streets.
But, as is the case with all men of rare
capacities
,
there was a concentration of powers in the
mind of my ancestor, which soon brought all his
errant sympathies, the mere exuberance of acute
and overflowing feelings, into a proper and useful
subjection, centering all in the one absorbing and
capacious receptacle of self. I do not claim for
my father any peculiar quality in this respect, for I
have often observed that many of those who, (like
giddy-headed horsemen that raise a great dust, and
scamper as if the highway were too narrow for
their eccentric courses, before they are fairly
seated
in the saddle, but who afterwards drive as
directly
at their goals as the arrow parting from the
bow,) most indulge their sympathies at the
commencement
of their careers, are the most apt
towards
the close to get a proper command of their
feelings, and to reduce them within the bounds of
common sense and prudence. Before
five-and-twenty
,
my father was as exemplary and as
constant
a devotee of Plutus, as was then to be found
between Ratcliffe Highway and Bridge Street:I
name these places in particular, as all the rest of
the great capital in which he was born is known to
be more indifferent to the subject of money.
My ancestor was just thirty, when his master,
who like himself was a bachelor, very
unexpectedly
,
and a good deal to the scandal of the
neighborhood
,
introduced a new inmate into his frugal abode,
in the person of an infant female child. It would seem
that some one had been speculating on his stock of
weakness too, for this poor, little, defenceless and
dependent being was thrown upon his care, like
Tom himself, through the vigilance of the
parish-officers
.
There were many good-natured jokes
practised on the prosperous fancy-dealer, by the
more witty of his neighbours, at this sudden turn of
good fortune, and not a few ill-natured sneers were
given behind his back; most of the knowing ones
of the vicinity finding a stronger likeness between
the little girl and all the other unmarried men of
the eight or ten adjoining streets, than to the worthy
housekeeper who had been selected to pay for her
support. I have been much disposed to admit the
opinions of these amiable observers as authority in
my own pedigree, since it would be reaching the
obscurity in which all ancient lines take root, a
generation earlier than by allowing the presumption
that little Betsey was my direct male ancestor's
master's daughter; but, on reflection, I have
determined
to adhere to the less popular but more
simple
version of the affair, because it is connected
with the transmission of no small part of our estate,
a circumstance of itself that at once gives dignity
and importance to a genealogy.
Whatever may have been the real opinion of the
reputed father touching his rights to the honors of
that respectable title, he soon became as strongly
attached to the child, as if it really owed it
existence
to himself. The little girl was carefully nursed
abundantly fed, and throve accordingly. She had
reached her third year, when the fancy-dealer took
the small-pox from his little pet, who was just
recovering
from the same disease, and died at the
expiration
of the tenth day.
This was an unlooked-for and a stunning blow
to my ancestor, who was then in his thirty-fifth year,
and the head-shopman of the establishment, which
had continued to grow with the growing follies and
vanities of the age. On examining his master's
will, it was found that my father, who had
certainly
aided materially of late in the acquisition of the
money, was left the good-will of the shop, the
command
of all the stock at cost, and the sole
executorship
of the estate. He was also intrusted with the
exclusive guardianship of little Betsey, to whom his
master had affectionately devised every farthing of
his property. An ordinary reader may be surprised
that a man who had so long practised on the foibles
of his species, should have so much confidence in a
mere shopman, as to leave his whole estate so
completely
in his power; but, it must be remembered,
that human ingenuity has not yet devised any means
by which we can carry our personal effects into the
other world; that what cannot be cured must be
endured; that he must of necessity have confided
this important trust to some fellow-creature, and
that it was better to commit the keeping of his
money
to one, who, knowing the secret by which
it had been accumulated, had less inducement to be
dishonest, than one who was exposed to the
temptation
of covetousness, without having a knowledge
of any direct and legal means of gratifying his
longings. It has been conjectured, therefore, that
the testator thought, by giving up his trade to a man
who was as keenly alive as my ancestor to all its
perfections, moral and pecuniary, he provided a
sufficient protection against his falling into the sin
of peculation, by so amply supplying him with
simpler
means of enriching himself. Besides, it is fair
to presume that the long acquaintance had begotten
sufficient confidence to weaken the effect of that
saying which some wit has put into the mouth of a
wagmake me your executor, father; I care not
to whom you leave the estate. Let all this be as
it might, nothing can be more certain than that my
worthy ancestor executed his trust with the
scrupulous
fidelity of a man whose integrity had been
severely schooled in the ethics of trade. Little Betsey
was properly educated for one in her condition of
life; her health was as carefully watched over as if
she had been the only daughter of the sovereign,
instead of the only daughter of a fancy-dealer; her
morals were superintended by a superannuated old
maid; her mind left to its original purity; her person
jealously protected against the designs of greedy
Vol. I. 3
fortune-hunters; and, to complete the catalogue of
his paternal attentions and solicitudes, my vigilant
and faithful ancestor, to prevent accidents, and to
counteract the chances of life, so far as it might be
done by human foresight, saw that she was legally
married, the day she reached her nineteenth year,
to the person whom, there is every reason to think,
he believed to be the most unexceptionable man
of his acquaintance,in other words, to himself.
Settlements were unnecessary between parties who
had so long been known to each other, and, thanks
to the liberality of his late master's will in more
ways than one, a long minority, and the industry
of the ci-devant head-shopman, the nuptial
benediction
was no sooner pronounced, than our family
stepped into the undisputed possession of four
hundred
thousand pounds. One less scrupulous on the
subject of religion and the law, might not have
thought it necessary to give the orphan heiress a
settlement so satisfactory, at the termination of her
wardship.
I was the fifth of the children who were the
fruits of this union, and the only one of them all,
that passed the first year of its life. My poor
mother
did not survive my birth, and I can only record
her qualities through the medium of that great agent
in the archives of the family, tradition. By all that
I have heard, she must have been a meek, quiet,
domestic
woman; who, by temperament and
attainments
,
was admirably qualified to second the
prudent
plans of my father for her welfare. If she had
causes of complaint, (and that she had, there is too
much reason to think, for who has ever escaped
them?) they were concealed, with female fidelity,
in the sacred repository of her own heart; and if
truant imagination sometimes dimly drew an outline
of married happiness different from the facts that
stood in dull reality before her eyes, the picture
was merely commented on by a sigh, and
consigned
to a cabinet whose key none ever touched but
herself, and she seldom.
Of this subdued and unobtrusive sorrow, for I
fear it sometimes reached that intensity of feeling,
my excellent and indefatigable ancestor appeared to
have no suspicion. He pursued his ordinary
occupations
with his ordinary single-minded devotion,
and the last thing that would have crossed his brain
was the suspicion that he had not punctiliously
done his duty by his ward. Had he acted
otherwise
,
none surely would have suffered more by his
delinquency than her husband, and none would
have a better right to complain. Now, as her
husband
never dreamt of making such an accusation,
it is not at all surprising that my ancestor remained
in ignorance of his wife's feelings, to the hour of
his death.
It has been said that the opinions of the
successor
of the fancy-dealer, underwent some essential
changes between the ages of ten and forty. After
he had reached his twenty-second year, or, in other
words, the moment he began to earn money for
himself
,
as well as for his master, he ceased to cry Wilkes
and Liberty. He was not heard to breathe a
syllable
concerning the obligations of society towards
the weak and unfortunate, for the five years that
succeeded his majority; he touched lightly on
Christian
duties in general, after he got to be worth fifty
pounds of his own; and as for railing at human
follies
,
it would have been rank ingratitude in one
who so very unequivocally got his bread by them.
About this time, his remarks on the subject of
taxation
,
however, were singularly caustic, and well
applied. He railed at the public debt, as at a
public
curse, and ominously predicted the dissolution
of society, in consequence of the burthens and
incumbrances
it was hourly accumulating on the
already overloaded shoulders of the trader.
The period of his marriage and of his succession
to the hoardings of his former master, may be dated
as the second epocha in the opinions of my ancestor.
From this moment his ambition expanded, his views
enlarged in proportion to his means, and his
contemplations
on the subject of his great floating
capital
became more profound and philosophical. A
man of my ancestor's native sagacity, whose whole
soul was absorbed in the pursuit of gain, who had
so long been forming his mind, by dealing as it
were with the elements of human weaknesses, and
who already possessed four hundred thousand
pounds, was very likely to strike out for himself
some higher road to eminence, than that in which
he had been laboriously journeying, during the
years of painful probation. The property of my
mother had been chiefly invested in good bonds
and mortgages; her protector, patron, benefactor,
and legalized father, having an unconquerable
repugnance
to confiding in that soulless, conventional,
nondescript body corporate, the public. The first
indication that was given by my ancestor of a
change of purpose in the direction of his energies,
was by calling in the whole of his outstanding debts,
and adopting the Napoleon plan of operations, by
concentrating his forces on a particular point, in
order that he might operate in masses. About this
time, too, he suddenly ceased railing at taxation.
This change may be likened to that which occurs in
the language of the ministerial journals, when they
cease abusing any foreign state with whom the
nation
has been carrying on a war, that it is, at length,
believed politic to terminate; and for much the same
reason, as it was the intention of my thrifty
ancestor
to make an ally of a power that he had hitherto
always treated as an enemy. The whole of the
four hundred thousand pounds were liberally
intrusted
to the country, the former fancy-dealer's
apprentice entering the arena of virtuous and
patriotic
speculation, as a bull; and, if with more
caution, with at least some portion of the energy
and obstinacy of the desperate animal that gives
title to this class of adventurers. Success crowned
his laudable efforts; gold rolled in upon him like
water on the flood, buoying him up, soul and body,
to that enviable height, where, as it would seem,
just views can alone be taken of society in its
innumerable
phases. All his former views of life,
which, in common with others of a similar origin
and similar political sentiments, he had imbibed in
early years, and which might with propriety be
called near views, were now completely obscured
by the sublimer and broader prospect that was
spread before him.
I am afraid the truth will compel me to admit,
that my ancestor was never charitable in the
vulgar
acceptation of the term; but then, he always
maintained that his interest in his fellow-creatures
was of a more elevated cast, taking a
comprehensive
glance at all the bearings of good and evil,
being of the sort of love which induces the
parent to correct the child, that the lesson of
present
suffering may produce the blessings of future
respectability and usefulness. Acting on these
principles
,
he gradually grew more estranged from his
species in appearance; a sacrifice that was
probably
exacted by the severity of his practical
reproofs
for their growing wickedness, and the
austere
policy that was necessary to enforce them. By
this time, my ancestor was also thoroughly
impressed
with what is called the value of money; a
sentiment
3*
which, I believe, gives its possessor a livelier
perception than common of the dangers of the
precious
metals, as well as of their privileges and uses.
He expatiated occasionally on the guarantees that
it was necessary to give to society, for its own
security
;
never even voted for a parish-officer, unless
he were a warm substantial citizen; and began to be
a subscriber to the patriotic fund, and to the other
similar little moral and pecuniary buttresses of the
government, whose common and commendable
object was, to protect our country, our altars, and
our firesides.
The death-bed of my mother has been described
to me as a touching and melancholy scene. It
appears
that as this meek and retired woman was
extricated from the coil of mortality, her
intellect
grew brighter, her powers of discernment
stronger, and her character in every respect more
elevated and commanding. Although she had said
much less about our firesides and altars than her
husband, I see no reason to doubt that she had ever
been quite as faithful as he could be to the one, and
as much devoted to the other. I shall describe the
important event of her passage from this to a
better
world, as I have often had it repeated from the
lips of one who was present, and who has had an
important agency in since making me the man I
am. This person was the clergyman of the parish,
a pious divine, a learned man, and a gentleman in
feeling as well as by extraction.
My mother, though long conscious that she was
drawing near to her last great account, had
steadily
refused to draw her husband from his absorbing
pursuits, by permitting him to be made acquainted
with her situation. He knew that she was ill; very
ill, as he had reason to think; but, as he not only
allowed her, but even volunteered to order her all
the advice and relief that money could command,
(my ancestor was not a miser in the vulgar
meaning
of the word,) he thought that he had done all
that man could do, in a case of life and death,
interests
over which he professed to have no control.
He saw Dr. Etherington, the rector, come and go
daily, for a month, without uneasiness or
apprehension
,
for he thought his discourse had a tendency to
tranquillize my mother, and he had a strong
affection
for all that left him, undisturbed, to the
enjoyment
of the occupation in which his whole energies
were now completely centered. The physician got
his guinea at each visit, with scrupulous
punctuality
;
the nurses were well received and were well
satisfied, for no one interfered with their acts but
the doctor; and every ordinary duty of
commission
was as regularly discharged by my ancestor,
as if the sinking and resigned creature from whom
he was about to be for ever separated, had been
the spontaneous choice of his young and fresh
affections.
When, therefore, a servant entered to say that
Dr. Etherington desired a private interview, my
worthy ancestor, who had no consciousness of
having neglected any obligation that became a
friend of church and state, was in no small
measure
surprised.
I come, Mr. Goldencalf, on a melancholy duty,
said the pious rector, entering the private cabinet
to which his application had for the first time
obtained
his admission; the fatal secret can no
longer be concealed from you, and your wife at
length consents that I shall be the instrument of
revealing it.
The Doctor paused; for, on such occasions it is
perhaps as well to let the party that is about to be
shocked, receive a little of the blow through his
own imagination; and busily enough was that of my
poor father said to be exercised on this painful
occasion
.
He grew pale, opened his eyes until they
again filled the sockets into which they had
gradually
been sinking for twenty years, and looked a
hundred questions that his tongue refused to put.
It cannot be, Doctor, he at length querulously
said, that a woman like Betsey has got an
ink-ling
into any of the events connected with the last
great secret expedition, and which have escaped my
jealousy and experience!
I am afraid, dear sir, that Mrs. Goldencalf has
obtained glimpses of the last great and secret
expedition
on which we must all, sooner or later,
embark
,
that have entirely escaped your vigilance.
But of this I will speak some other time. At
present
it is my painful duty to inform you it is the
opinion of the physician, that your excellent wife
cannot outlive the day, if, indeed, she do the hour.
My father was struck with this intelligence, and
for more than a minute he remained silent and
without motion. Casting his eyes towards the
papers
on which he had lately been employed, and
which contained some very important calculations
connected with the next settling day, he at length
resumed:
If this be really so, Doctor, it may be well for
me to go to her, since one in the situation of the
poor woman may indeed have something of
importance
to communicate.
It was with this object that I have now come to
tell you the truth, quietly answered the divine, who
knew that nothing was to be gained by contending
with the besetting weakness of such a man, at such
a moment.
My father bent his head in assent, and, first
carefully inclosing the open papers in a secretary,
he followed his companion to the bed-side of his
dying wife.
CHAPTER II.
Touching myself and ten thousand pounds.
Although
my ancestor was much too wise to
refuse to look back upon his origin in a worldly point
of view, he never threw his retrospective glances
so far as to reach the sublime mystery of his moral
existence; and while his thoughts might be said to
be ever on the stretch to attain glimpses into the
future, they were by far too earthly to extend
beyond
any other settling day than those which were
regulated by the ordinances of the stock exchange.
With him, to be born was but the commencement
of a speculation, and to die was to determine the
general balance of profit and loss. A man who
had so rarely meditated on the grave changes of
mortality, therefore, was consequently so much the
less prepared to gaze upon the visible solemnities
of a death-bed. Although he had never truly loved
my mother, for love was a sentiment much too
pure and elevated for one whose imagination dwelt
habitually on the beauties of the stock-books, he
had ever been kind to her, and of late he was even
much disposed, as has already been stated, to
contribute
as much to her temporal comforts as
comported
with his pursuits and habits. On the other
hand, the quiet temperament of my mother required
some more exciting cause than the affections of her
husband, to quicken those germs of deep, placid,
womanly love, that certainly lay dormant in her
heart, like seed withering with the ungenial cold
of winter. The last meeting of such a pair was not
likely to be attended with any violent outpourings
of grief.
My ancestor, notwithstanding, was deeply struck
with the physical changes in the appearance of his
wife.
Thou art much emaciated, Betsey, he said,
taking her hand kindly, after a long and solemn
pause; much more so than I had thought, or could
have believed! Does nurse give thee comforting
soups and generous nourishment?
My mother smiled the ghastly smile of death;
but waved her hand, with loathing, at his
suggestion
.
All this is now too late, Mr. Goldencalf, she
answered
,
speaking with a distinctness and an energy
for which she had long been reserving her strength.
Food and raiment are no longer among my
wants.
Well, well, Betsey, one that is in want of
neither
food nor raiment, cannot be said to be in great
suffering, after all; and I am glad that thou art so
much at ease. Dr. Etherington tells me thou art
far from well bodily, however, and I am come
expressly
to see if I can order any thing that will
help to make thee more easy.
Mr. Goldencalf, you can. My wants for this life
are nearly over; a short hour, or two, will remove
me beyond the world, its cares, its vanities, its
My poor mother probably meant to add, its
heartlessness
or its selfishness; but she rebuked herself,
and paused.By the mercy of our blessed
Redeemer
,
and through the benevolent agency of this
excellent man, she resumed, glancing her eye
upward
at first with holy reverence, and then at the
divine with meek gratitude, I quit you without
alarm, and were it not for one thing, I might say
without care.
And what is there to distress thee, in particular,
Betsey? asked my father, blowing his nose, and
speaking with unusual tenderness; if it be in my
power to set thy heart at ease on this, or on any
other point, name it, and I will give orders to have
it immediately performed. Thou hast been a good
pious woman, and can have little to reproach
thyself
with.
My mother looked earnestly and wistfully at her
husband. Never before had he betrayed so strong
an interest in her happiness, and had it not, alas!
been too late, this glimmering of kindness might
have lighted the matrimonial torch into a brighter
flame than had ever yet glowed upon the past.
Mr. Goldencalf, we have an only son
We have, Betsey, and it may gladden thee to
hear that the physician thinks the boy more likely
to live than either of his poor brothers and sisters.
I cannot explain the holy and mysterious
principle
of maternal nature that caused my mother to
clasp her hands, to raise her eyes to heaven, and,
while a gleam flitted athwart her glassy eyes and
wan cheeks, to murmur her thanks to God for the
boon. She was herself hastening away to the
eternal
bliss of the pure of mind and the redeemed, and
her imagination, quiet and simple as it was, had
drawn pictures in which she and her departed
babes were standing before the throne of the Most
High, chanting his glory, and shining amid the
starsand yet was she now rejoicing that the last and
the most cherished of all her offspring, was likely
to be left exposed to the evils, the vices, nay, to the
enormities, of the state of being that she herself so
willingly resigned.
It is of our boy that I wish now to speak, Mr.
Goldencalf, replied my mother, when her secret
devotion was ended. The child will have need
of instruction and care; in short, of both mother
and father.
Betsey, thou forgettest that he will still have the
latter.
You are much wrapped up in your business,
Mr. Goldencalf, and are not, in other respects,
qualified to educate a boy born to the curse and to
the temptations of immense riches.
My excellent ancestor looked as if he thought
his dying consort had in sooth finally taken leave
of her senses.
There are public schools, Betsey; I promise
thee the child shall not be forgotten: I will have
him well taught, though it cost me a thousand a
year!
His wife reached forth her emaciated hand to
that of my father, and pressed the latter with as
much force as a dying mother could use. For a
fleet moment she even appeared to have gotten rid
of her latest care. But the knowledge of
character
that had been acquired by the hard experience
of thirty years, was not to be unsettled by the
gratitude
of a moment.
I wish, Mr. Goldencalf, she anxiously resumed,
to receive your solemn promise to commit the
education of our boy to Dr. Etherington  you
know his worth, and must have full confidence in
such a man.
Nothing would give me greater satisfaction, my
dear Betsey; and if Dr. Etherington will consent
to receive him, I will send Jack to his house this
very evening; for, to own the truth, I am but little
qualified to take charge of a child under a year old.
A hundred a year, more or less, shall not spoil so
good a bargain.
The divine was a gentleman, and he looked grave
at this speech, though, meeting the anxious eyes of
my mother, his own lost their displeasure in a
glance of reassurance and pity.
The charges of his education will be easily
settled
,
Mr. Goldencalfadded my motherbut
the Doctor has consented with difficulty to take
the responsibility of my poor babe, and that only
under two conditions.
The stock-dealer required an explanation with
his eyes.
One is, that the child shall be left solely to his
own care, after he has reached his fourth year; and
the other is, that you make an endowment for the
support of two poor scholars, at one of the
principal
schools.
As my mother got out the last words, she fell
back on her pillow, whence her interest in the
subject
had enabled her to lift her head a little, and
she fairly gasped for breath, in the intensity of her
anxiety to hear the answer. My ancestor
contracted
his brow, like one who saw it was a subject
that required reflection.
Thou dost not know perhaps, Betsey, that these
endowments swallow up a great deal of money
a great dealand often very uselessly.
Ten thousand pounds is the sum that has been
agreed upon between Mrs. Goldencalf and me,
steadily remarked the Doctor, who, in my soul, I
believe had hoped that his condition would be
rejected
,
having yielded to the importunities of a
dying
woman, rather than to his own sense of that
which might be either very desirable or very useful.
Ten thousand pounds!
Vol. I. 4
My mother could not speak, though she
succeeded
in making an imploring sign of assent.
Ten thousand pounds is a great deal of money,
my dear Betsey;a very great deal!
The colour of my mother changed to the hue
of death, and by her breathing she appeared to be
in the agony.
Wellwell, Betsey, said my father a little
hastily, for he was frightened at her pallid
countenance
and extreme distresshave it thine own
waythe moneyyes, yesit shall be given as
thou wish'stnow set thy kind heart at rest.
The revulsion of feeling was too great for one
whose system had been wound up to a state of
excitement
like that which had sustained my mother,
who, an hour before, had seemed scarcely able to
speak. She extended her hand towards her
husband
,
smiled benignantly in his face, whispered the
word Thanks, and then, losing all her powers
of body, sunk into the last sleep, as tranquilly as the
infant drops its head on the bosom of the nurse.
This was, after all, a sudden, and, in one sense, an
unexpected death; all who witnessed it were struck
with awe. My father gazed for a whole minute
intently on the placid features of his wife, and left
the room in silence. He was followed by Dr.
Etherington, who accompanied him to the private
apartment, where they had first met that night,
neither uttering a syllable until both were seated.
She was a good woman, Dr. Etherington!
said the widowed man, shaking his foot with
agitation
.
She was a good woman, Mr. Goldencalf.
And a good wife, Dr. Etherington.
I have always believed her to be a good wife,
sir.
Faithful, obedient, and frugal.
Three qualities that are of much practical use,
in the affairs of this world.
I never shall marry again, sir.
The divine bowed.
Nay, I never could find such another match!
Again the divine inclined his head, though the
assent was accompanied by a slight smile.
Well, she has left me an heir.
And brought something that he might inherit
observed the Doctor, dryly.
My ancestor looked up inquiringly at this
companion
,
but apparently most of the sarcasm was
thrown away.
I resign the child to your care, Dr.
Etherington
,
conformably to the dying request of my beloved
Betsey.
I accept the charge, Mr. Goldencalf,
conformably
to my promise to the deceased; but you will
remember that there was a condition coupled with
that promise which must be faithfully and promptly
fulfiled.
My ancestor was too much accustomed to respect
the punctilios of trade, whose code admits of frauds
only in certain categories, which are sufficiently
explained in its conventional rules of honor; a sort
of specified morality, that is bottomed more on the
convenience of its votaries than on the general law
of right. He respected the letter of his promise,
while his soul yearned to avoid its spirit; and his
wits were already actively seeking the means of
doing that which he so much desired.
I did make a promise to poor Betsey, certainly,
he answered in the way of one who pondered
and it was a promise, too, made under very
solemn circumstances.
The promises made to the dead are doubly
binding; since, by their departure to the world of
spirits, it may be said they leave the performance
to the exclusive susperintendence of the Being who
cannot lie.
My ancestor quailed; his whole frame shuddered,
and his purpose was shaken.
Poor Betsey left you as her representative in
this case, however, Doctorhe observed, after
the delay of more than a minute, casting his eyes
wistfully towards the divine.
In one sense, she certainly did, sir.
And a representative with full powers, is
legally
a principal under a different name. I think this
matter might be arranged to our mutual satisfaction,
Dr. Etherington, and the intention of poor Betsey
most completely executed; she, poor woman, knew
little of business, as was best for her sex; and when
women undertake affairs of magnitude, they are
very apt to make awkward work of it.
So that the intention of the deceased be
completely
fulfilled, you will not find me exacting, Mr.
Goldencalf.
I thought as muchI knew there could be no
difficulty between two men of sense, who were met
with honest views to settle a matter of this nature.
The intention of poor Betsey, Doctor, was to place
her child under your care, with the expectation
and I do not deny its justicethat the boy would
receive more benefit from your knowledge than he
possibly could from mine.
Dr. Etherington was too honest to deny these
premises, and too polite to admit them without an
inclination of acknowledgment.
As we are quite of the same mind, good sir,
concerning the preliminaries, continued my
ancestor
,
we will enter a little nearer into the details.
It appears to me to be no more than strict justice,
that he who does the work should receive the
reward
.
This is a principle in which I have been
educated, Dr. Etherington; it is one in which I
could wish to have my son educated; and it is one
on which I hope always to practise.
Another inclination of the body conveyed the
silent assent of the divine.
Now, poor Betsey, Heaven bless her!for she
was a meek and tranquil companion, and richly
deserves
to be rewarded in a future statebut, poor
Betsey had little knowledge of business. She
fancied
,
that in bestowing these ten thousand pounds
on a charity, she was acting well; whereas, she
was in fact committing injustice. If you are to
have the trouble and care of bringing up little Jack,
who but you should reap the reward?
I shall expect, Mr. Goldencalf, that you will
furnish the means to provide for the child's wants.
Of that, sir, it is unnecessary to speak,
interrupted
my ancestor, both promptly and proudly.
I am a wary man, and a prudent man, and am
one who knows the value of money, I trust; but I
am no miser, to stint my own flesh and blood. Jack
shall never want for any thing, while it is in my
power to give it. I am by no means as rich, sir,
as the neighbourhood supposes; but then I am no
beggar. I dare say, if all my assets were fairly
counted, it might be found that I am worth a plum.
You are said to have received a much larger
sum than that, with the late Mrs. Goldencalf, the
divine observed, not without reproof in his voice.
Ah, dear sir, I need not tell you what vulgar
rumor isbut I shall not undermine my own
credit; and we will change the subject. My
object
,
Dr. Etherington, was merely to do justice.
Poor Betsey desired that ten thousand pounds might
be given to found a scholarship or two: now, what
4 *
have these scholars done, or what are they likely to
do, for me or mine? The case is different with you,
sir; you will have troublemuch trouble, I make
no doubt; and it is proper, that you should have a
sufficient compensation. I was about to propose,
therefore, that you should consent to receive my
check for three,or four,or even for five
thousand
pounds, continued my ancestor, raising the
offer as he saw the frown on the brow of the
Doctor
deepen. Yes, sir, I will even say the latter
sum, which possibly will not be too much for your
trouble and care; and we will forget the womanish
plan of poor Betsey, in relation to the two
scholarships
and the charity. Five thousand pounds down,
Doctor, for yourself, and the subject of the charity
forgotten for ever.
When my father had thus distinctly put his
proposition
,
he awaited its effect with the confidence
of one who had long dealt with cupidity. For a
novelty, his calculation failed. The face of Dr.
Etherington flushed, then paled, and finally settled
into a look of melancholy reprehension. He arose
and paced the room for several minutes in silence;
during which time his companion believed he was
debating with himself on the chances of obtaining
a higher bid for his consent, when he suddenly
stopped
and addressed my ancestor in a mild, but steady
tone.
I feel it to be a duty, Mr. Goldencalf, he said,
to admonish you of the precipice over which you
hang. The love of money, which is the root of all
evil, which caused Judas to betray even his Saviour
and God, has taken deep root in your soul. You
are no longer young, and, although still proud in
your strength and prosperity, are much nearer to
your great account, than you may be willing to
believe. It is not an hour since you witnessed the
departure of a penitent soul for the presence of her
God; since you heard the dying request from her
lips; and since, in such a presence and in such a
scene, you gave a pledge to respect her wishes;
and, now, with the accursed spirit of gain
uppermost
,
you would trifle with these most sacred
obligations
,
in order to keep a little worthless gold in a
hand that is already full to overflowing. Fancy
that the pure spirit of thy confiding and
single-minded
wife were present at this conversation; fancy
it mourning over thy weakness and violated faith
nay, I know not that such is not the fact; for
there is no reason to believe that the happy spirits
are not permitted to watch near, and mourn over
us, until we are released from this mass of sin and
depravity in which we dwelland, then, reflect
what must be her sorrow, at hearing how soon her
parting request is forgotten, how useless has been
the example of her holy end, how rooted and fearful
are thine own infirmities!
My father was more rebuked by the manner
than by the words of the divine. He passed his
hand across his brow, as if to shut out the view of
his wife's spirit; turned, drew his writing materials
nearer, wrote a check for the ten thousand pounds,
and handed it to the doctor with the subdued air of
a corrected boy.
Jack shall be at your disposal, good sir, he
said, as the paper was delivered, whenever it may
be your pleasure to send for him.
They parted in silence; the divine too much
displeased
,
and my ancestor too much grieved, to
indulge
in words of ceremony.
When my father found himself alone, he gazed
furtively about the room, to assure himself that the
rebuking spirit of his wife had not taken a shape
less questionable than air, and then he mused for at
least an hour, very painfully, on all the principal
occurrences of the night. It is said that occupation
is a certain solace for grief, and so it proved to
be in the present case; for luckily my father had
made up that very day his private account of the
sum total of his fortune. Sitting down, therefore,
to the agreeable task, he went through the simple
process of substracting from it the amount for
which he had just drawn, and, finding that he was
still master of seven hundred and eighty-two
thousand
three hundred and eleven pounds odd shillings
and even pence, he found a very natural
consolation
for the magnitude of the sum he had just given
away, by comparing it with the magnitude of that
which was left.
CHAPTER III.
Opinions of our author's ancestor, together with some of his
own, and some of other people's.
Dr. Etherington
was both a pious man and a
gentleman. The second son of a baronet of
ancient
lineage, he had been educated in most of the
opinions of his caste, and possibly he was not
entirely
above its prejudices; but, this much admitted,
few divines were more willing to defer to the ethics
and principles of the bible, than himself. His
humility
had, of course, a decent regard to station;
his charity was judiciously regulated by the articles
of faith; and his philanthropy was of the
discriminating
character that became a warm
supporter
of church and state.
In accepting the trust which he was now obliged
to assume, he had yielded purely to a benevolent
wish to smooth the dying pillow of my mother.
Acquainted with the character of her husband, he
had committed a sort of pious fraud, in attaching
the condition of the endowment to his consent;
for, notwithstanding the becoming language of his
own rebuke, the promise, and all the other little
attendant circumstances of the night, it might be
questioned which felt the most surprise after the
draft was presented and duly honored, he who found
himself in possession, or he who found himself
deprived
,
of the sum of ten thousand pounds sterling.
Still, Dr. Etherington acted with the most
scrupulous
integrity in the whole affair; and, although I
am aware, that a writer who has so many wonders
to relate, as must of necessity adorn the succeeding
pages of this manuscript, should observe a guarded
discretion in drawing on the credulity of his
readers
,
truth compels me to add, that every farthing
of the money was duly invested, with a single eye
to the wishes of the dying Christian, who, under
Providence, had been the means of bestowing so
much gold on the poor and unlettered. As to the
manner in which the charity was finally improved,
I shall say nothing, since no inquiry, on my part,
has ever enabled me to obtain such information as
would justify my speaking with authority.
As for myself, I shall have little more to add
touching the events of the succeeding twenty years.
I was baptized, nursed, breeched, schooled, horsed,
confirmed, sent to the university and graduated,
much as befalls all gentlemen of the established
church, in the United Kingdoms of Great Britain
and Ireland, or, in other words, of the land of my
ancestor. During these pregnant years, Dr.
Etherington
acquitted himself of a duty that, judging by a very
predominant feeling of human nature, (which,
singularly
enough, renders us uniformly averse to being
troubled with other people's affairs,) I think he must
have found sufficiently vexatious, quite as well as
my good mother had any right to expect. Most
of my vacations were spent at his rectory; for he
had first married, then become a father, next a
widower, and had exchanged his town-living for
one in the country, between the periods of my
mother's
death and that of my going to Eton; and,
after I quitted Oxford, much more of my time was
passed beneath his friendly roof, than beneath that of
my own parent. Indeed, I saw little of the latter.
He paid my bills, furnished me with pocket-money,
and professed an intention to let me travel after I
should reach my majority. But, satisfied with
these proofs of paternal care, he appeared willing
to let me pursue my own course very much in my
own way.
My ancestor was an eloquent example of the
truth of that political dogma which teaches the
efficacy of the division of labor. No manufacturer
of the head of a pin ever attained greater dexterity
in his single-minded vocation, than was reached by
my father in the one pursuit to which he devoted,
so far as human ken could reach, both soul and
body. As any sense is known to increase in
acuteness
by constant exercise, or any passion by
indulgence
,
so did his ardor in favor of the great object
of his affections grow with its growth, and become
more manifest as an ordinary observer would be
apt to think the motive of its existence at all had
nearly ceased. This is a moral phenomenon that
I have often had occasion to observe, and which
there is some reason to think, depends on a
principle
of attraction that has hitherto escaped the
sagacity
of the philosophers, but which is as active
in the immaterial, as is that of gravitation in the
material world. Talents like his, so incessantly
and unweariedly employed, produced the usual
fruits. He grew richer hourly, and, at the time
of which I speak, he was pretty generally known
to the initiated, to be the warmest man who had
any thing to do with the stock exchange.
I do not think that the opinions of my ancestor
underwent as many material changes between the
ages of fifty and seventy, as they had undergone
between the ages of ten and forty. During the
latter period, the tree of life usually gets deep root,
its inclination is fixed, whether obtained by
bending
to the storms, or by drawing towards the light;
and it probably yields more in fruits of its own,
than it gains by tillage and manuring. Still my
ancestor was not exactly the same man the day
he kept his seventieth birth-day, as he had been
the day he kept his fiftieth. In the first place, he
was worth thrice the money at the former period,
that he had been worth at the latter. Of course
his moral system had undergone all the mutations
that are known to be dependent on a change of
this important character. Beyond a question,
during the last five-and-twenty years of the life of
my ancestor, his political bias, too, was in favor of
exclusive privileges and exclusive benefits. I do
not mean that he was an aristocrat in the vulgar
acceptation. To him, feodality was a blank; he
had probably never heard the word. Portcullises
rose and fell, flanking towers lifted their heads, and
embattled walls swept around their fabrics in vain,
so far as his imagination was concerned. He cared
not for the days of courts leet and courts baron;
nor for the barons themselves; nor for the honors
of a pedigree (why should he?no prince in the
land could more clearly trace his family into
obscurity
,
than himself,) nor for the vanities of a
court, nor for those of society; nor for aught else
of the same nature, that is apt to have charms for
the weak-minded, the imaginative, or the
conceited
.
His political prepossessions showed themselves
in a very different manner. Throughout the whole
of the five lustres I have named, he was never
heard to whisper a censure against government,
let its measures, or the character of its
administration
,
be what it would. It was enough for him
that it was government. Even taxation no longer
excited his ire, nor aroused his eloquence. He
conceived
it to be necessary to order, and especially
to the protection of property, a branch of political
science that he had so studied, as to succeed in
protecting his own estate, in a measure, against
even this great ally itself. After he became worth
a million, it was observed that all his opinions grew
less favorable to mankind in general, and that he
was much disposed to exaggerate the amount and
quality of the few boons which Providence has
bestowed on the poor. The report of a meeting
of the whigs, generally had an effect on his
appetite
;
a resolution that was suspected of emanating
from Brookes', commonly robbed him of a dinner,
and the radicals never seriously moved that he did
not spend a sleepless night, and pass a large
portion
of the next day, in uttering words that it
would be hardly moral to repeat. I may without
impropriety add, however, that on such occasions,
he did not spare allusions to the gallows: Sir
Francis
Burdett, in particular, was a target for a good
deal of billingsgate; and men as upright and as
respectable even as my lords Grey, Lansdowne,
and Holland, were treated as if they were no
better
than they should be. But, on these little details
it is unnecessary to dwell, for it must be a subject
of common remark, that the more elevated and
refined men become in their political ethics, the
more they are accustomed to throw dirt upon their
neighbors. I will just state, however, that most
of what I have here related, has been transmitted
to me by direct oral traditions, for I seldom saw
my ancestor, and when we did meet, it was only
to settle accounts, to eat a leg of mutton together,
and to part like those who, at least, have never
quarrelled.
Not so with Dr. Etherington. Habit (to say
nothing of my own merits) had attached him to
one who owed so much to his care, and his doors
were always as open to me, as if I had been his
own son.
It has been said, that most of my idle time
(omitting the part mispent in the schools) was
passed at the rectory.
The excellent divine had married a lovely
woman, a year or two after the death of my
mother
,
who had left him a widower, and the father
of a little image of herself, before the expiration
of a twelvemonth. Owing to the strength of his
affections for the deceased, or for his daughter, or
because he could not please himself in a second
marriage as well as it had been his good fortune to
do so in the first, Dr. Etherington had never spoken
of forming another connexion. He appeared
content
to discharge his duties, as a Christian and a
gentleman, without increasing them by creating
any new relations with society.
Anna Etherington was of course my constant
companion, during many long and delightful visits at
the rectory. Three years my junior, the friendship
on my part had commenced by a hundred acts of
boyish kindness. Between the ages of seven and
twelve, I dragged her about in a garden-chair,
pushed her on the swing, and wiped her eyes and
uttered words of friendly consolation, when any
Vol. I. 5
transient cloud obscured the sunny brightness of her
childhood. From twelve to fourteen, I told her
stories; astonished her with narratives of my own
exploits at Eton, and caused her serene blue eyes
to open in admiration, at the marvels of London.
At fourteen, I began to pick up her
pocket-handkerchief
,
hunt for her thimble, accompany her in duets,
and to read poetry to her, as she occupied herself
with the little lady-like employments of the needle.
About the age of seventeen, I began to compare
cousin Anna, as I was permitted to call her, with the
other young girls of my acquaintance, and the
comparison
was generally much in her favor. It was
also about this time, that, as my admiration grew
more warm and manifest, she became less confiding,
and less frank: I perceived too that, for a novelty,
she now had some secrets that she did not choose
to communicate to me, that she was more with her
governess, and less in my society than formerly,
and, on one occasion (bitterly did I feel the slight)
she actually recounted to her father the amusing
incidents of a little birth-day fte at which she
had been present, and which was given by a
gentleman
of the vicinity, before she even dropped a
hint to me, touching the delight she had
experienced
on the occasion! I was, however, a good
deal compensated for the slight, by her saying,
kindly, as she ended her playful and humorous
account
of the affair,
It would have made you laugh heartily, Jack,
to see the droll manner in which the servants acted
their parts; (there had been a sort of mistified
masque) more particularly the fat old butler, of
whom they had made a Cupid, as Dick Griffin said,
in order to show that Love becomes drowsy and dull
by good eating and drinkingI
do
wish you
could
have been there, Jack.
Anna was a gentle feminine girl, with a most
lovely and winning countenance, and I did
inherently
like to hear her pronounce the word Jack
it was so different from the boisterous screech of
the Eton boys, or the swaggering call of my boon
companions, at Oxford!
I should have liked it excessively myself, Anna,
I answered; more particularly as you seem to
have so much enjoyed the fun.
Yes, but that
could not
beinterrupted
Miss-Mrs
.
Norton, the governess.For Sir Harry
Griffin
is very difficult about his associates, and you
know, my dear, that Mr. Goldencalf, though a very
respectable young man himself, could not expect
one of the oldest Baronets of the county, to go out
of his way to invite the son of a stock-jobber to be
present at a fte given to his own heir.
Luckily for Miss-Mrs. Norton, Dr. Etherington
had walked away, the moment his daughter ended
her recital, or she might have met with a
disagreeable
commentary on her notions concerning the
fitness
of associations. Anna herself looked earnestly
at her governess, and I saw a flush mantle over her
sweet face, that reminded me of the ruddiness of
morn. Her soft eyes then fell to the floor, and it
was some time before she spoke.
The next day I was arranging some fishing-tackle
under a window of the library, where my person
was concealed by the shrubbery, when I heard the
melodious voice of Anna wishing the rector good
morning. My heart beat quicker as she
approached
the casement, tenderly inquiring of her parent
how he had passed the night. The answers were
as affectionate as the questions, and then there
was a little pause.
What is a stock-jobber, father? suddenly
resumed
Anna, whom I heard rustling the leaves
above my head.
A stock-jobber, my dear, is one who buys and
sells in the public funds, with a view to profit.
And is it thought a
particularly
disgraceful
employment?
Why, that depends on circumstances. On
'Change it seems to be well enoughamong
merchants
and bankers, there is some odium attached
to it, I believe.
And can you say
why
, father?
I believe, said Dr. Etherington, laughing, for
no other reason than that it is an
uncertain
calling
one that is liable to sudden reverseswhat is
termed gamblingand whatever renders property
insecure, is sure to obtain odium among those
whose principal concern is its accumulation; those
who consider the responsibility of others of
essential
importance to themselves.
But is it a dishonest pursuit, father?
As the times go, not necessarily, my dear;
though it may readily become so.
And is it disreputable, generally, with the
world?
That depends on circumstances, Anna. When
the stock-jobber loses, he is very apt to be
condemned
;
but I rather think his character rises in
proportion to his gains. But why do you ask these
singular questions, love?
I thought I heard Anna breathe harder than
usual, and it is certain that she leaned far out of
the window, to pluck a rose.
Why, Mrs. Norton said, Jack was not invited
to Sir Harry Griffin's, because his father was a
stock-jobber. Do you think she was right, sir?
Very likely, my dear, returned the divine,
who I fancied was smiling at the question. Sir
Harry has the advantages of birth, and he
probably
did not forget that our friend Jack was not so
fortunateand, moreover, Sir Harry, while he
values himself on his wealth, is not as rich as
Jack's father, by a million or twoin other words,
as they say on 'Change, Jack's father could buy
ten of him. This motive was perhaps more likely
to influence him than the first. In addition, Sir
Harry is suspected of gambling himself in the
funds, through the aid of agents; and a gentleman
who resorts to such means to increase his fortune,
is a little apt to exaggerate his social advantages,
by way of a set-off to the humiliation.
And
gentlemen
do really become stock-jobbers,
father?
Anna, the world has undergone great changes
in my time. Ancient opinions have been shaken,
and governments themselves are getting to be
little better than political establishments to add
facilities to the accumulation of money. This is
a subject, however, you cannot very well
understand
,
nor do I pretend to be very profound in it,
myself.
But is Jack's father really so very, very rich?
asked Anna, whose thoughts had been wandering
from the thread of those pursued by her father.
He is believed to be so.
And Jack is his heir?
Certainlyhe has no other child; though it is
not easy to say, what so singular a being may do
with his money.
I hope he will disinherit Jack!
You surprise me, Anna!You, who are so
mild and reasonable, to wish such a misfortune to
befall our young friend, John Goldencalf!
I gazed upward in astonishment, at this
extraordinary
speech of Anna, and, at the moment, I
would have given all my interest in the fortune in
question, to have seen her face, (most of her body
5*
was out of the window, for I heard her again
rustling the bush above my head,) in order to judge
of her motive by its expression; but an envious
rose grew exactly in the only spot where it was
possible to get a glimpse.
Why do you wish so cruel a thing? resumed
Dr. Etherington, a little earnestly.
Because I hate stock-jobbing, and its riches,
father. Were Jack poorer, it seems to me, he
would be better esteemed.
As this was uttered, the dear girl drew back,
and I then perceived that I had mistaken her cheek
for one of the largest and most blooming of the
flowers. Dr. Etherington laughed, and I distinctly
heard him kiss the blushing face of his daughter.
I think I would have given up my hopes in another
million, to have been the rector of Tenthpig, at
that instant.
If this be all, child, he answered, set thy
heart at rest. Jack's money will never bring him
into contempt, unless through the use he may
make of it. Alas! Anna, we live in an age of
corruption and cupidity! Generous motives
appear
to be lost sight of, in the general desire of
gain; and he who would manifest a disposition to
a pure and disinterested philanthropy, is either
distrusted
as a hypocrite, or derided as a fool. The
accursed revolution among our neighbors, the
French, has quite unsettled opinions, and religion
itself has tottered in the wild anarchy of theories,
to which it has given rise. There is no worldly
advantage that has been more austerely denounced
by the divine writers, than riches, and yet it is fast
rising to be the god of the ascendant. To say
nothing
of an hereafter, society is getting to be
corrupted
by it to the core, and even respect for birth
is yielding to the mercenary feeling.
And do you not think pride of birth, father, a
mistaken prejudice, as well as pride of riches?
Pride of any sort, my love, cannot exactly be
defended on evangelical principles; but surely
some distinctions among men are necessary, even
for quiet. Were the levelling principle
acknowledged
,
the lettered and the accomplished must
descend to an equality with the ignorant and
vulgar
,
since all men cannot rise to the attainments
of the former class, and the world would
retrograde
to barbarism. The character of a Christian
gentleman is much too precious to trifle with, in
order to carry out an impracticable theory.
Anna was silent. Probably she was confused
between the opinions which she most liked to
cherish
,
and the faint glimmerings of truth to which
we are reduced, by the ordinary relations of life.
As for the good rector himself, I had no difficulty
in understanding his bias, though neither his
premises
nor his conclusions possessed the logical
clearness
that used to render his sermons so delightful,
more especially when he preached about the higher
qualities of the Saviour's dispensation, such as
charity, love of our fellows, and, in particular, the
imperative duty of humbling ourselves before God.
A month after this accidental dialogue, chance
made me the auditor of what passed between my
ancestor and Sir Joseph Job, another celebrated
dealer in the funds, in an interview that took place
in the house of the former, in Cheapside. As the
difference was so
patent
, as the French express
it, I shall furnish the substance of what passed.
This is a serious and a most alarming
movement
,
Mr. Goldencalf, observed Sir Joseph, and
calls for union and cordiality among the holders
of property. Should these damnable opinions get
fairly abroad among the people, what would
become
of us?I ask, Mr. Goldencalf, what would
become of us?
I agree with you, Sir Joseph, it is very
alarming
!frightfully
alarming!
We shall have Agrarian laws, sir.Your
money
,
sir, and mine,our hard earnings, will
become
the prey of political robbers, and our
children
will be beggared, to satisfy the envious
longings
of some pitiful scoundrel without a six-pence!
'Tis a sad state of things, Sir Joseph; and
government is very culpable that it don't raise at
least ten new regiments.
The worst of it is, good Mr. Goldencalf, that
there are some jack-a-napes of the aristocracy
who lead the rascals on, and lend them the
sanction
of their names. It is a great mistake, sir,
that we give so much importance to birth in this
island, by which means proud beggars set
unwashed
blackguards in motion, and the substantial
subjects
are the sufferers. Property, sir, is in
danger
,
and property is the only true basis of society.
I am sure, Sir Joseph, I never could see the
smallest use in birth.
It is of no use, but to beget pensioners, Mr.
Goldencalf.Now, with property, it is a different
thingmoney is the parent of money, and by
money a state becomes powerful and prosperous.
But this accursed revolution among our neighbors,
the French, has quite unsettled opinions, and, alas!
property is in perpetual danger!
Sorry am I to say, I feel it to be so in every
nerve of my body, Sir Joseph.
We must unite and defend ourselves, Mr.
Goldencalf, else both you and I, men warm enough
and substantial enough at present, will be in the
ditch. Do you not see that we are in actual
danger
of a division of property?
God forbid!
Yes, sir, our sacred property is in danger!
Here, Sir Joseph shook my father cordially by
the hand, and withdrew. I find, by a
memorandum
among the papers of my deceased ancestor,
that he paid the broker of Sir Joseph, that day
month, sixty-two thousand seven hundred and
twelve pounds of difference, (as bull and bear,)
owing to the fact of the knight having got some
secret information through a clerk in one of the
offices; an advantage that enabled him, in this
instance
,
at least, to make a better bargain than one
who was generally allowed to be among the
shrewdest calculators on 'Change.
My mind was of a nature to be considerably
exercised, (as the pious purists express it,) by
becoming
the depository of sentiments so diametrically
opposed to each other, as those of Dr. Etherington
and those of Sir Joseph Job. On the one side, I
was taught the degradation of birth; on the other,
the dangers of property. Anna was usually my
confidant, but on this subject I was tongue-tied,
for I dared not confess that I had overheard the
discourse with her father, and I was compelled to
digest the contradictory doctrines by myself, in the
best manner I could.
CHAPTER IV.
Showing the ups and downs, the hopes and fears, and the
vagaries of love, some views of death, and an account of
an inheritance.
From
my twentieth to my twenty-third year,
no event occurred of any great moment. The
day I became of age, my father settled on me
a regular allowance of a thousand a year, and I
make no doubt I should have spent my time much
as other young men, had it not been for the
peculiarity
of my birth, which I now began to see was
wanting in a few of the requisites to carry me
successfully through a struggle for place, with a
certain portion of what is called the great world.
While most were anxious to trace themselves into
obscurity, there was a singular reluctance to
effecting
the object as clearly and as distinctly as
it was in my power to do. From all which, as
well as from much other testimony, I have been
led to infer, that the doses of mistification which
appear to be necessary to the happiness of the
human
race, require to be mixed with an experienced
and a delicate hand. Our organs, both physically
and morally, are so fearfully constituted, that they
require to be protected from realities. As the
physical
eye has need of clouded glass, to look steadily
at the sun, so it would seem the mind's eye has also
need of something smoky, to look steadily at truth.
But, while I avoided laying open the secret of my
heart to Anna, I sought various opportunities to
converse with Dr. Etherington and my father, on
those points which gave me the most concern.
From the first, I heard principles which went to
show that society was of necessity divided into
orders; that it was not only impolitic, but wicked,
to weaken the barriers by which they were
separated
;
that Heaven had its seraphs and cherubs,
its archangels and angels, its saints and its merely
happy, and that, by obvious induction, this world
ought to have its kings, lords, and commons. The
usual winding up of all the Doctor's essays, was a
lamentation on the confusion in classes that was
visiting England as a judgment. My ancestor, on
the other hand, cared little for social classification,
or for any other conservatory expedient but force.
On this topic he would talk all day, regiments and
bayonets glittering in every sentence. When most
eloquent on this theme, he would cry, (like Mr.
Manners Sutton,) ORDERorder! nor can I
recall a single disquisition that did not end with,
Alas, Jack, property is in danger!
I shall not say that my mind entirely escaped
confusion among these conflicting opinions,
although
I luckily got a glimpse of one important
truth, for both the commentators cordially agreed
in fearing and, of necessity, in hating the mass of
their fellow-creatures. My own natural
disposition
was inclining to philanthropy, and, as I was
unwilling to admit the truth of theories that
arrayed
me in open hostility against so large a portion
of mankind, I soon determined to set up one of my
own, which, while it avoided the faults, should
include the excellencies, of both the others. It was,
of course, no great affair merely to form such a
resolution; but I shall have occasion to say a word
hereafter, on the manner in which I attempted to
carry it out in practice.
Time moved on, and Anna became each day
more beautiful. I thought that she had lost some
of her frankness and girlish gaiety, it is true, after
the dialogue with her father; but this I attributed
to the reserve and discretion that became the
expanding reason and greater feeling of propriety
that adorn young womanhood. With me she was
always ingenuous and simple, and were I to live
a thousand years, the angelic serenity of
countenance
with which she invariably listened to the
theories of my busy brain, would not be erased
from recollection.
We were talking of these things one morning
quite alone. Anna heard me when I was most
sedate with manifest pleasure, and she smiled
mournfully when the thread of my argument was
entangled by a vagary of the imagination. I felt
at my heart's core what a blessing such a Mentor
would be, and how fortunate would be my lot
could I succeed in securing her for life. Still I
did notcould not summon courage to lay bare
my inmost thoughts, and to beg a boon that, in
these moments of transient humility, I feared I
never should be worthy to possess.
I have even thought of marrying, I
continued
,
so occupied with my own theories as not
to weigh, with the accuracy that becomes the
frankness and superior advantages which man
possesses over the gentler sex, the full import of
my wordscould I find one, Anna, as gentle,
as good, as beautiful, and as wise as yourself, who
would consent to be mine, I should not wait a
minute; but, unhappily, I fear this is not likely to
be my blessed lot. I am not the grandson of a
Baronet, and your father expects to unite you with
one who can at least show that the bloody hand
has once been borne on his shield; and, on the
other side, my father talks of nothing but millions.
During the first part of this speech, the amiable
girl looked kindly up at me, and with a seeming
desire
to soothe me; but at its close, her eyes dropped
upon her work, and she remained silent. Your
father says that every man who has an interest in
the state should give it pledges,here Anna
smiled, but so covertly, that her sweet mouth
scarce betrayed the impulseand that none
others can ever control it to advantage. I have
thought of asking my father to buy a borough and
a baronetcy, for with the first, and the influence
that his money gives, he need not long wish for
the last; but I never open my lips on any matter
of the sort, that he does not answer`Fol lol der
rol, Jack, with your knighthoods and social order,
and bishoprics and boroughsproperty is in
danger
!loans
and regiments, if thou wilt,give us
more order`ORDERorder'bayonets are
what we want, boy, and good wholesome taxes,
to accustom the nation to contribute to its own
wants, and to maintain its credit. Why, youngster,
if the interest on the debt were to remain unpaid
twenty-four hours, your body corporate, as you
call it, would die a natural death; and what would
then become of your knights-barro-knightsand
barren enough some of them are getting to be, by
their wastefulness and extravagance. Get thee
married, Jack, and settle prudently. There is
neighbor Silverpenny has an only daughter of a
suitable age; and a good hussy is she, in the
bargain
.
The only daughter of Oliver Silverpenny will
be a suitable wife for the only son of Thomas
Goldencalf
;
though I give thee notice, boy, that thou
wilt be cut off with a competency; so keep thy head
clear of extravagant castle-building, learn
economy
in season, and, above all, make no debts.'
Anna laughed as I humorously imitated the
well-known
intonations of Mr. Speaker Sutton, but a
cloud darkened her bright features when I
concluded
.
Yesterday I mentioned the subject to your
father, I resumed, and he thought with me, that
the idea of the borough and the baronetcy was a
good one. `You would be the
second
of your line,
Jack,' he said, `and that is always better than
being the first; for there is no security for a man's
being a good member of society, like that of his
having presented to his eyes the examples of those
who have gone before him, and who have been
distinguished by their services, or their virtues. If
your father would consent to come into parliament,
Vol. I. 6
and sustain government at this critical moment,
his origin would be overlooked, and you would
have pride in looking back on his acts. As it is, I
fear his whole soul is occupied with the unworthy
and debasing passion of mere gain. Money is a
necessary auxiliary to rank, and without rank
there can be no order, and without order no
liberty
;
but when the love of money gets to occupy
the place of respect for descent and past actions,
a community loses the very sentiment on which
all its noble exploits are bottomed.' So, you see,
dear Anna, that our parents hold very different
opinions on a very grave question, and between
natural affection and acquired veneration, I
scarcely
know which to receive. If I could find one,
sweet, and wise, and beautiful as thou, and who
could pity me, I would marry to-morrow, and cast
all the future on the happiness that is to be found
with such a companion.
As usual, Anna heard me in silence. That she
did not, however, view matrimony with exactly
the same eyes as myself, was clearly proved the
very next day, for young Sir Harry Griffin (the
father was dead) offered in form, and was very
decidedly refused.
Although I was always happy at the rectory, I
could not help feeling, rather than seeing, that, as
the French express it, I occupied a false position
in society. Known to be the expectant of great
wealth, it was not easy to be overlooked altogether
in a country whose government is based on a
representation of property, and in which boroughs
are openly in market; and yet they who had
obtained
the accidental advantage of having their
fortunes made by their grandfathers, were
constantly
convincing me that mine, vast as it was
thought to be, was made by my father. Ten
thousand
times did I wish (as it has since been
expressed
by the great captain of the age,) that I had been
my own grandson; for, notwithstanding the
probability
that he who is nearest to the founder of
a fortune, is the most likely to share the largest
in its accumulations, as he who is nearest in
descent
to the progenitor who has illustrated his race,
is the most likely to feel the influence of his
character
,
I was not long in perceiving that in highly
refined and intellectual communities, the public
sentiment, as it is connected with the respect
and influence that are the meed of both,
directly
refutes the inferences of all reasonable
conjectures
on the subject. I was out of my place,
uneasy, ashamed, proud, and resentful;in short,
I occupied a
false position
,and, unluckily, one
from which I saw no plausible retreat, except by
falling back on Lombard Street, or by cutting my
throat. Anna, alone,kind, gentle, serene-eyed
Anna, entered into all my joys, sympathized in my
mortifications, and appeared to view me as I was;
neither dazzled by my wealth, nor repelled by my
origin. The day she refused young Sir Harry
Griffin
,
I could have kneeled at her feet, and called her
blessed!
It is said that no moral disease is ever benefited
by its study. I was a living proof of the truth
of the opinion, that brooding over one's wrongs or
infirmities seldom does much more than aggravate
the evil. I greatly fear it is in the nature of man
to depreciate the advantages he actually enjoys,
and to exaggerate those which are denied him.
Fifty times, during the six months that succeeded
the repulse of the young baronet, did I resolve to
take heart, and to throw myself at the feet of
Anna, and as often was I deterred by the
apprehension
that I had nothing to render me worthy
of one so excellent, and especially of one who was
the granddaughter of the seventh English baronet.
I do not pretend to explain the connexion between
cause and effect, for I am neither physician nor
metaphysician; but the tumult of spirits that
resulted
from so many doubts, hopes, fears,
resolutions
and breakings of resolutions, began to affect
my health, and I was just about to yield to the
advice of my friends (among whom Anna was the
most earnest and the most sorrowful,) to travel,
when an unexpected call to attend the death-bed
of my ancestor was received. I tore myself from
the rectory, and hurried up to town, with the
diligence
and assiduity of an only son and heir,
summoned
on an occasion so solemn.
I found my ancestor still in the possession of his
senses, though given over by the physicians; a
circumstance
that proved a degree of
disinterestedness
and singleness of purpose on their part, that
was scarcely to be expected towards a patient who
it was commonly believed was worth more than a
million. My reception by the servants, and by the
two or three friends who had assembled on this
melancholy occasion, too, was sympathizing, warm,
and of a character to show their solicitude and
forethought.
My reception by the sick man was less marked.
The total abstraction of his faculties in the one
great pursuit of his life; a certain sternness of
purpose
,
which is apt to get the ascendant with those
who are resolute to gain, and which usually
communicates
itself to the manners; and an absence
of those kinder ties that are developed by the
exercise
of the more familiar charities of our
existence
,
had opened a breach between us, that was
not to be filled by the simple unaided fact of
natural
affinity I say of natural affinity, for,
notwithstanding
the doubts that cast their shadows on that
branch of my genealogical tree by which I was
connected with my maternal grandfather, the title
of the King to his crown is not more apparent,
than was my direct lineal descent from my father.
I always believed him to be my ancestor de jure,
as well as de facto, and could fain have loved him
and honoured him as such, had my natural
yearnings
been met with more lively bowels of sympathy
on his side.
Notwithstanding the long and unnatural
estrangement
that had thus existed between the father and
son, the meeting, on the present occasion, however,
was not entirely without some manifestations of
feeling.
Thou art come at last, Jack, said my
ancestor
.
I was affraid, boy, thou might'st be too late.
The difficult breathing, haggard countenance,
and broken utterance of my father, struck me with
awe. This was the first death-bed by which I had
ever stood; and the admonishing picture of time
passing into eternity, was indelibly stamped on my
memory. It was not only a death-bed scene, but
it was a family death-bed scene. I know not how
it was, but I thought my ancestor looked more like
the Goldencalfs than I had ever seen him look
before
.
Thou hast come at last, Jack, he repeated, and
I'm glad of it. Thou art the only being in whom
I have now any concern. It might have been
better
,
perhaps, had I lived more with my kind
but thou wilt be the gainer. Ah! Jack, we are but
miserable mortals, after all!To be called away
so suddenly, and so young!
My ancestor had seen his seventy-fifth birth-day;
but, unhappily, he had not settled all his accounts
with the world, although he had given the
physician
O *
his last fee, and sent the parson away with a
donation to the poor of the parish, that would make
even a beggar merry for a whole life.
Thou art come at last, Jack!Well, my loss
will be thy gain, boy! Send the nurse from the
room.
I did as commanded, and we were left to
ourselves
.
Take this key, handing me one from beneath
his pillow, and open the upper draw of my
secretary
.
Bring me the packet which is addressed to
thyself.
I silently obeyed; when my ancestor, first gazing
at it with a sadness that I cannot well describe
for it was neither worldly, nor quite of an ethereal
character, but a singular and fearful compound
of both,put the papers into my hand,
relinquishing
his hold slowly and with reluctance.
Thou wilt wait till I am out of thy sight, Jack?
A tear burst from out its source, and fell upon
the emaciated hand of my father. He looked at
me wistfully, and I felt a slight pressure that
denoted
affection.
It might have been better, Jack, had we known
more of each other. But Providence made me
fatherless, and I have lived childless by my own
folly. Thy mother was a saint, I believe; but I
fear I learned it too late. Well, a blessing often
comes at the eleventh hour!
As my ancestor now manifested a desire not to
be disturbed, I called the nurse, and quitted the
room, retiring to my own modest chamber, where
the packet, a large bundle of papers sealed and
directed to myself in the handwriting of the dying
man, was carefully secured under a good lock. I
did not meet my father again, but once, under
circumstances
which admitted of intelligible
communion
.
From the time of our first interview he
gradually grew worse, his reason tottered, and,
like the sinful cardinal of Shakspeare, he died
and gave no sign.
Three days after my arrival, however, I was left
alone with him, and he suddenly revived from a
state approaching to stupor. It was the only time,
since the first interview, in which he had seemed
even to know me.
Thou art come at last! he said, in a tone that
was already sepulchralCanst tell me, boy, why
they had golden rods to measure the city?his
nurse had been reading to him a chapter of the
Revelations, which had been selected by himself
Thou seest, lad, the wall itself was of jasper, and
the city was of pure goldI shall not need money
in my new habitationha! it will not be wanted
there!I am not crazed, Jackwould I had loved
gold less and my kind more.The city itself is
of pure gold, and the walls of jasperprecious
abode!ha! Jack, thou hearest, boyI am happy
too happy, Jack!goldgold!
The final words were uttered with a shout.
They were the last that ever came from the lips of
Thomas Goldencalf. The noise brought in the
attendants
,
who found him dead. I ordered the room
to be cleared, as soon as the melancholy truth was
fairly established, and remained several minutes
alone with the body. The countenance was set in
death. The eyes, still open, had that revolting
glare of frenzied delight with which the spirit had
departed, and the whole face presented the dread
picture of a hopeless end. I knelt, and, though a
Protestant, prayed fervently for the soul of the
deceased. I then took my leave of the first and
the last of all my ancestors.
To this scene succeeded the usual period of
outward
sorrow, the interment, and the betrayal of
the expectations of the survivors. I observed that
the house was much frequented by many who
rarely or never had crossed its threshold during
the life of its late owner. There was much
cornering
,
much talking in an under-tone, and looking
at me, that I did not understand, and gradually
the number of regular visiters increased, until it
amounted to about twenty. Among them were
the parson of the parish, the trustees of several
notorious charities, three attorneys, four or five
well-known dealers of the stock-exchange,
foremost
among whom was Sir Joseph Job, and three
of the professionally benevolent, or of those whose
sole occupation appears to be that of quickening
the latent charities of their neighbors.
The day after my ancestor was finally removed
from our sight, the house was more than usually
crowded. The secret conferences increased both
in earnestness and in frequency, and finally I was
summoned to meet these ill-timed guests in the
room which had been the sanctum sanctorum of
the late owner of the dwelling. As I entered
among twenty strange faces, wondering why I,
who had hitherto passed through life so little
heeded, should be so unseasonably importuned, Sir
Joseph Job presented himself as the spokesman
of the party.
We have sent for you, Mr. Goldencalf, the
knight commenced, decently wiping his eyes,
because
we think that respect for our late
much-esteemed
,
most excellent, and very respectable
friend requires that we no longer neglect his final
pleasure, but that we should at once proceed to
open his will, in order that we may take prompt
measures for its execution. It would have been
more regular had we done this before he was
interred
,
for we cannot have foreseen his pleasure
concerning his venerable remains; but it is fully
my determination to have every thing done as he
has ordered, even though we may be compelled to
disinter the body.
I am habitually quiescent, and possibly
credulous
,
but nature has not denied me a proper spirit.
What Sir Joseph Job, or any one but myself,
had to do with the will of my ancestor, did not
strike me at first sight; and I took care to express
as much, in terms it was not easy to
misunderstand
.
The only child, and, indeed, the only known
relative of the deceased, I said, I do not well
see, gentlemen, how this subject should interest,
in this lively manner, so many strangers!
Very spirited and proper, no doubt, sir,
returned
Sir Joseph, smiling; but you ought to
know, young gentleman, that if there are such
things as heirs, there are also such things as
executors
!
This I did know already, and I had also
somewhere
imbibed an opinion that the latter was
commonly
the most lucrative situation.
Have you any reason to suppose, Sir Joseph
Job, that my late father has selected you to fulfil
this trust?
That will be better known in the end, young
gentleman. Your late father is known to have
died rich; very richnot that he has left as much
by half a million as vulgar report will have it
but what I should term comfortably off; and it is
unreasonable to suppose that a man of his great
caution and prudence should suffer his money to
go to the heir-at-law, that heir being a youth only
in his twenty-third year, ignorant of business, not
over-gifted with experience, and having the
propensities
of all of his years in this ill-behaving
and extravagant age, without certain trusts and
provisions, which will leave his hard earnings, for
some time to come, under the care of men who,
like himself, know the full value of money.
No, never!'t is quite impossible't is more
than impossible! exclaimed the by-standers, all
shaking their heads.
And the late Mr. Goldencalf, too, intimate with
most of the substantial names on `Change, and
particularly with Sir Joseph Job! added another.
Sir Joseph Job nodded his head, smiled, stroked
his chin, and stood waiting for my reply.
Property is in danger, Sir Joseph, I said,
ironically; but it matters not. If there is a will,
it is as much my interest to know it as it can
possibly
be yours; and I am quite willing that a search
be made on the spot.
Sir Joseph looked daggers at me; but, being a
man of business, he took me at my word, and,
receiving
the keys I offered, a proper person was
immediately set to work to open the drawers. The
search was continued for four hours without
success
.
Every private drawer was rummaged, every
paper opened, and many a curious glance was cast
at the contents of the latter, in order to get some
clue to the probable amount of the assets of the
deceased. Consternation and uneasiness very
evidently
increased among most of the spectators, as
the fruitless examination proceeded; and when the
notary ended, declaring that no will was to be
found, nor any evidence of credits, every eye was
fastened on me, as if I were suspected of stealing
that which, in the order of nature, was likely to be
my own without the necessity of crime.
There must be a secret repository of papers
somewhere, said Sir Joseph Job, as if he
suspected
more than he wished just then to express
Mr. Goldencalf is largely a creditor on the
public
books, and yet here is not so much as scrip for
a pound!
I left the room, and soon returned, bringing with
me the bundle that had been committed to me by
my father.
Here, gentlemen, I said, is a large packet of
papers that were given to me by the deceased, on
his death-bed, with his own hands. It is, as you
see, sealed with his seal, and especially addressed
to me, in his own hand-writing, and it is not
violent
to suppose that the contents concern me only.
Still, as you take so great an interest in the affairs
of the deceased, it shall now be opened, and those
contents, so far as you can have any right to know
them, shall not be hid from you.
I thought Sir Joseph looked grave when he saw
the packet, and had examined the hand-writing of
the envelope. All, however, expressed their
satisfaction
that the search was now most probably
ended. I broke the seals, and exposed the contents
of the envelope. Within it, there were several smaller
packets, each sealed with the seal of the deceased,
and each addressed to me, in his own hand-writing,
like the external covering. Each of these smaller
packets, too, had a separate endorsement of its
contents
.
Taking them as they lay, I read aloud the
nature of each, before I proceeded to the next.
They were also numbered.
No. 1.I commencedCertificates of
public
stock held by Tho: Goldencalf, June 12th, 1815.
We were now at June 29th, of the same year. As
I laid aside this packet, I observed that the sum
endorsed on its back greatly exceeded a million.
No. 2. Certificates of Bank of England stock.
This sum was several hundred thousands of pounds.
No. 3. South Sea Annuities. Nearly three
hundred
thousand pounds. No. 4. Bonds and
mortgages
.
Four hundred and thirty thousand pounds.
No. 5. The Bond of Sir Joseph Job, for
sixty-three
thousand pounds.
I laid down the paper, and involuntarily
exclaimed
,
Property is in danger! Sir Joseph turned
pale, but he beckoned to me to proceed, saying,
We shall soon come to the will, sir.
No. 6. I hesitated; for it was an
assignment
to myself, which, from its very nature, I
perceived
was an abortive attempt to escape the
payment
of the legacy duty.
Well, sir, No. 6.? inquired Sir Joseph, with
tremulous exultation.
Is an instrument affecting myself, and with
which you have no concern, sir.
We shall see, sirwe shall see, sirif you
refuse
to exhibit the paper, there are laws to compel
you.
To do what, Sir Joseph Job?To exhibit to
my father's debtors, papers that are exclusively
addressed to me, and which can affect me only?
But here is the paper, gentlemen, that you so much
desire to see. `No. 7. The Last Will and
Testament
of Tho: Goldencalf, dated June 17th, 1816.'
(He died June the 24th, of the same year.)
Ah! the precious instrument! exclaimed Sir
Joseph Job, eagerly extending his hand, as if
expecting
to receive the will.
This paper, as you perceive, gentlemen, I said,
holding it up in a manner that all present might see
it, is especially addressed to myself, and it shall
not quit my hands until I learn that some other has
a better right to it.
I confess my heart failed me as I broke the seals,
for I had seen but little of my father, and I knew
that he had been a man of very peculiar opinions,
as well as habits. The will was all in his own
hand-writing
,
and it was very short. Summoning
courage
,
I read it aloud, in the following words:
In the name of God,Amen: I, Tho:
Goldencalf
,
of the parish of Bow, in the city of London,
do publish and declare this instrument to be my
last Will and Testament:
That is to say; I bequeath to my only child and
much beloved son, John Goldencalf, all my real
estate in the parish of Bow, and city of London,
aforesaid, to be held in fee-simple, by him, his heirs,
and assigns, for ever.
I bequeath to my said only child and much
beloved
son, John Goldencalf, all my personal
property
,
of every sort and description whatever, of which
I may die possessed, including bonds and
mortgages
,
public debt, bank stock, notes of hand, goods
and chattels, and all others of my effects, to him,
his heirs, or assigns.
I nominate and appoint my said much beloved
son, John Goldencalf, to be the sole executor of
this my last will and testament, counselling him not
to confide in any of those who may profess to have
been my friends; and particularly to turn a deaf
ear to all the pretensions and solicitations of Sir
Joseph Job, Knight. In witness whereof, &c. &c.
The will was duly executed, and it was
witnessed
by the nurse, his confidential clerk, and the
house-maid.
Property is in danger, Sir Joseph! I dryly
remarked
,
as I gathered together the papers, in order
to secure them.
This will may be set aside, gentlemen! cried
the Knight, in a fury. It contains a libel!
And for whose benefit, Sir Joseph? I quietly
Vol. I. 7
inquired. With or without the will, my title to
my father's assets would seem to be equally valid.
This was so evidently true, that the more
prudent
retired in silence; and even Sir Joseph, after
a short delay, during which he appeared to be
strangely agitated, withdrew. The next week, his
failure was announced, in consequence of some
extravagant risks on 'Change, and eventually I
received
but three shillings and four-pence in the
pound, for my bond of sixty-three thousand.
When the money was paid, I could not help
exclaiming
,
mentally, Property is in danger!
The following morning, Sir Joseph Job balanced
his account with the world, by cutting his throat.
CHAPTER V.
About the social-stake system, the dangers of concentration,
and other moral and immoral curiosities.
The
affairs of my father were almost as easy of
settlement as those of a pauper. In twenty-four
hours I was completely master of them, and found
myself, if not the very richest, certainly one of the
richest subjects of Europe. I say subjects, for
sovereigns frequently have a way of appropriating
the effects of others, that would render a
pretension
to rivalry ridiculous. Debts there were none;
and if there had been, ready money was not
wanting
:
the balance in cash in my favor at the bank
amounted of itself to a fortune.
The reader may now suppose that I was perfectly
happy. Without a solitary claim on either my
time or my estate, I was in the enjoyment of an
income that materially exceeded the revenues of
many reigning princes. I had not an expensive nor
a vicious habit of any sort. Of houses, horses,
hounds, packs, and menials, there were none to vex
or perplex me. In every particular save one, I was
completely my own master. That one was the
near, dear, cherished sentiment that rendered Anna
in my eyes an angel, (and truly she was little
short of it in those of other people,) and made her
the polar star to which every wish pointed. How
gladly would I have paid half a million, just then,
to be the grandson of a baronet, with precedency
from the seventeenth century!
There was, however, another and a present
cause for uneasiness, that gave me even more
concern
than the fact that my family reached the dark
ages with so much embarrassing facility. In
witnessing
the dying agony of my ancestor, I had
got a dread lesson on the vanity, the hopeless
character, the dangers and the delusions of wealth,
that time can never eradicate. The history of its
accumulation was ever present to mar the pleasure
of its possession. I do not mean that I suspected
what, by the world's convention, is deemed
dishonesty
of
that there had been no necessitybut
simply that the heartless and estranged existence,
the waste of energies, the blunted charities, and
the isolated and distrustful habits of my father,
appeared to me to be but poorly requited by the
joyless ownership of his millions. I would have
given largely to be directed in such a way as,
while escaping the wastefulness of the shoals of
Scylla, I might in my own case steer clear of the
miserly rocks of Charybdis.
When I drove from between the smoky lines of
the London houses, into the green fields, and amid
the blossoming hedges, this earth looked beautiful,
and as if it were made to be loved. I saw in it
the workmanship of a divine and a beneficent
Creator, and it was not difficult to persuade
myself
that he who dwelt in the confusion of a town,
in order to transfer gold from the pocket of his
neighbor to his own, had mistaken the objects
of his being. My poor ancestor, who had never
quitted London, stood before me with his dying
regrets; and my first resolution was, to live in
open communion with my kind. So intense,
indeed, did my anxiety to execute this purpose
become, that it might have led even to frenzy, had
not a fortunate circumstance interposed to save
me from so dire a calamity.
The coach in which I had taken passage, (for I
purposely avoided the parade and trouble of a
post-chaise and servants,) passed through a
market
town of known loyalty, on the eve of a
contested
election. This appeal to the intelligence
and patriotism of the constituency, had occurred
in consequence of the late incumbent having taken
office. The new minister, for he was a member
of the cabinet, had just ended his canvass, and he
was about to address his fellow-subjects, from a
window of the tavern in which he lodged.
Fatigued
,
but ready to seek mental relief by any
means, I threw myself from the coach, secured a
room, and made one of the multitude.
The favorite candidate occupied a large
balcony
,
surrounded by his principal friends, among
whom it was delightful to see Earls, Lords John,
Baronets, dignitaries of the church, tradesmen of
influence in the borough, and even a mechanic or
two, all squeezed together in the agreeable
amalgamation
of political affinity. `Here then,' thought
I, `is an example of the heavenly charities! The
candidate, himself the son and heir of a peer, feels
that he is truly of the same flesh and blood as his
constituents;how amiably he smiles!how bland
are his manners!and with what cordiality does
he shake hands with the greasiest and the worst!
There must be a corrective to human pride, a
stimulus to the charities, a never-ending lesson of
benevolence in this part of our excellent system,
and I will look farther into it.'The candidate
appeared, and his harangue commenced.
Memory would fail me, were I to attempt
recording
the precise language of the orator, but his
opinions and precepts are so deeply graven on my
recollection, that I do not fear misrepresenting
them. He commenced with a very proper and an
eloquent eulogium on the constitution, which he
fearlessly pronounced to be, in its way, the very
perfection of human reason; in proof of which
he adduced the well-ascertained fact, that it had
always been known, throughout the vicissitudes and
trials of so many centuries, to accommodate itself
to circumstances, abhorring change. Yes, my
friends, he exclaimed, in a burst of patriotic and
constitutional fervorwhether under the roses,
or the liliesthe Tudors, the Stuarts, or the
illustrious
house of Brunswick, this glorious structure
has resisted the storms of faction, has been able to
receive under its sheltering roof the most opposite
elements of domestic strife, affording protection,
warmth, ay, and food and raiment(here the
orator
happily laid his hand on the shoulder of a
butcher, who wore a frieze over-coat that made
him look not unlike a stall-fed beast)yes, food
and raiment, victuals and drink, to the meanest
subject in the realm. Nor is this all; it is a
constitution
peculiarly English: and who is there so
base, so vile, so untrue to himself, to his fathers,
to his descendants, as to turn his back on a
constitution
that is thoroughly and inherently
English
a
7*
constitution that he has inherited from his
ancestors, and which, by every obligation, both
human and divine, he is bound to transmit
unchanged
to posterity;here the orator, who
continued
to speak, however, was deafened by shouts
of applause, and that part of the subject might
very fairly be considered as definitively settled.
From the constitution as a whole, the candidate
next proceeded to extol the particular feature of
it, that was known as the borough of Householder.
According to his account of this portion of the
government, its dwellers were animated by the
noblest spirit of independence, the most rooted
determination
to uphold the ministry, of which he
was the least worthy member, and were
distinguished
by what, in an ecstasy of political
eloquence
,
he happily termed the most freeborn
understanding of its rights and privileges. This
loyal and judicious borough had never been known
to waste its favors on those who had not a stake
in the community. It understood that fundamental
principle of good government, which lays down
the axiom, that none were to be trusted but those
who had a visible and an extended interest in the
country; for without these pledges of honesty and
independence, what had the elector to expect but
bribery and corruptiona traffic in his dearest
rights, and a bargaining that might destroy the
glorious institutions under which he dwelt. This
part of the harangue was listened to in respectful
silence, and shortly after the orator concluded;
when the electors dispersed with, no doubt, a
better
opinion of themselves and the constitution,
than it had probably been their good fortune to
entertain since the previous election.
Accident placed me, at dinner, (the house being
crowded,) at the same table with an attorney who
had been very active the whole morning, among
the householders, and who, I soon learned from
himself, was the especial agent of the owner of
the independent borough in question. He told me
that he had come down with the expectation of
disposing of the whole property to Lord Pledge,
the ministerial candidate named; but the means
had not been forthcoming, as he had been led to
hope, and the bargain was unluckily off, at the
very moment when it was of the utmost
importance
to know to whom the independent electors
rightfully belonged.
His Lordship, however, continued the
attorney
,
winking, has done what is handsome; and
there can be no more doubt of his election, than
there would be of yours, did you happen to own
the borough.
And is the property now open for sale? I
asked.
Certainlymy principal can hold out no
longer
.
The price is settled, and I have his power of
attorney to make the preliminary bargain. 'Tis
a thousand pities that the public mind should be
left in this undecided state on the eve of an
election
.
Then, sir, I will be the purchaser.
My companion looked at me with astonishment
and doubt. He had transacted too much business
of this nature, however, not to feel his way
before
he was either off or on.
The price of the estate is three hundred and
twenty-five thousand pounds, sir, and the rental
is only six!
Be it so. My name is Goldencalf: by
accompanying
me to town, you shall receive the money.
Goldencalf!What, sir, the only son and heir
of the late Thomas Goldencalf, of Cheapside?
The same. My father has not been dead a
month.
Pardon me, sirconvince me of your identity
we must be particular in matters of this sort
and you shall have possession of the property in
season to secure your own election, or that of any
of your friends. I will return Lord Pledge his
small advances, and another time he will know
better than to fail of keeping his promises. What
is a borough good for, if a nobleman's word is not
sacred? You will find the electors, in particular,
every way worthy of your favor. They are as
frank, loyal, and straight-forward a constituency,
as any in England. No skulking behind the ballot
for them!and, in all respects, they are fearless
Englishmen, who will do what they say, and say
whatever their landlord shall please to require of
them.
As I had sundry letters and other documents
about me, nothing was easier than to convince the
attorney of my identity. He called for pen and
ink; drew out of his pocket the contract that had
been prepared for Lord Pledge; gave it to me to
read; filled the blanks; and affixing his name,
called
the waiters as witnesses, and presented me the
paper with a promptitude and respect that I found
really delightful. So much, thought I, for having
given pledges to society by the purchase of a
borough
.
I drew on my bankers for three hundred
and twenty-five thousand pounds, and arose from
table, virtually, the owner of the estate of
Householder
,
and of the political consciences of its
tenantry
.
A fact so important could not long be unknown;
and in a few minutes all eyes in the coffee-room
were upon me. The landlord presented himself,
and begged I would do him the honor to take
possession
of his family parlour, there being no other
at his disposal. I was hardly installed, before a
servant in a handsome livery presented the
following
note:
Dear Mr.
Goldencalf
,
I have this moment heard of your being in town, and
am exceedingly rejoiced to learn it. A long intimacy with
your late excellent and most loyal father, justifies my
claiming
you for a friend, and I waive all ceremony, (official, of
course, is meant, there being no reason for any other
between
us,) and beg to be admitted for half an hour.
Dear Mr. Goldencalf,
Your's, very faithfully and sincerely,
Pledge
.
Goldencalf
, Esquire.
Monday evening.
I begged that the noble visiter might not be made
to wait a moment. Lord Pledge met me like an
old and an intimate friend. He made a hundred
handsome inquiries after my dead ancestor; spoke
feelingly of his regret at not having been
summoned
to attend his death-bed; and then very
ingenuously
and warmly congratulated me on my
succession
to so large a property.
I hear, too, you have bought this borough, my
dear sir.I could not make it convenient, just at
this particular moment, to conclude my own
arrangement
,but
it is a good thing. Three
hundred
and twenty thousand, I suppose, as was
mentioned
between me and the other party?
Three hundred and twenty-
five
thousand, Lord
Pledge.
I perceived by the countenance of the noble
candidate
,
that I had paid the odd five thousand as a
fine,a circumstance which accounted for the
promptitude of the attorney in the transaction, he
most probably pocketing the difference himself.
You mean to sit, of course?
I do, my Lord, as one of the members, at the
next general election; but at present, I shall be
most happy to aid your return.
My dear Mr. Goldencalf
Really, without presuming to compliment, Lord
Pledge, the noble sentiments I heard you express
this morning, were so very proper, so exceedingly
statesmanlike, so truly English, that I shall feel
infinitely
more satisfaction in knowing that you fill
the vacant seat, than if it were in my own
possession
.
I honor your public spirit, Mr. Goldencalf, and
only wish to God, there was more of it in the world.
But you can count on our friendship, sir. What
you have just remarked, is truevery trueonly
too truetrue to a haira-a-a I mean, my dear
Mr. Goldencalf, most especially those sentiments
of mine whicha-a-aI say it, before God,
without
vanitybut which, as you have so very ably
intimated, are so truly proper and English.
I sincerely think so, Lord Pledge, or I should
not have said it. I am peculiarly situated, myself.
With an immense fortune, without rank, name, or
connexions, nothing is easier than for one of my
years to be led astray; and it is my ardent desire
to hit upon some expedient that may connect me
properly with society.
Marry, my dear young friendselect a wife
from among the fair and virtuous of this happy
isleunluckily I can propose nothing in this way
myselffor both my own sisters are disposed of.
I have made my choice, already, I thank you
a thousand times, my dear Lord Pledge; although
I scarcely dare execute my own wishes. There
are objections,if I were only the child, now, of a
baronet's second son, or
Become a baronet yourself, once more
interrupted
my noble friend, with an evident relief from
suspense; for I verily believe he thought I was
about to ask for something better. Your affair
shall be arranged by the end of the weekand if
there is any thing else I can do for you, I beg you
to name it without reserve.
If I could hear a few more of those
remarkable
sentiments of yours, concerning the stake we
should all have in society, I think it would relieve
my mind.
My companion looked at me a moment, with a
very awkward sort of intensity, drew his hand
across his brows, reflected, and then obligingly
complied.
You attach too much importance, Mr.
Goldencalf
,
to a few certainly very just, but very
ill-arranged
ideas. That a man, without a proper stake
in society, is little better than the beast of the fields,
I hold to be so obvious, that it is unnecessary to
dwell on the point. Reason as you will, forward
or backward, you arrive at the same result,he
that hath nothing, is usually treated by mankind
little better than a dog, and he that is little better
than a dog, usually has nothing.Again,What
distinguishes the savage from the civilized man?
why, civilization, to be sure.Now, what is
civilization
?the
arts of life.What feeds, nourishes,
sustains the arts of life?money, or property. By
consequence, civilization is property, and property
is civilization. If the control of a country is in the
hands of those who possess the property, the
government
is a civilized government; but, on the
other hand, if it is in the hands of those who have
no property, the government is necessarily an
uncivilized
government. It is quite impossible that
any one should become a safe statesman, who does
not possess a direct property interest in society.
You know there is not a tyro of our political sect
who does not fully admit the truth of this axiom.
Mr. Pitt?
Why, Pitt was certainly an exception, in one
way; but then, you will recollect, he was the
immediate
representative of the tories, who own most
of the property of England.
Mr. Fox?
Fox represented the whigs, who own all the
rest, you know. No, my dear Goldencalf, reason
as you will, we shall always arrive at the same
results.You will, of course, as you have just said,
take one of the seats yourself, at the next general
election?
I shall be too proud of being your colleague, to
hesitate.
This speech sealed our friendship; for it was a
pledge to my noble acquaintance of his future
connexion
with the borough. He was much too
highbred
to express his thanks in vulgar phrases, (though
high-breeding rarely exhibits all its finer qualities
pending an election,) but, a man of the world, and
one of a class whose main business it is to put the
suaviter in modo
, as the French have it,
en evidence
,
the reader may be sure that when we parted that
night, I was in perfect good humor with myself,
and, as a matter of course, with my new
acquaintance
.
The next day the canvass was renewed, and we
had another convincing speech on the subject of
the virtue of a stake in society; for Lord Pledge
was tactician enough to attack the citadel, once
assured of its weak point, rather than expend his
efforts on the out-works of the place. That night
the attorney arrived from town with the title-deeds,
all properly executed, (they had been some time
in preparation for Lord Pledge,) and the following
morning early, the tenants were served with the
usual notices, with a handsomely expressed
sentiment
,
on my part, in favor of a stake in society.
About noon, Lord Pledge walked over the course,
as it is expressed at New-Market and Doncaster.
After dinner we separated, my noble friend
returning
to town, while I pursued my way to the
Rectory
.
Anna never appeared more fresh, more serene,
more elevated above mortality, than when we met,
a week after I had quitted Householder, in the
breakfast-parlor of her father's abode.
You are beginning to look like yourself again,
Jack, she said, extending her hand, with the
simple
cordiality of an Englishwoman; and I hope
we shall find you more rational.
Ah, Anna, if I could only presume to throw
myself at your feet, and to tell you how much and
what I feel, I should be the happiest fellow in all
England.
As it is, you are the most miserable! the
laughing girl answered, as, crimsoned to the
temples
,
she drew away the hand I was foolishly
pressing against my heart. Let us go to
breakfast
,
Mr. Goldencalfmy father has ridden across
the country to visit Dr. Liturgy.
Anna, I said, after seating myself, and taking
a cup of tea from fingers that were rosy as the
morn, I fear you are the greatest enemy that I
have on earth.
John Goldencalf! exclaimed the startled girl,
turning pale, and then flushing violently. Pray,
explain yourself.
I love you to my heart's corecould marry
Vol. I. 8
you, and then, I fear, worship you, as man never
before worshipped woman.
Anna laughed faintly.
And you feel in danger of the sin of idolatry?
she at length succeeded in saying.
No, I am in danger of narrowing my
sympathies
of
losing a broad and safe hold of lifeof
losing my proper stake in societyofin short,
of becoming as useless to my fellows as my poor,
poor father, and of making an end as miserable!
Oh! Anna, could you have witnessed the
hopelessness
of that death-bed, you could never wish me
a fate like his!
My pen is unequal to convey an adequate idea
of the expression with which Anna regarded me.
Wonder, doubt, apprehension, affection, and
anguish
,
were all beaming in her eyes; but the
unnatural brightness of these conflicting
sentiments
was tempered by a softness that resembled
the pearly lustre of an Italian sky.
If I yield to my fondness, Anna, in what will
my condition differ from that of my miserable
father's? He concentrated his feelings in the love
of money, and Iyes, I feel it here, I know it is
hereI should love you so intensely, as to shut out
every generous sentiment in favor of others. I
have a fearful responsibility on my shoulders,
wealthgold;gold, beyond limits; and to save
my very soul, I must extend, not narrow, my interest
in my fellow-creatures. Were there a hundred
such Annas, I might press you all to my heart,
but, one! nono't would be misery't would be
perdition! The very excess of such a passion
would render me a heartless miser, unworthy of
the confidence of my fellow-men!
The radiant and yet serene eyes of Anna seemed
to read my soul; and when I had done speaking,
she arose, stole timidly to my side of the table, as
woman approaches when she feels most, placed
her velvet-like hand on my burning forehead,
pressed its throbbing pulses gently to her heart,
burst into tears, and fled.
We dined alone, nor did we meet again until
the dinner hour. The manner of Anna was
soothing
,
gentle, even affectionate; but she carefully
avoided the subject of the morning. As for myself,
I was constantly brooding over the danger of
concentrating
interests, and of the excellence of the
social-stake system.
Your spirits will be better, Jack, in a day or
two, said Anna, when we had taken wine after
the soup. Country air, and old friends, will
restore
your freshness and color.
If there were a thousand Annas, I could be
happy, as man was never happy, before! But I
must not, dare not, lessen my hold on society.
All of which proves my insufficiency to render
you happy. But here comes Francis, with
yesterday
morning's paperlet us see what society is
about, in London.
After a few moments of intense occupation with
the journal, an exclamation of pleasure and
surprise
escaped the sweet girl. On raising my eyes,
I saw her gazing (as I fancied) fondly at myself.
Read what you have, that seems to give you
so much pleasure.
She complied, reading with an eager and
tremulous
voice the following paragraph:
His Majesty has been most graciously pleased
to raise John Goldencalf, of Householder Hall, in
the county of Dorset, and of Cheapside, Esquire,
to the dignity of a Baronet of the United
Kingdoms
of Great Britain and Ireland.
Sir John Goldencalf, I have the honor to drink
to your health and happiness! cried the delighted
girl, brightening like the dawn, and wetting her
pouting lip with liquor less ruby than itself. Here,
Francis, fill a bumper, and drink to the new
baronet.
The gray-headed butler did as ordered, with a
very good grace, and then hurried into the
servants'
hall, to communicate the news.
Here at least, Jack, is a new hold that society
has on you, whatever hold you may have on
society.
I was pleased, because she was pleased, and
because it showed that Lord Pledge had some
sense of gratitude, (although he afterwards took
occasion to intimate that I owed the favor chiefly
to
hope
,) and I believe my eyes never expressed
more fondness.
Lady Goldencalf would not have an awkward
sound, after all, dearest Anna.
As applied to one, Sir John, it might possibly
do; but not as applied to a hundred. Anna
laughed, blushed, burst into tears once more, and
again fled.
What right have I to trifle with the feelings
of this single-hearted and excellent girl, said I to
myself; it is evident that the subject distresses
hershe is unequal to its discussion, and it is
unmanly and improper in me to treat it in this
manner. I must be true to my character as a
gentleman and a manay, and, under present
circumstances, as a baronet; andI will never
speak of it again as long as I live.
The following day I took leave of Dr.
Etherington
and his daughter, with the avowed intention
of travelling for a year or two. The good rector
gave me much friendly advice, flattered me with
expressions of confidence in my discretion, and,
squeezing me warmly by the hand, begged me to
recollect that I had always a home at the rectory.
When I had made my adieus to the father, I went,
with a sorrowful heart, in quest of the daughter.
She was still in the little breakfast parlorthat
parlor so loved! I found her pale, timid, sensitive,
bland, but serene. Little could ever disturb that
heavenly quality in the dear girl; if she laughed, it
was with a restrained and moderated joy; if she
wept, it was like rain falling from a sky that still
shone with the lustre of the sun. It was only
when feeling and nature were unutterably big
within her, that some irresistible impulse of her
sex betrayed her into emotions like those I had
twice witnessed so lately.
You are about to leave us, Jack, she said,
holding out her hand kindly, and without the
affectation
of an indifference she did not feelyou
will see many strange faces, but you will see none
who
I waited for the completion of the sentence, but,
although she struggled hard for self-possession, it
was never finished.
At my age, Anna, and with my means, it
would be unbecoming to remain at home, when,
if I may so express it, `human nature is abroad.'
I go to quicken my sympathies, to open my heart
to my kind, and to avoid the cruel regrets that
tortured the death-bed of my father.
Wellwellinterrupted the sobbing girl,
we will talk of it no more. It is best that you
should travel; and so adieu, with a thousandnay,
millions of good wishes for your happiness and
safe return.You will come back to us, Jack,
when tired of other scenes?
8*
This was said with gentle earnestness, and a
sincerity so winning, that it came near upsetting
all my philosophy; but I could not marry the
whole sex, and to bind down my affections in one,
would have been giving the death-blow to the
development
of that sublime principle on which I was
bent, and which I had already decided was to
make me worthy of my fortune, and the ornament
of my species. Had I been offered a kingdom,
however, I could not speak. I took the unresisting
girl in my arms, folded her to my heart, pressed a
burning kiss on her cheek, and withdrew.
You will come back to us, Jack? she half
whispered, as her hand was reluctantly drawn
through my own.
Oh! Anna, it was indeed painful to abandon thy
frank and gentle confidence, thy radiant beauty,
thy serene affections, and all thy womanly virtues,
in order to practise my newly discovered theory!
Long did thy presence haunt menay, never did
it entirely desert meputting my constancy to a
severe proof, and threatening, at each remove, to
contract the lengthening chain that still bound me
to thee, thy fire-side, and thy altars! But I
triumphed
,
and went abroad upon the earth, with a
heart expanding towards all the creatures of God,
though thy image was still enshrined in its inmost
core, shining in womanly glory, pure, radiant, and
without spot, like the floating prism that forms
the lustre of the diamond.
CHAPTER VI.
A theory of palpable sublimitysome practical ideas, and
the commencement of adventures.
The
recollection of the intense feelings of that
important period of my life has, in some measure,
disturbed the connexion of the narrative, and may
possibly have left some little obscurity, in the mind
of the reader, on the subject of the new sources
of happiness that had broken on my own
intelligence
.
A word here, in the way of elucidation,
therefore, may not be misapplied, although it is my
purpose to refer more to my acts, and to the
wonderful
incidents it will shortly be my duty to lay
before the world, for a just understanding of my
views, than to mere verbal explanations.
Happinesshappiness, here and hereafter, was
my goal. I aimed at a life of useful and active
benevolence, a death-bed of hope and joy, and an
eternity of fruition. With such an object before
me, my thoughts, from the moment that I
witnessed
the dying regrets of my father, had been
intensely brooding over the means of attainment.
Surprising as, no doubt, it will appear to vulgar
minds, I obtained the clue to this sublime mystery,
at the late election for the borough of Householder,
and from the lips of my Lord Pledge. Like other
important discoveries, it is very simple when
understood, being easily rendered intelligible to
the dullest capacities, as, indeed, in equity, ought
to be the case with every principle that is so
intimately
connected with the well-being of man.
It is an universally admitted truth, that happiness
is the only legitimate object of all human
associations
.
The ruled concede a certain portion of
their natural rights for the benefits of peace,
security
and order, with the understanding that they
are to enjoy the remainder as their own proper
indefeasible estate. It is true, that there exist, in
different nations, some material differences of
opinion on the subject of the quantities to be
bestowed
and retained; but these aberrations from a
just medium are no more than so many caprices
of the human judgment, and in no manner do
they affect the principle. I found also, that all the
wisest and best of the species, or, what is much
the same thing, the most responsible, uniformly
maintain that he who has the largest stake in
society
,
is, in the nature of things, the most qualified
to administer its affairs. By a stake in society is
meant, agreeably to universal convention, a
multiplication
of those interests which occupy us in our
daily concernsor what is vulgarly called,
property
.
This principle works by exciting us to do
right, through those heavy investments of our own
which would inevitably suffer were we to do wrong.
The proposition is now clear, nor can the premises
readily be mistaken. Happiness is the aim of
society; and property, or a vested interest in that
society, is the best pledge of our
disinterestedness
and justice, and the best qualification for its
proper control. It follows as a legitimate
corollary
,
that a multiplication of those interests will
increase the stake, and render us more and more
worthy of the trust, by elevating us, as near as
may be, to the pure and ethereal condition of the
angels. One of those happy accidents which
sometimes make men emperors and kings, had
made me, perhaps, the richest subject of Europe.
With this polar star of theory shining before my
eyes, and with practical means so ample, it would
have been clearly my own fault, had I not steered
my bark into the right haven. If he who had the
heaviest investments was the most likely to love his
fellows, there could be no great difficulty for one in
my situation to take the lead in philanthropy. It is
true that, with superficial observers, the instance
of my own immediate ancestor might be supposed
to form an exception, or rather an objection, to
the theory. So far from this being the case,
however
,
it proves the very reverse. My father, in a
great measure, had concentrated all his
investments
in the national debt. Now, beyond all cavil,
he loved the funds intensely; grew violent when
they were assailed; cried out for bayonets when
the mass declaimed against taxation; eulogized the
gallows, when there were menaces of revolt, and,
in a hundred other ways, proved that where the
treasure is, there will the heart be also. The
instance of my father, therefore, like all
exceptions
,
only went to prove the excellence of the
rule. He had merely fallen into the error of
contraction
,
when the only safe course was that of
expansion. I resolved to expand; to do that
which, probably, no political economist had ever
yet thought of doingin short, to carry out the
principle of the social stake in such a way, as
should cause me to love all things, and
consequently
to become worthy of being intrusted with
the care of all things.
On reaching town, my earliest visit was one of
thanks to my Lord Pledge. At first, I had felt
some doubts whether the baronetcy would, or
would not, aid the system of philanthropy; for, by
raising me above a large portion of my kind, it
was, in so much at least, a removal from
philanthropical
sympathies; but, by the time the patent
was received, and the fees were paid, I found that
it might fairly be considered a pecuniary
investment
,
and that it was consequently brought within
the rule I had prescribed for my own government.
The next thing was to employ suitable agents
to aid in making the purchases that were
necessary
to attach me to mankind. A month was
diligently occupied in this way. As ready money
was not wanting, and I was not very particular
on the subject of prices, at the end of that time, I
began to have certain incipient sentiments which
went to prove the triumphant success of the
experiment
.
In other words, I owned much, and was
beginning to take a lively interest in all I owned.
I made purchases of estates in England,
Scotland
,
Ireland and Wales. This division of real
property was meant to equalize my sentiments
justly, between the different portions of my native
country. Not satisfied with this, however, I
extended
the system to the colonies. I had East
India shares, a running ship, Canada land, a
plantation
in Jamaica, sheep at the Cape and at New
South Wales, an indigo concern at Bengal, an
establishment for the collection of antiques in the
Ionian Isles, and a connexion with a shipping house,
for the general supply of our various dependencies
with beer, bacon, cheese, broadcloths and
ironmongery
.
From the British Empire, my interests
were soon extended into other countries. On the
Garonne, and at Xeres, I bought vineyards. In
Germany I took some shares in different salt and
coal-mines; the same in South America, in the
precious metals; in Russia, I dipped deeply into
tallow; in Switzerland, I set up an extensive
manufactury
of watches, and bought all the horses
for a voiturier on a large scale. I had silk-worms
in Lombardy, olives and hats in Tuscany, a bath
in Lucca, and a maccaroni establishment at
Naples
.
To Sicily I sent funds for the purchase of
wheat, and at Rome I kept a connoisseur to
conduct
a general agency in the supply of British
articles; such as mustard, porter, pickles, and
corned beef; as well as for the forwarding of
pictures
and statues to the lovers of the arts and of
virt
.
By the time all this was effected, I found my
hands full of business. Method, suitable agents,
and a resolution to succeed, smoothed the way,
however, and I began to look about me and to take
breath. By way of relaxation, I now descended
into details; and, for a few days, I frequented the
meetings of those who are called the Saints,
in order to see if something might not be done
towards
the attainment of my object, through their
instrumentality. I cannot say that this experiment
met with all the success I had anticipated. I heard
a great deal of subtle discussion, found that manner
was of more account than matter, and had
unreasonable
and ceaseless appeals to my pocket. So
near a view of charity had a tendency to expose
its blemishes, as the brilliancy of the sun is known
to exhibit defects on the face of beauty, which escape
the eye when seen through the medium of that
artificial
light for which they are best adapted; and I
soon contented myself with sending my contributions,
at proper intervals, keeping aloof in person. This
experiment gave me occasion to perceive, that
human virtues, like little candles, shine best in the
dark, and that their radiance is chiefly owing to
the atmosphere of a naughty world. From
speculating I returned to facts.
The question of slavery had agitated the
benevolent
for some years, and finding a singular apathy
in my own bosom on this important subject, I
bought five hundred of each sex, to stimulate my
sympathies. This led me nearer to the United
States of America, a country that I had
endeavored
to blot out of my recollection; for, while thus
encouraging a love for the species, I had scarcely
thought it necessary to go so far from home. As no
rule exists without an exception, I confess I was a
good deal disposed to believe that a Yankee might
very fairly be an omission in an Englishman's
philanthropy
.
But, in for a penny, in for a pound.
The negroes led me to the banks of the Mississippi,
where I was soon the owner of both a sugar and
a cotton-plantation. In addition to these purchases,
I took shares in divers South-Sea-men, owned a
coral and pearl-fishery of my own, and sent an agent
with a proposition to King Tamamamaah to create
a monopoly of sandal-wood, in our joint behalf.
The earth and all it contained assumed new
glories
in my eyes. I had fulfilled the essential
condition
of the political economists, the jurists, the
constitution-mongers
,
and all the talents and decency,
and had stakes in half the societies of the world. I
was fit to govern, I was fit to advise, to dictate to
most of the people of Christendom; for I had taken
a direct interest in their welfares, by making them
my own. Twenty times was I about to jump into
a post-chaise, and to gallop down to the rectory, in
order to lay my new-born alliance with the species,
and all its attendant felicity, at the feet of Anna,
but the terrible thought of monogamy, and of its
sympathy-withering consequences, as often stayed
my course. I wrote to her, weekly, however,
making her the participator of a portion of my
happiness, though I never had the satisfaction of
receiving a single line in reply.
Fairly emancipated from selfishness, and pledged
to the species, I now quitted England on a tour of
philanthropical inspection. I shall not weary the
reader with an account of my journeys over the
beaten tracks of the continent, but transport him
and myself at once to Paris, in which city I arrived
on the 17th of May, Anno Domini 1819. I had
seen much, fancied myself improved, and, by
constant
dwelling on my system, saw its excellencies
as plainly as Napoleon saw the celebrated star
which defied the duller vision of his uncle, the
Cardinal. At the same time, as usually happens
with those who direct all their energies to a given
point, the opinions originally formed of certain
portions
of my theory, began to undergo mutations, as
nearer and more practical views pointed out
inconsistencies
and exposed defects. As regards Anna,
in particular, the quiet, gentle, unobtrusive, and yet
distinct picture of womanly loveliness, that was
rarely absent from my mind, had, for the past
twelve-month, haunted me with a constancy of
argument
that might have unsettled the Newtonian
scheme of philosophy itself. I already more than
questioned whether the benefit to be derived from
the support of one so affectionate and true, would
not fully counterbalance the disadvantage of a
concentration
of interest, so far as the sex was
concerned
.
This growing opinion was fast getting to
be conviction, when I encountered on the
boulevards
,
one day, an old country neighbor of the
rector's
,
who gave me the best account of the family,
adding, after descanting on the beauty and
excellence
of Anna herself, that the dear girl had, quite
lately, actually refused a peer of the realm, who
enjoyed all the acknowledged advantages of youth,
riches, birth, rank and a good name, and who had
selected her, from a deep conviction of her worth,
and of her ability to make any sensible man happy.
As to my own power over the heart of Anna, I
never entertained a doubt. She had betrayed it in
a thousand ways, and on a hundred occasions; nor
had I been at all backward in letting her
understand
how highly I valued her dear self, although
I had never yet screwed up my resolution so high,
Vol. I. 9
as distinctly to propose for her hand. But all my
unsettled purposes became concentrated on hearing
this welcome intelligence; and, taking an abrupt
leave of my old acquaintance, I hurried home and
wrote the following letter:
Dearvery dear, naydearest
Anna
:
I met your old neighbor , this morning, on the
boulevards, and during an interview of an hour we did little
else but talk of thee. Although it has been my most ardent
and most predominant wish to open my heart to the whole
species, yet, Anna, I fear I have loved thee alone! Absence,
so far from expanding, appears to contract my affections, too
many of which centre in thy sweet form and excellent
virtues
.
The remedy I proposed is insufficient, and I begin to
think that matrimony alone can leave me master of sufficient
freedom of thought and action, to turn the attention I ought
to the rest of the human race. Thou hast been with me in
idea, in the four corners of the earth, by sea and by land,
in dangers and in safety, in all seasons, regions and
situations
,
and there is no sufficient reason why those who are
ever present in the spirit, should be materially separated.
Thou hast only to say a word, to whisper a hope, to breathe
a wish, and I will throw myself, a repentant truant, at thy
feet, and implore thy pity. When united, however, we will
not lose ourselves in the sordid and narrow paths of
selfishness
,
but come forth again, in company, to acquire a new
and still more powerful hold on this beautiful creation, of
which, by this act, I acknowledge thee to be the most divine
portion.
Dearest, dearest Anna, thine and the species',
For ever,
John Goldencalf
.
To Miss
Etherington
.
If there was ever a happy fellow on earth, it was
myself, when this letter was written, sealed, and
fairly dispatched. The die was cast; and I walked
into the air, a regenerated and an elastic being. Let
what might happen, I was sure of Anna. Her
gentleness
would calm my irritability; her prudence
temper my energies; her bland but enduring
affections
soothe my soul. I felt at peace with all around
me, myself included, and I found a sweet assurance
of the wisdom of the step I had just taken in the
expanding sentiment. If such were my sensations
now that every thought centered in Anna, what
would they not become when these personal
transports
were cooled by habit, and nature was left to
the action of the ordinary impulses! I began to
doubt of the infallibility of that part of my system
which had given me so much pain, and to incline to
the new doctrine, that by concentration on
particular
parts, we come most to love the whole. On
examination, there was reason to question whether
it was not on this principle even, that, as an
especial
landholder, I attained so great an interest in
my native island; for, while I did not certainly own
the whole of Great Britain, I felt that I had a
profound
respect for every thing in it, that was in any,
even the most remote manner, connected with my
own particular possessions.
A week flew by in delightful anticipations. The
happiness of this short but heavenly period became
so exciting, so exquisite, that I was on the point of
giving birth to an improvement on my theory, (or
rather on the theory of the political economists and
constitution-mongers, for it is in fact theirs, and
not mine,) when the answer of Anna was received.
If anticipation be a state of so much happiness,
happiness being the great pursuit of man,why not
invent a purely probationary condition of society?
why not change its elementary features from
positive to anticipating interests, which would give
more zest to life, and bestow felicity unimpaired
by the dross of realities? I had determined to carry
out this principle in practice, by an experiment, and
left the hotel to order an agent to advertise, and to
enter into a treaty or two, for some new
investments
,
(without the smallest intention of bringing
them to a conclusion,) when the porter delivered
me the ardently expected letter. I never knew
what would be the effect of taking a stake in
society
by anticipation, therefore; the contents of
Anna's missive driving every subject that was not
immediately connected with the dear writer, and
with sad realities, completely out of my head. It
is not improbable, however, that the new theory
would have proved to be faulty, for I have often had
occasion to remark that heirs (in remainder, for
instance,) manifest a hostility to the estate, by
carrying
out the principle of anticipation, rather than
any of that prudent respect for social consequences,
to which the legislator looks with so much anxiety.
The letter of Anna was in the following words:
Goodnay, Dear
John
,
Thy letter was put into my hands yesterday. This is
the fifth answer I have commenced, and you will therefore
see that I do not write without reflection. I know thy
excellent
heart, John, better than it is known to thyself. It has
either led thee to the discovery of a secret of the last
importance
to thy fellow-creatures, or it has led thee cruelly
astray. An experiment so noble and so praiseworthy, ought
not to be abandoned, on account of a few momentary
misgivings
concerning the result. Do not stay thy eagle flight,
at the instant thou art soaring so near the sun! Should
we both judge it for our mutual happiness, I can become thy
wife at a future day. We are still young, and there is no
urgency for an immediate union. In the mean time, I will
endeavor to prepare myself to be the companion of a
philanthropist
,
by practising on thy theory, and, by expanding my
own affections, render myself worthy to be the wife of one
who has so large a stake in society, and who loves so many
and so truly.
Thine imitator and friend,
Without change,
Anna Etherington
.
To Sir
John Goldencalf
, Bart.
P. S. You may perceive that I am in a state of
improvement
,
for I have just refused the hand of Lord M'Dee, because
I found I loved all his neighbors, quite as well as I loved the
young peer himself.
Ten thousand furies took possession of my soul,
in the shape of so many demons of jealousy. Anna
expanding her affections!Anna taking any other
stake in society than that I made sure she would
accept through me!Anna teaching herself to
love more than one, and that one myself!The
thought was madness. I did not believe in the
sincerity of her refusal of Lord M'Dee. I ran for
a copy of the Peerage, (for since my own
elevation
in life, I regularly bought both that work and
the Baronetage,) and turned to the page that
contained
his name. He was a Scottish Viscount,
who had just been created a Baron of the United
Kingdom, and his age was precisely that of my
own. Here was a rival to excite distrust! By a
singular contradiction in sentiments, the more I
dreaded his power to injure me, the more I
undervalued
his means. While I fancied Anna was
merely playing with me, and had in secret made
up her mind to be a peeress, I had no doubt that
the subject of her choice was both ill-favored and
awkward, and had cheek-bones like a Tartar.
While reading of the great antiquity of his family,
(which reached obscurity in the thirteenth century,)
9*
I set it down as established, that the first of his
unknown predecessors was a bare-legged thief;
and, at the very moment that I imagined Anna
was smiling on him, and retracting her coquettish
denial, I could have sworn that he spoke with an
unintelligible border accent, and that he had red
hair!
The torment of such pictures grew to be
intolerable
,
and I rushed into the open air for relief.
How long, or whither I wandered, I know not;
but on the morning of the following day I found
I was seated in a
guinguette
, near the base of
Montmartre
,
eagerly devouring a roll, and refreshing
myself with sour wine. When a little recovered
from the shock of discovering myself in a situation
so novel, (for, having no investments in guinguettes,
I had not taken sufficient interest in these popular
establishments ever to enter one before,) I had
leisure to look about and survey the company.
Some fifty Frenchmen of the laboring classes were
drinking on every side, and talking with a
vehemence
of gesticulation, and a clamor, that
completely
annihilated thought. This then, thought I,
is a scene of popular happiness. These creatures
are excellent fellows, enjoying themselves on
liquor that has not paid the city-duty; and perhaps
I may seize upon some point that favors my
system
among spirits so frank and clamorous.
Doubtless
,
if any one among them is in possession of any
important social secret, it will not fail to escape
him here. From meditations of this philosophical
character, I was suddenly aroused by a violent
blow before me, accompanied with an
exclamation
,
in very tolerable English, of the word
King!
On the centre of the board which did the office
of a table, and directly beneath my eyes, lay a
clenched fist of fearful dimensions, that, in color
and protuberances, bore a good deal of
resemblance
to a freshly unearthed Jerusalem artichoke.
Its sinews seemed to be cracking with tension, and
the whole knob was so expressive of intense
pugnacity
,
that my eyes involuntarily sought its
owner's face. I had unconsciously taken my seat
directly opposite a man whose stature was nearly
double that of the compact, bustling, sputtering,
and sturdy little fellows, who were bawling on
every side of us, and whose skinny lips, instead
of joining in the noise, were so firmly compressed
as to render the crevice of the mouth no more
strongly marked than a wrinkle in the brow of a
man of sixty. His complexion was naturally fair,
but exposure had tanned the skin of his face to
the color of the
crackle
of a roasted pig; those
parts which a painter would be apt to term the
high lights being indicated by touches of red,
nearly as bright as fourth-proof brandy. His eyes
were small, stern, fiery, and very gray; and just
at the instant they met my admiring look, they
resembled two stray coals, that, by some means,
had got separated from the body of adjacent heat
in the face. He had a prominent, well-shaped
nose, athwart which the skin was stretched like
leather in the process of being rubbed down on
the currier's bench, and his ropy black hair was
carefully smoothed over his temples and brows, in
a way to show that he was abroad on a holiday
excursion.
When our eyes met, this singular-looking being
gave me a nod of friendly recognition, for no better
reason that I could discover, than the fact that I
did not appear to be a Frenchman.
Did mortal man ever listen to such fools,
Captain
,
he observed, as if certain we must think
alike on the subject.
Really I did not attend to what was said;
there certainly is much noise.
I don't pretend to understand a word of
what they are saying, myself; but it
sounds
like
thorough nonsense.
My ear is not yet sufficiently acute to
distinguish
sense from nonsense by mere intonation and
soundbut it would seem, sir, that you speak
English, only.
Therein you are mistaken; for, being a great
traveller, I have been compelled to look about me,
and as a nat'ral consequence, I speak a little of all
languages. I do not say that I use the foreign
parts of speech always fundamentally, but then I
worry through an idee so as to make it legible
and of use, especially in the way of eating and
drinking. As to French, now, I can say `
donnez-me
some van
,' and `
don-nez-vous some pan
' as
well as the best of them; but when there are a
dozen throats bawling at once, as is the case with
these here chaps, why one might as well go on
the top of Ape's Hill, and hold a conversation with
the people he will meet with there, as to pretend
to hold a rational or a discussional discourse. For
my part, where there is to be a conversation, I
like every one to have his turn, keeping up the
talk, as it might be, watch and watch; but among
these Frenchmen it is pretty much as if their idees
had been caged, and the door being suddenly
opened, they fly out in a flock, just for the pleasure
of saying they are at liberty.
I now perceived that my companion was a
reflecting being, his ratiocination being connected
by regular links, and that he did not boost his
philosophy
on the leaping-staff of impulse, like most
of those who were sputtering, and arguing, and
wrangling, with untiring lungs, in all corners of
the
guinguette
. I frankly proposed, therefore, that
we should quit the place, and walk into the road,
where our discourse would be less disturbed, and
consequently more satisfactory. The proposal was
well received, and we left the brawlers, walking
by the outer boulevards towards my hotel in the
Rue de Rivoli, by the way of the Champs Elyses.
CHAPTER VII.
Touching an amphibious animal, a special introduction, and
its consequences.
I SOON took an interest in my new acquaintance.
He was communicative, shrewd, and peculiar; and
though apt to express himself quaintly, it was
always with the pith of one who had seen a great
deal of, at least, one portion of his
fellow-creatures
.
The conversation, under such
circumstances
,
did not flag; on the contrary, it soon
grew more interesting by the stranger's beginning
to touch on his private interests. He told me that
he was a mariner, who had been cast ashore by
one of the accidents of his calling, and, by way
of putting in a word in his own favor, he gave me
to understand that he had seen a great deal, more
especially of that caste of his fellow-creatures, who,
like himself, live by frequenting the mighty deep.
I am very happy, I said, to have met with
a stranger who can give me information touching
an entire class of human beings, with whom I
have, as yet, had but little communion. In order
that we may improve the occasion to the utmost,
I propose that we introduce ourselves to each
other at once, and swear an eternal friendship, or,
at least, until we may find it convenient to
dispense
with the obligation.
For my part, I am one who like the friendship
of a dog better than his enmity, returned my
companion
,
with a singleness of purpose that left him
no disposition to waste his breath in idle
compliments
.
I accept the offer, therefore, with all my
heart; and this the more readily, because you are
the only one I have met, for a week, who can
ask me how I do, without saying `
Come on, dong,
portez-vous
.' Being used to meet with squalls,
however
,
I shall accept your offer under the last
condition
named.
I liked the stranger's caution. It denoted a
proper
care of character, and furnished a proof of
responsibility. The condition was therefore
accepted
on my part, as frankly as it had been urged
on his.
And now, sir, I added, when we had shaken
each other very cordially by the hand, may I
presume to ask your name?
I am called Noah, and I don't care who knows
it. I'm not ashamed of either of my names,
whatever
else I may be ashamed of.
Noah ?
Poke, at your servicehe pronounced the
word slowly and very distinctly, as if what he
had just said of his self-confidence were true. As
I had afterwards occasion to take his signature, I
shall at once give it in the proper formCapt.
Noah Poke.
Of what part of England are you a native,
Mr. Poke?
I believe I may say, of the new parts.
I did not know that any portion of the island
was so designated. Will you have the good-nature
to explain yourself.
I'm
a native of Stunin'tun, in the state of
Connecticut, in
old
New England. My parents
being dead, I was sent to sea a four-year-old, and
here I am, walking about the kingdom of France
without a cent in my pocket, a shipwrecked
mariner
.
Hard as my lot is, to say the truth, I'd about
as leave starve as live by speaking their dd
lingo.
Shipwrecked  a mariner  starving  and a
Yankee!
All that, and maybe more, too; though, by
your leave, commodore, we'll drop the last title.
I'm proud enough to call myself a Yankee, but my
back is apt to get up when I hear an Englishman
use the word. We are yet friends, and it may be
well enough to continue so, until some good comes
of it, to one or the other of the parties.
I ask your pardon, Mr. Poke, and will not
offend again. Have you circumnavigated the
globe?
Capt. Poke snapped his fingers, in pure contempt
of the simplicity of the question.
Has the moon ever sailed round the 'arth!
Look here a moment, commodorehe took from
his pocket an apple, of which he had been
munching
half-a-dozen during the walk, and held it up to
viewdraw your lines which way you will on
this sphere; crosswise, or lengthwise, up or down,
zig-zag or parpendic'lar, and you will not find
more traverses than I've worked about the old
ball!
By land, as well as by sea?
Why, as to the land, I've had my share of
that, too; for it has been my hard fortune to run
upon it, when a softer bed would have given a
more quiet nap. This is just the present difficulty
with me, for I am now tacking about among
these Frenchmen in order to get afloat again, like
an alligator floundering in the mud. I lost my
schooner on the north-east coast of Russia
somewhere
hereabouts, pointing to the precise spot on
the apple; we were up there trading in skins
and finding no means of reaching home by the
road I'd come, and smelling salt water down
hereaway
,
I've been shaping my course westward, for
the last eighteen months, steering as near as might
be directly athwart Europe and Asia; and here I
am at last, within two days' run of Havre, which
is, if I can get good Yankee planks beneath me
once more, within some eighteen or twenty days'
run of home.
You allow me, then, to call the planks,
Yankee
?
Call'em what you please, commodore; though
I should prefar to call'em the `Debby and Dolly
of Stunin'tun,' to any thing else, for that was the
name of the craft I lost.Well, the best of us are
but frail, and the longest-winded man is no dolphin
to swim with his head under water!
Pray, Mr. Poke, permit me to ask where you
learned to speak the English language with so
much purity?
Stunin'tunI never had a mouthful of
schooling
but what I got at home. It's all homespun. I
make no boast of scholarship; but as for
navigation
,
or for finding my way about the 'arth, I'll
turn my back on no man, unless it be to leave him
behind. Now we have people with us, that think
a great deal of their geometry and astronomics,
but I hold to no such slender threads. My way is,
when there is occasion to go anywhere, to settle
it well in my mind as to the place, and then to
make as straight a wake, as natur' will allow,
taking little account of the charts, which are as apt
to put you wrong as right;and when they do get
you into a scrape, it's a smasher! Depend on
yourself and human natur', is my rule; though I
admit there is some accommodation in a compass,
particularly in cold weather.
Cold weather!I do not well comprehend the
distinction.
Why, I rather conclude that one's scent gets
to be dullish in a frost; but this may be no more
than a conceit, after all, for the two times I've been
wrecked were in summer, and both the accidents
happened by sheer dint of hard blowing, and in
broad day-light, when nothing human, short of a
change of wind, could have saved us.
And you prefer this peculiar sort of
navigation
?
To all others, especially in the sealing-business,
which is my ra'al occupation. It's the very best
way in the world, to discover islands; and every
body knows that we sealers are always on the
look-out for su'thin' of that sort.
Will you suffer me to inquire, Captain Poke,
how many times you have doubled Cape Horn?
My navigator threw a quick, jealous glance at
me, as if he distrusted the nature of the question.
Why, that is neither here nor there;perhaps I
don't double either of the capes, perhaps I do. I get
into the South Sea with my craft, and it's of no great
moment how it's done. A skin is worth just as much
in the market, though the furrier may not happen
to have a glossary of the road it has travelled.
A glossary?
What matters a signification, commodore, when
people understand each other? This over-land
journey
has put me to my wits, for you will understand,
Vol. I. 10
that I've had to travel among natives that cannot
speak a syllable of the homespun; so I brought the
schooner's dictionary with me as a sort of
terrestrial
almanac, and I fancied that, as they spoke
gibberish
to me, the best way was to give it to them
back again, as near as might be in their own coin,
hoping I might hit on su'thin' to their liking. By
this means, I've come to be rather more voluble
than formerly.
The idea was happy.
No doubt it was, as is just evinced. But,
having
given you a pretty clear insight into my natur'
and occupation, it is time that I ask a few questions
of you. This is a business, you must know, at
which we do a good deal at Stunin'tun, and at
which we are commonly thought to be handy.
Put your questions, Capt. Poke; I hope the
answers
will be satisfactory.
Your name?
John Goldencalfby the favor of His Majesty,
Sir John Goldencalf, Baronet.
`Sir John Goldencalfby the favor of His
Majesty
,
a Baronet!' Is Baronet a calling? or what
sort of crittur or thing is it?
It is my rank, in the kingdom to which I
belong
.
I begin to understand what you mean. Among
your nation, mankind is what we call stationed,
like a ship's people that are called to go about;
you have a certain birth in that kingdom of yours,
much as I should have in a sealing schooner.
Exactly so; and I presume you will allow that
order, and propriety, and safety, result from this
method, among mariners?
No doubtno doubt; we station anew,
however
,
each v'yage, according to experience: I'm
not so sure that it would do to take even the cook
from father to son, or we might have a pretty mess
of it.
Here the sealer commenced a series of questions,
which he put with a vigor and perseverance that, I
fear, left me without a single fact of my life
unrevealed
,
except those connected with the sacred
sentiment
that bound me to Anna, and which were far
too hallowed to escape me, even under the ordeal
of a Stunin'tun inquisitor. In short, finding that I
was nearly helpless in such hands, I made a merit
of necessity, and yielded up my secrets, as wood
in a vice discharges its moisture. It was scarcely
possible that a mind like mine, subjected to the action
of such a pair of moral screws, should not yield
some hints touching its besetting propensities. The
Captain seized this clue, and he went at the theory
like a bull-dog at the muzzle of an ox.
To oblige him, therefore, I entered, at some
length, into an explanation of my system. After
the general remarks that were necessary to give a
stranger an insight into its leading principles, I
gave him to understand that I had long been
looking
for one like him, for a purpose that shall now
be explained to the reader. I had entertained some
negotiations with Tamaahmaah, and had certain
investments
in the pearl and whale-fisheries, it is true;
but, on the whole, my relations with all that
portion
of mankind who inhabit the islands of the
Pacific, the north-west coast of America, and the
north-east coast of the old continent, were rather
loose, and generally in an unsettled and vague
condition
;
and it appeared to me that I had been
singularly
favored, in having a man so well adapted to
their regeneration, thrown, as it were, by
Providence
,
and in a manner so unusual, directly in my
way. I now frankly proposed, therefore, to fit out
an expedition, that should be partly of trade and
partly of discovery, in order to expand my interests
in this new direction, and to place my new
acquaintance
at its head. Ten minutes of earnest
explanation
on my part, sufficed to put my companion
in possession of the leading features of the plan.
When I had ended this direct appeal to his love of
enterprise, I was answered by the favorite
exclamation
of
King!
I do not wonder, Captain Poke, that your
admiration
breaks out in this manner; for, I believe,
few men fairly enter into the beauty of this
benevolent
system, who are not struck equally with its
grandeur and its simplicity. May I count on your
assistance?
This is a new idee, Sir Goldencalf
Sir John Goldencalf, if you please, sir.
A new idee, Sir John Goldencalf, and it needs
circumspection. Circumspection in a bargain, is
the certain way to steer clear of misunderstandings.
You wish a navigator to take your craft, let her be
what she will, into unknown seas, and I wish,
naturally
,
to make a straight course for Stunin'tun.
You see the bargain is in apogee, from the start.
Money is no consideration with me, Captain
Poke.
Well, this is an idee that has brought many a
more difficult contract at once into perigee, Sir
John Goldencalf. Money is always a considerable
consideration with me, and I may say, also, just
now it is rather more so than usual. But when a
gentleman clears the way as handsomely as you
have now done, any bargain may be counted as a
good deal more than half made.
A few explicit explanations disposed of this part
of the subject, and Captain Poke accepted of my
terms in the spirit of frankness with which they
were made. Perhaps his decision was quickened
by an offer of twenty Napoleons, which I did not
neglect making on the spot. Amicable, and in
some respects confidential, relations were now
established between my new acquaintance and
myself; and we pursued our walk, discussing the
details necessary to the execution of our project.
After an hour or two passed in this manner, I
invited my companion to go to my hotel, meaning
that he should partake of my board until we could
both depart for England, where it was my
intention
to purchase, without delay, a vessel for the
contemplated voyage, in which I also had decided
to embark in person.
We were obliged to make our way through the
throng that usually frequents the lower part of the
Champs Elyses, during the season of good
weather
and towards the close of day. This task was
nearly over, when my attention was particularly
drawn to a group that was just entering the place
of general resort, apparently with the design of
adding to the scene of thoughtlessness and
amusement
.
But, as I am now approaching the most
material part of this extraordinary work, it will
be proper to reserve the opening for a new chapter.
10*
CHAPTER VIII.
An introduction to four new characters, some touches of
philosophy
,
and a few capital thoughts on political economy.
The
group which drew my attention was
composed
of six individuals, two of which were
animals
of the genus
homo
, or what is vulgarly termed
man;
and the remainder were of the order
primates
,
and of the class
mammalia;
or what, in common
parlance, are called
monkeys
.
The first were Savoyards, and may be
generally
described as being
unwashed, ragged
and
carnivorous;
in colour,
swarthy;
in lineaments and
expression,
avaricious
and
shrewd
, and in appetites
voracious
. The latter were of the common species,
of the usual size, and of approved gravity. There
were two of each sex; being very equally paired
as to years and external advantages.
The monkeys were all habited with more or less
of the ordinary attire of our modern European
civilization; but peculiar care had been taken with
the toilet of the senior of the two males. This
individual had on the coat of a hussar, a cut that
would have given a particular part of his body a
more military
contour
than comported with his
real character, were it not for a red petticoat, that
was made shorter than common; less, however,
with a view to show a pretty foot and ankle, than
to leave the nether limbs at liberty to go through
with certain extravagant efforts, which the
Savoyards
were unmercifully exacting from his natural
agility. He wore a Spanish hat, decorated with
a few bedraggled feathers, a white cockade, and
a wooden sword. In addition to the latter, he
carried in his hand a small broom.
Observing that my attention was strongly
attracted
to this party, the ill-favored Savoyards
immediately commenced a series of experiments
in saltation, with the sole view, beyond a question,
to profit by my curiosity. The inoffensive victims
of this act of brutal tyranny, submitted with a
patience worthy of the profoundest philosophy,
meeting the wishes of their masters with a
readiness
and dexterity that was beyond all praise.
One swept the earth, another leaped on the back
of a dog, a third threw himself head-over-heels,
again and again, without a murmur; and the fourth
moved gracefully to and fro, like a young girl in
a quadrille. All this might have passed without
calling for particular remark, (since, alas! the
spectacle
is only too common,) were it not for certain
eloquent appeals that were made to me, through
the eyes, by the individual in the hussar jacket.
His look was rarely averted from my face for a
moment, and, in this way, a silent communion
was soon established between us. I observed that
his gravity was indomitable. Nothing could elicit
a smile, or a change of countenance. Obedient
to the whip of his brutal master, he never refused
the required leap; for minutes at a time, his legs
and petticoat described confused circles in the
air, appearing to have taken a final leave of the
earth; but, the effort ended, he invariably
descended
to the ground with a quiet dignity and
composure
,
that showed how little the inward monkey
partook of the antics of the outward animal.
Drawing
my companion a little aside, I ventured to
suggest a few thoughts to him on the subject.
Really, Captain Poke, it appears to me there is
great injustice in the treatment of these poor
creatures
!
I said. What right have these two
foul-looking
blackguards to seize upon beings much
more interesting to the eye, and, I dare say, far
more intellectual, than themselves, and cause them
to throw their legs about in this extravagant
manner
,
under the penalty of stripes, and without
regard to their feelings, or to their convenience?
I say, sir, the measure appears to me to be
intolerably
oppressive, and it calls for prompt redress.
King!
King or subject, it does not alter the moral
deformity of the act. What have these innocent
beings done, that they should be subjected to this
disgrace? Are they not flesh and blood, like
ourselves
do
they not approach nearer to our form,
and, for aught we know to the contrary, to our
reason, than any other animal? and is it tolerable
that our nearest imitations, our very cousins,
should be thus dealt by? Are they dogs, that they
are treated like dogs?
Why, to my notion, Sir John, there isn't a dog
on 'arth that can take such a summerset. Their
flapjacks are quite extraor'nary!
Yes, sir, and more than extraordinary; they
are oppressive. Place yourself, Mr. Poke, for a
single instant, in the situation of one of these
persons; fancy that you had a hussar jacket
squeezed upon your brawny shoulders, a petticoat
placed over your lower extremities, a Spanish hat
with bedraggled feathers set upon your head, a
wooden sword stuck at your side, and a broom
put into your hand; and that these two Savoyards
were to menace you with stripes unless you
consented
to throw summersets for the amusement of
strangersI only ask you to make the case your
own, sir, and then say what course you would
take, and what you would do?
I would lick both of these young blackguards,
Sir John, without remorse, break the sword and
the broom over their heads, kick their sensibilities
till they couldn't see, and take my course for
Stunin'tun, where I belong.
Yes, sir, this might do with the Savoyards,
who are young and feeble
'T wouldn't alter the case much, if two of
these Frenchmen were in their placesput in
the Captain, glaring wolfishly about him. To be
plain with you, Sir John Goldencalf, being human,
I'd submit to no such monkey tricks.
Do not use the term reproachfully, Mr. Poke,
I entreat of you. We call these animals monkeys,
it is true; but we do not know what they call
themselves. Man is merely an animal, and you
must very well know
Harkee, Sir Johninterrupted the Captain,
I'm no botanist, and do not pretend to more
schooling than a sealer has need of, for finding his
way about the 'arth; but, as for a man's being an
animal, I just wish to ask you, now, if, in your
judgment, a hog is also an animal?
Beyond a doubtand fleas, and toads, and
sea-serpents, and lizards, and water-devilswe are
all, neither more nor less than animals.
Well, if a hog is an animal, I am willing to
allow the relationship; for, in the course of my
experunce, which is not small, I have met with
men that you might have mistaken for hogs, in
every thing but the bristles, the snout, and the tail.
I'll never deny what I've seen with my own eyes,
though I suffer for it; and therefore I admit that
hogs being animals, it is more than likely that
some men must be animals too.
We call these interesting beings monkeys; but
how do we know that they do not return the
compliment
,
and call us, in their own particular
dialect
,
something quite as offensive. It would become
our species to manifest a more equitable and
philosophical
spirit, and to consider these interesting
strangers as an unfortunate family which has fallen
into the hands of brutes, and which is, in every
way, entitled to our commiseration and our active
interference. Hitherto, I have never sufficiently
stimulated my sympathies for the animal world,
by any investment in quadrupeds; but it is my
intention to write to-morrow to my English agent
to purchase a pack of hounds and a suitable stud
of horses; and by way of quickening so laudable
a resolution, I shall forthwith make propositions to
the Savoyards for the speedy emancipation of this
family of amiable foreigners. The slave trade is
an innocent pastime, compared to the cruel
oppression
that the gentleman in the Spanish hat, in
particular
,
is compelled to endure.
King!
He may be a king, sure enough, in his own
country, Captain Poke;a fact that would add
tenfold
agony to his unmerited sufferings.
Hereupon, I proceeded, without more ado, to
open a negotiation with the Savoyards. The
judicious
application of a few Napoleons soon brought
about a happy understanding between the
contracting
parties, when the Savoyards transferred to my
hands the strings which confined their vassals, as
the formal and usual acknowledgment of the right
of ownership. Committing the three others to the
keeping of Mr. Poke, I led the individual in the
hussar-jacket a little on one side, and, raising my
hat, to show that I was superior to the vulgar
feeling
of feudal superiority, I addressed him, briefly,
in the following words:
Although I have ostensibly bought the right
which these Savoyards professed to have in your
persons and services, I seize an early occasion to
inform you that, virtually, you are now free. As
we are among a people accustomed to see your
race in subjection, however, it may not be prudent
to proclaim the nature of the present transaction,
lest there might be some further conspiracies
against your natural rights. We will retire to my
hotel, forthwith, therefore, where your future
happiness
shall be the subject of our more mature and
of our united deliberations.
The respectable stranger in the hussar-jacket
heard me with inimitable gravity and self-command.
until, in the warmth of feeling, I raised an arm in
earnest gesticulation, when, most probably
overcome
by the emotions of delight that were
naturally
awakened in his bosom by this sudden change
of fortune, he threw three summersets, or flapjacks,
as Captain Poke had quaintly designated his
evolutions
,
in so rapid succession, as to render it, for a
moment
,
a matter of doubt whether nature had placed
his head or his heels uppermost.
Making a sign for Captain Poke to follow, I now
took my way directly to the rue de Rivoli. We
were attended by a constantly increasing crowd,
until the gate of the hotel was fairly entered; and
glad was I to see my charge safely housed, for
there were abundant indications of another design
upon their rights, in the taunts and ridicule of the
living mass that rolled up, as it were, upon our
heels. On reaching my own apartment, a courier,
who had been waiting my return, and who had
just arrived express from England, put a packet
into my hands, stating that it came from my
principal
English agent. Hasty orders were given to
attend to the comfort and wants of Captain Poke
and the strangers, (orders that were in no danger
of being neglected, since Sir John Goldencalf, with
the reputed annual revenue of three millions of
francs, had unlimited credit with all the inhabitants
of the hotel,) and I hurried into my cabinet, and sat
down to the eager perusal of the different
communications
.
Alas! there was not a line from Anna! The
obdurate
girl still trifled with my misery; and, in
revenge
,
I entertained a momentary resolution of
adopting the notions of Mahmoud, in order to
qualify myself to set up a harem.
The letters were from a variety of
correspondents
,
embracing many of those who were
entrusted
with the care of my interests in very opposite
quarters of the world. Half an hour before, I had
been dying to open more intimate relations with
the interesting strangers; but my thoughts
instantly
took a new direction, and I soon found that the
painful sentiments I had entertained touching their
welfare and happiness, were quite lost in the newly
awakened interests that lay before me. It is in
this simple manner, no doubt, that the system to
which I am a convert effects no small part of its
own great purposes. No sooner does any one
interest
grow painful by excess, than a new claim
arises to divert the thoughts, a new demand is
made on the sensibilities; and, by lowering our
affections
from the intensity of selfishness, to the
more bland and equable feeling of impartiality,
forms that just and generous condition of the mind
at which the political economists aim, when they
dilate on the glories and advantages of their
favorite
theory of the social stake.
In this happy frame of mind, I fell to reading
the letters with avidity, and with the god-like
determination
to reverence Providence and to do
justice.Fiat justitia ruat clum!
The first epistle was from the agent of the
principal
West-India estate. He acquainted me with
the fact that all hopes from the expected crop were
destroyed by a hurricane, and he begged that I
would furnish the means necessary to carry on the
affairs of the plantation, until another season might
repair the loss. Priding myself on punctuality as
a man of business, before I broke another seal, a
letter was written to a banker in London,
requesting
him to supply the necessary credits, and to
notify
the agent in the West-Indies of the
circumstance
.
As he was a member of parliament, I
seized the occasion, also, to press upon him the
necessity of government's introducing some early
measure for the protection of the sugar-growers, a
most meritorious class of his fellow-subjects, and
one whose exposures and actual losses called
loudly
for relief of this nature. As I closed the letter,
I could not help dwelling, with complacency, on
the zeal and promptitude with which I had acted
the certain proof of the usefulness of the theory of
investments.
The second communication was from the
manager
of an East-India property, that very happily
came with its offering to fill the vacuum left by the
failure of the crops just mentioned. Sugar was
likely to be a drug in the peninsula, and my
correspondent
stated that the cost of transportation
being so much greater than from the other colonies,
this advantage would be entirely lost, unless
government
did something to restore the East-Indian
to his natural equality. I enclosed this letter in one
to my Lord Say and Do, who was in the ministry,
asking of him, in the most laconic and pointed terms,
whether it were possible for the empire to prosper,
when one portion of it was left in possession of
exclusive advantages, to the prejudice of all the
Vol. I. 11
others? As this question was put with a truly
British
spirit, I hope it had some tendency to open the
eyes of his Majesty's ministers; for much was
shortly after said, both in the journals and in
Parliament
,
on the necessity of protecting our
East-Indian
fellow-subjects, and of doing natural justice
by establishing the national prosperity on the only
firm basis, that of Free Trade.
The next letter was from the acting partner of
a large manufacturing house, to which I had
advanced
quite half the capital, in order to enter into
a sympathetic communion with the cotton-spinners.
The writer complained heavily of the import duty
on the raw article; made some poignant allusions
to the increasing competition on the continent and
in America; and pretty clearly intimated that the
Lord of the manor of Householder ought to make
himself felt by the administration, in a question of
so much magnitude to the nation. On this hint I
spake. I sat down, on the spot, and wrote a long
letter to my friend, Lord Pledge, in which I pointed
out to him the danger that threatened our political
economy; that we were imitating the false theories
of the Americans, (the countrymen of Captain
Poke); that trade was clearly never so prosperous
as when it was the most successful; that success
depended on effort, and effort was the most efficient
when the least encumbered; and, in short, that, as
it was self-evident a man would jump farther
without
being in foot-irons, or strike harder without
being
handcuffed, so it was equally apparent, that a
merchant would make a better bargain for himself,
when he could have things all his own way, than
when his enterprise and industry were shackled
by the impertinent and selfish interposition of the
interests of others. In conclusion, there was an
eloquent description of the demoralizing
consequences
of smuggling, and a pungent attack on the
tendencies of taxation in general. I have written
and said some good things in my time, as several
of my dependants have sworn to me, in a way that
even my natural modesty cannot repudiate; but I
shall be excused for the weakness, if I now add,
that I believe this letter to Lord Pledge contained
some as clever points, as any thing I remember,
in their way; the last paragraph, in particular,
being positively the neatest and the best turned
moral I ever produced.
Letter fourth was from the steward of the
Householder
estate. He spoke of the difficulty of getting
the rents; a difficulty that he imputed altogether to
the low price of corn. He said that it would soon
be necessary to re-let certain farms; and he feared
that the unthinking cry against the corn-laws would
affect the conditions. It was incumbent on the
landed
interest to keep an eye on the popular tendencies,
as respected this subject; for any material variation
from the present system would lower the rental of
all the grain-growing counties in England, thirty
per cent., at least, at a blow. He concluded with
a very hard rap at the Agrarians, a party that was
just coming a little into notice in Great Britain,
and, by a very ingenious turn, in which he
completely
demonstrated that the protection of the
landlord and the support of the Protestant religion
were indissolubly connected. There was also a
vigorous appeal to the common sense of the subject,
on the danger to be apprehended by the people
from themselves; which he treated in a way that,
a little more expanded, would have made a
delightful
homily on the rights of man.
I believe I meditated on the contents of this letter
fully an hour. Its writer, John Dobbs, was as worthy
and upright a fellow as ever breathed; and I could
not but admire the surprising knowledge of men
which shone through every line he had indite.
Something must be done, it was clear; and, at
length, I determined to take the bull by the horns,
and to address Mr. Huskisson at once, as the
shortest way of coming at the evil. He was the
political sponsor for all the new notions on the
subject of our foreign mercantile policy; and, by
laying before him, in a strong point of view, the
fatal consequences of carrying his system to
extremes
,
I hoped something might yet be done for
the owners of real estate, the bones and sinews of
the land.
I shall just add, in this place, that Mr.
Huskisson
sent me a very polite and a very statesman-like
reply, in which he disclaimed any intention of
meddling
improperly with British interests, in any way;
that taxation was necessary to our system, and of
course every nation was the best judge of its own
means and resources; but that he merely aimed at
the establishment of just and generous principles,
by which nations that had no occasion for British
measures should not unhandsomely resort to them;
and that certain eternal truths should stand, like so
many well-constructed tubs, each on its own
bottom
.
I must say I was pleased with this attention
from a man generally reputed as clever as Mr.
Huskisson, and from that time I became a convert
to most of his opinions.
The next communication that I opened, was
from the overseer of the estate in Louisiana, who
informed me that the general aspect of things in
that quarter of the world was favorable, but the
small-pox had found its way among the negroes,
and the business of the plantation would
immediately
require the services of fifteen able-bodied
men, with the usual sprinkling of women and
children
.
He added, that the laws of America
prohibited
the further importation of blacks from any
country without the limits of the Union, but that
there was a very pretty and profitable internal
trade in the article; and that the supply might be
obtained, in sufficient season, either from the
Carolinas
,
Virginia, or Maryland. He admitted,
however
,
that there was some choice between the
different stocks of these several states, and that some
discretion might be necessary in making the
selection
.
The negro of the Carolinas was the most
used to the cotton-field, had less occasion for
clothes, and it had been proved by experiment,
could be fattened on red herrings; while, on the
other hand, the negro farther north had the highest
instinct, could sometimes reason, and that he had
even been known to preach, when he had got
as high up as Philadelphia. He much affected,
also, bacon and poultry. Perhaps it might be well
to purchase samples of lots from all the different
stocks in market.
In reply, I assented to the latter idea, suggesting
the expediency of getting one or two of the higher
castes from the north; I had no objection to
preaching, provided they preached work; but I
cautioned the overseer particularly against
schismatics
.
Preaching, in the abstract, could do no
harm; all depending on doctrine.
This advice was given as the result of much
earnest observation. Those European states that
had the most obstinately resisted the introduction
of letters, I had recently had occasion to remark,
were changing their systems, and were about to
act on the principle of causing fire to fight fire.
They were fast having recourse to school-books,
using no other precaution than the simple expedient
of writing them themselves. By this ingenious
11*
invention, poison was converted into food, and
truths of all classes were at once put above the
dangers of disputations and heresies.
Having disposed of the Louisianian, I very
gladly turned to the opening of the sixth seal. The
letter was from the efficient trustee of a company
to whose funds I had largely contributed, by way
of making an investment in charity. It had struck
me, a short time previously to quitting home, that
interests positive as most of those I had embarked
in, had a tendency to render the spirit worldly; and
I saw no other check to such an evil, than by
seeking
for some association with the saints, in order to
set up a balance against the dangerous propensity.
A lucky occasion offered through the wants of the
Philo-african-anti-compulsion-free-labour Society,
whose meritorious efforts were about to cease for
want of the great charity-powergold. A draft
for five thousand pounds had obtained me the honor
of being advertised as a shareholder and a patron;
and, I know not why!but it certainly caused me
to inquire into the results with far more interest than
I had ever before felt in any similar institution.
Perhaps this benevolent anxiety arose from that
principle in our nature, which induces us to look
after whatever has been our own, as long as any
part of it can be seen.
The principal trustee of the
Philo-african-anti-compulsion-free-labour
Society now wrote to state
that some of the speculations which had gone
pari
passu
with the charity, had been successful, and
that the shareholders were, by the fundamental
provisions of the association, entitled to a dividend,
buthow often that awkward word stands between
the cup and the lip!
but
, that he was of opinion the
establishment of a new factory, near a point where
the slavers most resorted, and where gold-dust and
palm-oil were also to be had in the greatest
quantities
,
and consequently at the lowest prices, would
equally benefit trade and philanthropy; that, by a
judicious application of our means, these two
interests
might be made to see-saw very cleverly, as
cause and effect, effect and cause; that the black
man would be spared an incalculable amount of
misery, the white man a grievous burthen of sin,
and the particular agents of so manifest a good
might quite reasonably calculate on making, at the
very least, forty per cent. per annum on their
money, besides having all their souls saved, in the
bargain. Of course I assented to a proposition so
reasonable in itself, and which offered benefits so
plausible!
The next epistle was from the head of a great
commercial house in Spain, in which I had taken
some shares, and whose interests had been
temporarily
deranged by the throes of the people in their
efforts to obtain redress for real or imaginary
wrongs. My correspondent showed a proper
indignation
on the occasion, and was not sparing in his
language whenever he was called to speak of
popular tumults. What do the wretches wish!
he asked, with much pointOur lives, as well as
our property? Ah! my dear sir, this bitter fact
impresses us all (by us, he meant the mercantile
interests) with the importance of strong executives.
Where should we have been, but for the bayonets
of the king? or what would have become of our
altars, our firesides and our persons, had it not
pleased God to grant us a monarch indomitable in
will, brave in spirit, and quick in action? I wrote
a proper answer of congratulation, and turned to
the next epistle, which was the last of the
communications
.
The eighth letter was from the acting head of
another commercial house, in New-York, United
States of America, or the country of Captain Poke,
where it would seem the President, by a decided
exercise of his authority, had drawn upon
himself
the execrations of a large portion of the
commercial interests of the country; since the
effect of the measure, right or wrong, as a
legitimate
consequence or not, by hook or by crook, had
been to render money scarce. There is no man so
keen in his philippics, so acute in discovering and
so prompt in analyzing facts, so animated in his
philosophy
,
and so eloquent in his complaints, as your
debtor, when money unexpectedly gets to be scarce!
Credit, comfort, bones, sinews, marrow and all,
appear
to depend on the result; and it is no wonder
that, under so lively impressions, men who have
hitherto been content to jog on in the regular and
quiet habits of barter, should suddenly start up into
logicians, politicians, ay, or even into magicians. Such
had been the case with my present correspondent,
who seemed to know and to care as little in
general
of the polity of his own country as if he had
never been in it, but who now was ready to split
hairs with a metaphysician, and who could not
have written more complacently of the constitution
if he had even read it. My limits will not allow
an insertion of the whole letter, but one or two of
its sentences shall be given. Is it tolerable, my
dear sir, he went on to say, that the executive
of
any
country, I will not say merely of our own,
should possess, or exercise, even admitting that he
does possess them, such unheard of powers? Our
condition is worse than that of the Mussulmans,
who, in losing their money, usually lose their heads,
and are left in a happy insensibility to their
sufferings
:
but, alas! there is an end of the much
boasted
liberty of America! The executive has
swallowed
up all the other branches of the government, and
the next thing will be to swallow up us. Our altars,
our firesides, and our persons will shortly be
invaded
;
and I much fear that my next letter will be
received by you, long after all correspondence shall
be prohibited, every means of communication cut
off, and we ourselves shall be precluded from
writing
,
by being chained, like beasts of burthen, to the
car of a bloody tyrant. Then followed as pretty
a string of epithets as I remember to have heard
from the mouth of the veriest shrew at
Billingsgate
.
I could not but admire the virtue of the
social-stake
system, which kept men so sensibly alive
to all their rights, let them live where they would,
or under what form of government, which was so
admirably suited to sustain truth and render us just.
In reply, I sent back epithet for epithet, echoed all
the groans of my correspondent, and railed as
became
a man who was connected with a losing
concern.
This closed my correspondence for the present,
and I arose wearied with my labors, and yet
greatly
rejoicing in their fruits. It was now late, but
excitement prevented sleep; and before retiring for
the night, I could not help looking in upon my guests.
Captain Poke had gone to a room in another part
of the hotel, but the family of amiable strangers
were fast asleep in the ante-chamber. They had
supped heartily, as I was assured, and were now
indulging in a happy but temporary oblivionto
use an approved expressionof all their wrongs.
Satisfied with this state of things, I now sought my
own pillow, or, according to a favorite phrase of
Mr. Noah Poke, I also turned in.
CHAPTER IX.
The commencement of wonders, which are the more
extraordinary
on account of their truth.
I DARE say my head had been on the pillow fully
an hour, before sleep closed my eyes. During this
time, I had abundant occasion to understand the
activity of what are called the busy thoughts.
Mine were feverish, glowing, and restless. They
wandered over a wide field;one that included
Anna, with her beauty, her mild truth, her
womanly
softness and her womanly cruelty; Captain Poke
and his peculiar opinions; the amiable family of
quadrupeds and their wounded sensibilities; the
excellencies
of the social-stake system; and, in short,
most of that which I had seen and heard during
the last four-and-twenty hours. When sleep did
tardily arrive, it overtook me at the very moment
that I had inwardly vowed to forget my heartless
mistress, and to devote the remainder of my life to
the promulgation of the doctrine of the
expansive-super-human-generalized-affection-principle
,
to the
utter exclusion of all narrow and selfish views, and
in which I resolved to associate myself with Mr.
Poke, as with one who had seen a great deal of
this earth and its inhabitants, without narrowing
down his sympathies in favor of any one place or
person, in particular, Stunin'tun and himself very
properly excepted.
It was broad day-light when I awoke on the
following
morning. My spirits were calmed by rest,
and my nerves had been soothed by the balmy
freshness of the atmosphere. It appeared that my
valet had entered and admitted the morning air,
and then had withdrawn, as usual, to await the signal
of the bell, before he presumed to reappear. I lay
many minutes, in delicious repose, enjoying the
periodical
return to life and reason, bringing with it,
the pleasures of thought and its ten thousand
agreeable
associations. The delightful reverie into which
I was insensibly dropping, was, however, ere long
arrested by low, murmuring, and, as I thought,
plaintive voices, at no great distance from my own
bed. Seating myself erect, I listened intently, and with
a good deal of surprise; for it was not easy to
imagine
whence sounds, so unusual for that place and
hour, could proceed. The discourse was earnest,
and even animated; but it was carried on in so low
a tone that it would have been utterly inaudible, but
for the deep quiet of the hotel. Occasionally a word
reached my ear, and I was completely at fault in
endeavoring
to ascertain even the language. That it
was in neither of the five great European tongues, I
was certain, for all these I either spoke or read; and
there were particular sounds and inflexions that
induced
me to think that it savored of the most
ancient
of the two classics. It is true that the
prosody
of these dialects, at the same time that is is a
shibboleth of learning, is a disputed point, the very
sounds of the vowels even being a matter of
national
convention; the Latin word
dux
, for
instance
,
becoming
ducks
in England,
dooks
in Italy,
and
dukes
in France: yet there is a `
je ne sais quoi
,'
a delicacy in the auricular taste of a true scholar,
that will rarely lead him astray, when his ears are
greeted with words that have been used by
Demosthenes
or Cicero.
[1]
[1]
Or Chichero, or Kickero, whichever may happen to suit
the prejudices of the reader.
In the present instance, I
distinctly
heard the word,
my-bom-y-nos-fos-kom-i-ton
,
which I made sure was a verb in the dual number
and second person, of a Greek root, but of a
signification
that I could not, on the instant, master, but
which, beyond a question, every scholar will
recognize
as having a strong analogy to a well-known
line in Homer. If I was puzzled with the
syllables
that accidentally reached me, I was no less
perplexed with the intonations of the voices of the
different speakers. While it was easy to
understand
they were of the two sexes, they had no
direct affinity to the mumbling sibilations of the
English, the vehement monotony of the French,
the gagging sonorousness of the Spaniards, the
noisy melody of the Italians, the ear-splitting
octaves
of the Germans, or the undulating,
head-over-heels
enunciation of the countrymen of my
particular acquaintance, Captain Noah Poke. Of
all the living languages of which I had any
knowledge
,
the resemblance was nearer to the Danish
and Swedish, than to any other; but I much
doubted, at the time I first heard the syllables, and
still question, if there is exactly such a word as
my-bom-y-nos-fos-kom-i-ton
to be found in even
either of those tongues. I could no longer
support
the suspense. The classical and learned
doubts that beset me, grew intensely painful; and,
arising with the greatest caution, in order not to
alarm the speakers, I prepared to put an end to
them all, by the simple and natural process of
actual observation.
The voices came from the ante-chamber, the
door of which was slightly open. Throwing on a
dressing-gown, and thrusting my feet into slippers,
I moved on tiptoe to the aperture, and placed my
eye in such a situation as enabled me to command
a view of the persons of those who were still
earnestly talking in the adjoining room. All
surprise
vanished the moment I found that the four
monkeys were grouped in a corner of the
apartment
,
where they were carrying on a very
animated
dialogue, the two oldest of the party (a male
and a female) being the principal speakers. It was
not to be expected that even a graduate of Oxford,
although belonging to a sect so proverbial for
classical lore, that many of them knew nothing
else, could, at the first hearing, decide upon the
analogies and character of a tongue that is so little
cultivated even in that ancient seat of learning.
Although I had now certainly a direct clue to the
root of the dialect of the speakers, I found it quite
impossible to get any useful acquaintance with the
general drift of what was passing among them.
As they were my guests, however, and might
possibly
be in want of some of the conveniences that
were necessary to their habits, or might even be
suffering under still graver embarrassments, I
conceived it to be a duty to waive the ordinary
usages of society, and at once offer whatever
it was in my power to bestow, at the risk of
interrupting
concerns that they might possibly wish to
consider private. Using the precaution,
therefore
,
to make a little noise, as the best means of
announcing my approach, the door was gently
opened, and I presented myself to view. At first,
I was a little at a loss in what manner to address
the strangers; but, believing that a people who
spoke a language so difficult of utterance and so
rich as that I had just heard, like those who use
dialects derived from the Slavonian root, were
most probably the masters of all others; and
remembering
,
moreover, that French was a medium of
thought among all polite people, I determined to
have recourse to that tongue.
Messieurs et mesdames
, I said, inclining my
Vol. I. 12
body in salutation,
mille pardons pour celle intrusion
peu convenable
but, as I am writing in English,
it may be well to translate the speeches as I
proceed
;
although I abandon with regret the advantage
of going through them literally, and in the
appropriate
dialect in which they were orginally spoken.
Gentlemen and ladies, I said, inclining my body
in salutation, I ask a thousand pardons for this
inopportune intrusion on your retirement; but
overhearing
a few of what I much fear are but too
well grounded complaints, touching the false
position
in which you are placed, as the occupant of
this apartment, and in that light your host, I have
ventured to approach, with no other desire than
the wish that you would make me the repository
of all your griefs, in order, if possible, that they
may be repaired as soon as circumstances shall in
any manner allow.
The strangers were very naturally a little
startled
at my unexpected appearance, and at the
substance of what I had just said. I observed
that the two ladies were apparently, in some slight
degree, even distressed, the younger turning her
head on one side in maiden modesty, while the
elder, a duenna-sort-of-looking person, dropped
her eyes to the floor, but succeeded in better
maintaining her self-possession and gravity. The
eldest of the two gentlemen approached me with
dignified composure, after a moment of hesitation;
and, returning my salute, by waving his tail with
singular grace and decorum, he answered as
follows
.I
may as well state in this place, that he
spoke the French about as well as an Englishman
who has lived long enough on the continent to
fancy he can travel in the provinces without being
detected for a foreigner.
Au reste
, his accent was
slightly Russian, and his enunciation whistling and
harmonious. The females, especially in some of the
lower keys of their voices, made sounds not unlike
the sighing tones of the Eolian harp. It was
really
a pleasure to hear them; but I have often had
occasion to remark that, in every country but one
which I do not care to name, the language, when
uttered by the softer sex, takes new charms, and
is rendered more delightful to the ear.
Sir, said the stranger, when he had done
waving his tail, I should do great injustice to my
feelings, and to the monikin character in general,
were I to neglect expressing some small portion
of the gratitude I feel on the present occasion.
Destitute, houseless, insulted wanderers and
captives
,
fortune has at length shed a ray of happiness
on our miserable condition, and hope begins to
shine through the cloud of our distress, like a
passing
gleam of the sun. From my very tail, sir, in
my own name and in that of this excellent and
most prudent matron, and in those of these two
noble and youthful lovers, I thank youYes!
honorable
and humane being of the genus
homo
,
species
Anglicus
, we all return our most tail-felt
acknowledgments of your goodness!
Here the whole party gracefully bent the
ornaments
in question over their heads, touching their
receding foreheads with the several tips, and
bowed.I would have given ten thousand pounds,
at that moment, to have had a good investment in
tails, in order to emulate their form of courtesy;
but naked, shorn and destitute as I was, with a
feeling of humility, I was obliged to put my head
a little on one shoulder, and give the ordinary
English bob, in return for their more elaborate
politeness.
If I were merely to say, sir, I continued,
when the opening salutations were thus properly
exchanged, that I am charmed at this accidental
interview, the word would prove very insufficient
to express my delight. Consider this hotel as your
own; its domestics as your domestics; its stores
of condiments as your stores of condiments, and
its nominal tenant as your most humble servant
and friend. I have been greatly shocked at the
indignities to which you have hitherto been
exposed
,
and now promise you liberty, kindness, and
all those attentions to which, it is very apparent,
you are fully entitled by your birth, breeding, and
the delicacy of your sentiments. I congratulate
myself a thousand times for having been so
fortunate
as to make your acquaintance. My
greatest
desire has always been to stimulate the
sympathies
;
but, until to-day, various accidents have
confined the cultivation of this heaven-born
property
,
in a great measure, to my own species; I
now look forward, however, to a delicious career
of new-born interests in the whole of the animal
creation, I need scarcely say, in that of quadrupeds
of your family in particular.
Whether we belong to the class of quadrupeds
or not, is a question that has a good deal
embarrassed
our own
savans
, returned the stranger.
There is an ambiguity in our physical action that
renders the point a little questionable; and
therefore
,
I think, the higher castes of our natural
philosophers
rather prefer classing the entire monikin
species, with all its varieties, as caud-jactans,
or tail-wavers; adopting the term from the nobler
part of the animal formation. Is not this the better
opinion at home, my Lord Chatterino? he asked,
turning to the youth, who stood respectfully at his
side.
Such, I believe, my dear Doctor, was the last
classification sanctioned by the academy, the
young noble replied, with a readiness that proved
him to be both well-informed and intelligent, and,
at the same time, with a reserve of manner that
did equal credit to his modesty and breeding. The
question of whether we are or are not bipeds has
greatly agitated the schools for more than three
centuries.
The use of this gentleman's name, I hastily
rejoined, my dear sir, reminds me that we are
but half acquainted with each other. Permit me to
waive ceremony, and to announce myself, at once,
as Sir John Goldencalf, Baronet, of
Householder-Hall
,
in the Kingdom of Great Britain, a poor
admirer
of excellence wherever it is to be found, or
under whatever form, and a devotee of the system
of the `social-stake.'
I am happy to be admitted to the honor of this
formal introduction, Sir John. In return, I bag you
will suffer me to say that this young nobleman is, in
our own dialect, No. 6, purple; or, to translate the
appellation
,
my Lord Chatterino. This young lady is
No. 4, violet, or, my Lady Chatterissa. This
excellent
and prudent matron is No. 4,626,243, russet, or,
Mistress Vigilance Lynx, to translate her
appellation
also into the English tongue; and that I am
No. 22,817, brown-study-color, or, Dr. Reasono,
to give you a literal signification of my name,a
poor disciple of the philosophers of our race, an
LL. D., and a F. U. D. G. E., the travelling tutor of
this heir of one of the most illustrious and the most
ancient houses of the island of Leaphigh, in the
monikin section of mortality.
Every syllable, learned Dr. Reasono, that falls
from your revered lips, only whets curiosity, and
adds fuel to the flame of desire, tempting me to
inquire
further into your private history, your future
intentions, the polity of your species, and all those
interesting topics that will readily suggest
themselves
12*
to one of your quick apprehension and
extensive
acquirements. I dread being thought
indiscreet
;
and yet, putting yourself in my position, I
trust you will overlook a wish so natural and
ardent
.
Apology is unnecessary, Sir John, and nothing
would afford me greater satisfaction than to
answer
any and every inquiry you may be disposed
to make.
Then, sir, to cut short all useless
circumlocution
,
suffer me to ask at once an explanation of the
system of enumeration, by which you indicate
individuals
?
You are called No. 22,817,
brown-study-color
Or, Dr. Reasono. As you are an Englishman,
you will perhaps understand me better, if I refer to
a recent practice of the new London police. You
may have observed that the men wear letters in
red or white, and numbers on the capes of their
coats. By the letters, the passenger can refer to
the company of the officer, while the number
indicates
the individual. Now, the idea of this
improvement
came, I make no doubt, from our
system
,
under which society is divided into castes, for
the sake of harmony and subordination, and these
castes are designated by colors and shades of colors,
that are significant of their stations and pursuits
the individual, as in the new police, being known
by the number. Our own language being
exceedingly
sententious, is capable of expressing the most
elaborate of these combinations in a very few
sounds. I should add that there is no difference in
the manner of distinguishing the sexes, with the
exception that each is numbered apart, and each
has a counterpart-color to that of the same caste
in the other sex. Thus, purple and violet are both
noble, the former being masculine and the latter
feminine, and russet being the counterpart of
brown-study-color.
Andexcuse my natural ardor to know more
and do you bear these numbers and colors
marked
on your attire, in your own region?
As for attire, Sir John, the monikins are too
highly improved, mentally and physically, to need
any. It is known that in all cases, extremes meet.
The savage is nearer to nature than the merely
civilized being, and the creature that has passed
the mistifications of a middle state of improvement,
finds himself again approaching nearer to the habits,
the wishes, and the opinions of our common
mother
.
As the real gentleman is more simple in
manners than the distant imitator of his
deportment
;
as fashions and habits are always more
exaggerated
in provincial towns than in polished
capitals; or, as the profound philosopher has less
pretensions than the tyro, so does our common
genus, as it draws nearer to the consummation of
its destiny, and its highest attainments, learn to
reject
the most valued usages of the middle
condition
,
and to return, with ardor, towards nature, as
to a first love. It is on this principle, sir, that the
monikin family never wears clothes.
I could not but perceive that the ladies have
manifested some embarrassment ever since I
entered
,is
it possible, that their delicacy has taken
the alarm, at the state of my toilet?
At the toilet itself, Sir John, rather than at its
state, if I must speak plainly. The female mind,
trained as it is with us, from infancy upward, in
the habits and usages of nature, is shocked by any
departure from her rules. You will know how to
make allowances for the squeamishness of the sex,
for I believe it is much alike, in this particular, let
it come from what quarter of the earth it may.
I can only excuse the seeming want of
politeness
by my ignorance, Dr. Reasono. Before I ask
another question, the oversight shall be repaired. I
must retire into my own chamber for an instant,
gentlemen and ladies, and I beg you will find such
sources of amusement as first offer, until I can
return
.
There are nuts, I believe, in this closet;
sugar
is usually kept on that table, and perhaps the
ladies might find some relaxation by exercising
themselves on the chairs. In a single moment I
shall be with you again.
Hereupon, I withdrew into my bed-chamber, and
began to lay aside the dressing-gown, as well as
my shirt. Remembering, however, that I was but
too liable to colds in the head, I returned to ask
Dr. Reasono to step in where I was for an instant.
On mentioning the difficulty, this excellent person
assumed the office of preparing his female friends
to overlook the slight innovation of my still
wearing
the night-cap and slippers.
The ladies would think nothing of it, the
philosopher
good-humoredly remarked, by way of
lessening my regrets at having wounded their
sensibilities
,
were you even to appear in a military
cloak and Hessian boots, provided, it was not
thought that you were of their acquaintance, and
in their immediate society. I think you must have
often remarked among the sex of your own
species
,
who are frequently quite indifferent to nudities
(their prejudices running counter to ours,) that
appear
in the streets, but which would cause them
instantly to run out of the room, when exhibited in
the person of an acquaintance; these conventional
asides being tolerated everywhere, by a judicious
concession of punctilios that might otherwise
become
insupportable.
The distinction is too reasonable to require
another
word of explanation, dear sir. Now, let us
rejoin the ladies, since I am, at length, in some
degree
,
fit to be seen.
I was rewarded for this bit of delicate attention,
by an approving smile from the lovely Chatterissa,
and good Mistress Lynx no longer kept her eyes
riveted on the floor, but bent them on me, with
looks of admiration and gratitude.
Now that this little
contre-tems
is no longer an
obstacle, I resumed, permit me to continue those
inquiries which you have hitherto answered with
so much amenity, and so satisfactorily. As you
have no clothes, in what manner is the parallel
between
your usage and that of the new London
police
practically completed?
Although we have no clothes, Nature, whose
laws are never violated with impunity, but who is
as beneficent as she is absolute, has furnished us
with a downy covering to supply their places,
wherever clothes are needed for comfort. We have
coats that defy fashions, require no tailors, and
never lose their naps. But it would be
inconvenient
to be totally clad in this manner; and,
therefore
,
the palms of our hands are, as you see,
ungloved
;
the portions of the frame on which we seat
ourselves are left uncovered, most probably lest
some inconvenience should arise from taking
accidental
and unfavorable positions. This is the part
of the monikin frame the best adapted for receiving
paint, and the numbers of which I have spoken are
periodically renewed there, at public offices
appointed
for that purpose. Our characters are so minute as
to escape the human eye; but by using that
opera-glass
,
I make no doubt that you may still see some
of my own enregistration, although, alas! unusual
friction, great misery, and, I may say, unmerited
wrongs, have nearly un-monikined me in this, as
well as in various other, particulars.
As Dr. Reasono had the complaisance to turn
round, and to use his tail like the index of a black
board, by aid of the glass, I very distinctly traced
the figures to which he alluded. Instead of being
in paint, however, as he had given me reason to
anticipate, they seemed to be branded, or burnt
in, indelibly, as we commonly mark horses, thieves,
and negroes. On mentioning the fact to the
philosopher
,
it was explained with his usual facility
and politeness.
You are quite right, sir, he said; the
omission
of paint was to prevent tautology, an offence
against the simplicity of the monikin dialect, as
well as against monikin taste, that would have
been sufficient, under our opinions, even to
overturn
the government.
Tautology!
Tautology, Sir John; on examining the
background
of the picture, you will perceive that it is
already of a dusky, sombre hue; now, this being
of a meditative and grave character, has been
denominated by our academy the `
brown-study-color
;'
and it would clearly have been
supererogatory
to lay the same tint upon it. No, sir; we
avoid repetitions even in our prayers, deeming
them to be so many proofs of an illogical and of
an anti-consecutive mind.
The system is admirable, and I see new
beauties
at each moment. You enjoy the advantage,
for instance, under this mode of enumeration, of
knowing your acquaintances from behind, quite as
well as if you met them face to face!
The suggestion is ingenious, showing an active
and an observant mind; but it does not quite reach
the motive of the
politico-numerical-identity-system
of which we are speaking. The objects of
this arrangement are altogether of a higher and
more useful nature; nor do we usually recognize
our friends by their countenances, which at the
best are no more than so many false signals, but
by their tails.
This is admirable! What a facility you
possess
for recognizing an acquaintance, who may
happen to be up a tree! But may I presume to
inquire, Dr. Reasono, what are the most approved
of the advantages of the
politico-numerical-identity-system
?
For impatience is devouring my vitals.
They are connected with the interests of
government
.
You know, sir, that society is
established
for the purposes of governments, and
governments
,
themselves, mainly to facilitate contributions
and taxations. Now, by the numerical system,
we have every opportunity of including the whole
monikin race in the collections, as they are
periodically
checked off by their numbers. The
idea was a happy thought of an eminent statician
of ours, who gained great credit at court by the
invention, and, in fact, who was admitted to the
academy in consequence of its ingenuity.
Still it must be admitted, my dear Doctor,
put in Lord Chatterino, always with the modesty,
and perhaps I might add, with the generosity of
youth, that there are some among us who deny
that society was made for governments, and who
maintain that governments were made for society;
or, in other words, for monikins.
Mere theorists, my good Lord; and their
opinions, even if true, are never practised on.
Practice is every thing in political matters; and
theories are of no use, except as they confirm
practice.
Both theory and practice are perfect, I cried;
and I make no doubt that the classification into
colors
,
or castes, enables the authorities to commence
the imposts with the richest, or the `purples.'
Sir, monikin prudence never lays the
foundation-stone
at the summit; it seeks the base of the
edifice; and as contributions are the walls of
society, we commence with the bottom. When
you shall know us better, Sir John Goldencalf,
you will begin to comprehend the beauty and
benevolence of the entire monikin economy.
I now adverted to the frequent use of this word
monikin; and, admitting my ignorance, desired
an explanation of the term, as well as a more
general insight into the origin, history, hopes, and
polity of the interesting strangers; if they can be
so called who were already so well known to me.
Dr. Reasono admitted that the request was natural
and was entitled to respect; but he delicately
suggested
the necessity of sustaining the animal
functions
by nutriment, intimating that the ladies had
supped but in an indifferent way the evening
before, and acknowledging that, philosopher as he
was, he should go through the desired explanations
after improving the slight acquaintance he had
already made with certain condiments in one of
the
armoires
, with far more zeal and point, than
could possibly be done in the present state of his
appetite. The suggestion was so very plausible
that there was no resisting it; and, suppressing
my curiosity as well as I could, the bell was rung,
I retired to my bed-chamber to resume so much
of my attire as was necessary to the
semi-civilization
of man, and then the necessary orders were
given to the domestics, who, by the way, were
suffered to remain under the influence of those
ordinary and vulgar prejudices that are pretty
generally entertained by the human, against the
monikin family.
Previously to separating from my new friend
Dr. Reasono, however, I took him aside, and
stated that I had an acquaintance in the hotel, a
person of singular philosophy, after the human
fashion, and a great traveller; and that I desired
permission to let him into the secret of our intended
lecture on the monikin economy, and to bring
him with me as an auditor. To this request, No.
22,817, brown-study-color, or Dr. Reasono, gave
a very cordial assent; hinting delicately, at the
same time, his expectation that this new auditor,
who, of course, was no other than Captain Noah
Poke, would not deem it disparaging to his
manhood
,
to consult the sensibilities of the ladies, by
appearing in the garments of that only decent and
respectable tailor and draper, nature. To this
suggestion I gave a ready approval; when each
went his way, after the usual salutations of bowing
and tail-waving, with a mutual promise of being
punctual to the appointment.
CHAPTER X.
A great deal of negotiation, in which human shrewdness is
completely shamed, and human ingenuity is shown to be
of a very secondary quality.
Mr. Poke
listened to my account of all that had
passed, with a very sedate gravity. He informed
me that he had witnessed so much ingenuity among
the seals, and had known so many brutes that
seemed to have the sagacity of men, and so many
men who appeared to have the stupidity of
brutes, that he had no difficulty whatever in
believing
Vol. I. 13
every word I told him. He expressed his
satisfaction, too, at the prospect of hearing a
lecture
on natural philosophy and political economy
from the lips of a monkey; although he took
occasion
to intimate that no desire to learn anything
lay at the bottom of his compliance; for, in his
country, these matters were very generally studied
in the district schools, the very children who ran
about the streets of `Stunin'tun' usually knowing
more than most of the old people in foreign parts.
Still a monkey might have some new ideas; and,
for his part, he was willing to hear what every
one had to say; for, if a man did'nt put in a word
for himself, in this world, he might be certain no
one else would take the pains to speak for him.
But when I came to mention the details of the
programme
of the forthcoming interview, and
stated that it was expected the audience would
wear their own skins, out of respect to the ladies,
I greatly feared that my friend would have so far
excited himself as to go into fits. The rough old
sealer swore some terrible oaths, protesting that
he would not make a monkey of himself, by
appearing
in this garb, for all the monikin
philosophers
,
or high-born females, that could be stowed
in a ship's hold; that he was very liable to take
cold; that he once knew a man who undertook to
play beast in this manner, and the first thing the
poor devil knew, he had great claws and a tail
sprouting out of him; a circumstance that he had
always attributed to a just judgment for striving
to make himself more than Providence had
intended
him for; that, provided a man's ears were
naked, he could hear just as well as if his whole
body was naked; that he did not complain of the
monkeys going in their skins, and that they ought,
in reason, not to meddle with his clothes; that he
should be scratching himself the whole time, and
thinking what a miserable figure he cut; that he
would have no place to keep his tobacco; that he
was apt to be deaf when he was cold; that he
would be dd if he did any such thing; that
human natur' and monkey natur' were not the same,
and it was not to be expected that men and
monkeys
should follow exactly the same fashions; that
the meeting would have the appearance of a
boxing-match
,
instead of a philosophical lecture; that
he never heard of such a thing at Stunin'tun; that
he should feel sneaking at seeing his own shins in
the presence of ladies; that a ship always made
better weather under some canvas, than under
bare poles; that he might possibly be brought to
his shirt and pantaloons, but as for giving up these,
he would as soon think of cutting the sheet-anchor
off his bows, with the vessel driving on a lee-shore;
that flesh and blood were flesh and blood, and they
liked their comfort; that he should think the whole
time he was about to go in a swimming, and
should be looking about for a good place to dive;
together with a great many more similar
objections
,
that have escaped me in the multitude of
things of greater interest which have since
occupied
my time. I have frequently had occasion to
observe, that, when a man has one good, solid
reason for his decision, it is no easy matter to
shake it; but, that he who has a great many,
usually finds them of far less account in the
struggle of opinions. Such proved to be the fact
with Captain Poke on the present occasion. I
succeeded
in stripping him of his garments, one by
one, until I got him reduced to the shirt, where,
like a stout ship that is easily brought to her
bearings by the breeze, he `stuck and hung' in
a manner to manifest it would require a heavy
strain to bring him down any lower. A lucky
thought relieved us all from the dilemma. There
were a couple of good large bison-skins among
my effects, and on suggesting to Dr. Reasono the
expediency of encasing Captain Poke in the folds
of one of them, the philosopher cheerfully assented,
observing that any object of a
natural
and
simple
formation was agreeable to the monikin senses;
their objections were merely to the deformities of
art, which they deemed to be so many offences
against Providence. On this explanation, I
ventured
to hint that, being still in the infancy of the
new civilization, it would be very agreeable to my
ancient habits, could I be permitted to use one of
the skins, also, while Mr. Poke occupied the other.
Not the slightest objection was raised to the
proposal
,
and measures were immediately taken to
prepare us to appear in good company. Soon
after I received from Dr. Reasono a
protocol
of
the conditions that were to regulate the
approaching
interview. This document was written in
Latin, out of respect to the ancients, and as I
afterwards
understood, it was drawn up by my Lord
Chatterino, who had been educated for the
diplomatic
career at home, previously to the accident
which had thrown him, alas! into human hands. I
translate it freely, for the benefit of the ladies, who
usually prefer their own tongues to any others.
Protocol
of an interview that is to take place
between Sir John Goldencalf, Bart., of
Householder
Hall, in the kingdom of Great Britain, and
No. 22,817, brown-study-colour, or Socrates
Reasono
,
F. U. D. G. E., Professor of Probabilities in
the University of Monikinia, and in the kingdom
of Leaphigh:
The contracting parties agree as follows, viz.
Article
1. That there shall be an interview.
Art.
2. That the said interview shall be a
peaceable
interview, and not a belligerent interview.
Art.
3. That the said interview shall be logical,
explanatory, and discursory.
Art.
4. That during said interview, Dr.
Reasono
shall have the privilege of speaking most,
and Sir John Goldencalf the privilege of hearing
most.
Art.
5. That Sir John Goldencalf shall have
the privilege of asking questions, and Dr. Reasono
the privilege of answering them.
Art.
6. That a due regard shall be had to both
human and monikin prejudices and sensibilities.
Art.
7. That Dr. Reasono, and any monikins
who may accompany him, shall smooth their coats,
and otherwise dispose of their natural vestments,
in a way that shall be as agreeable as possible to
Sir John Goldencalf and his friend.
Art.
8. That Sir John Goldencalf, and any man
who may accompany him, shall appear in
bison-skins
,
wearing no other clothing, in order to render
themselves as agreeable as possible to Dr. Reasono
and his friends.
Art.
9. That the conditions of this
protocol
shall
be respected.
Art.
10. That any doubtful significations in this
protocol
shall be interpreted, as near as may be, in
favor of both parties.
Art.
11. That no precedent shall be established
to the prejudice of either the human or the
monikin
dialect, by the adoption of the Latin language
on this occasion.
Delighted with this proof of attention on the part
of my Lord Chatterino, I immediately left a card
for that young nobleman, and then seriously set
about preparing myself, with an increased
scrupulousness
,
13 *
for the fulfilment of the smallest condition
of the compact. Capt. Poke was soon ready, and
I must say that he looked more like a quadruped
on its hind legs, in his new attire, than a human
being. As for my own appearance, I trust it was
such as became my station and character.
At the appointed time all the parties were
assembled
,
Lord Chatterino appearing with a copy
of the
protocol
in his hand. This instrument was
formally read, by the young peer, in a very
creditable
manner, when a silence ensued, as if to
invite
comment. I know not how it is, but I never
yet heard the positive stipulations of any bargain,
that I did not feel a propensity to look out for
weak places in them. I had begun to see that
the discussion might lead to argument, argument
to comparisons between the two species, and
something like an
esprit de corps
was stirring within
me. It now struck me that a question might be
fairly raised as to the propriety of Dr. Reasono's
appearing with
three
backers, while I had but
one
.
The objection was, therefore, urged on my part, I
hope in a modest and conciliatory manner. In
reply, my Lord Chatterino observed, it was true
the
protocol
spoke in general terms of mutual
supporters
,
but if
Sir John Goldencalf would be at the trouble
of referring to the instrument itself, he would see
that the backers of Dr. Reasono were mentioned in
the
plural
number, while that of Sir John himself
was alluded to only in the
singular
number.
Perfectly true, my Lord; but you will,
however
,
permit me to remark, that
two
Monikins
would completely fulfil the conditions in favor of
Dr. Reasono, while he appears here with
three;
there certainly must be some limits to this plurality,
or the Doctor would have a right to attend the
interview accompanied by all the inhabitants of
Leaphigh.
The objection is highly ingenious, and
creditable
in the last degree to the diplomatic abilities
of Sir John Goldencalf; but, among monikins, two
females
are deemed equal to only one male, in the
eye of the law. Thus, in cases which require two
witnesses, as in conveyances of real estate, two
male
monikins are sufficient, whereas it would
be necessary to have
four female
signatures, in
order to give the instrument validity. In the legal
sense, therefore, I conceive that Dr. Reasono is
attended by only
two
monikins.
Captain Poke hereupon observed that this
provision
in the law of Leaphigh was a good one; for
he had often had occasion to remark that women,
quite half the time, did not know what they were
about; and he thought, in general, that they require
more ballast than men.
This reply would completely cover the case,
my Lord, I answered, were the
protocol
purely
a monikin document, and this assembly purely a
monikin assembly. But the facts are notoriously
otherwise. The document is drawn up in a
common
vehicle of thought among scholars, and I
gladly seize the opportunity to add, that I do not
remember to have seen a better specimen of
modern
latinity.
It is undeniable, Sir John, returned Lord
Chatterino, waving his tail in acknowledgment of
the compliment, that the
protocol
itself, is in a
language that has now become common property;
but the mere medium of thought, on such
occasions
,
is of no great moment, provided it is
neutral
as respects the contracting parties; moreover,
in this particular case, article 11th of the
protocol
contains a stipulation that no legal consequences
whatever are to follow the use of the Latin
language
;
a stipulation that leaves the contracting
parties
in possession of their original rights, Now,
as the lecture is to be a monikin lecture, given
by a monikin philosopher, and on monikin grounds,
I humbly urge that it is proper the interview should
generally be conducted on monikin principles.
If by monikin grounds, is meant monikin
ground, (which I have a right to assume, since
the greater necessarily includes the less,) I beg
leave to remind your Lordship, that the parties
are, at this moment, in a neutral country, and
that, if either of them can set up a claim of
territorial
jurisdiction, or the rights of the flag, these
claims must be admitted to be human, since the
locataire
of this apartment is a man, in control of
the
locus in quo
, and
pro hac vice
, the suzerain.
Your ingenuity has greatly exceeded my
construction
,
Sir John, and I beg leave to amend my
plea.All I mean is, that the leading consideration
in this interview, is a monikin interestthat we
are met to propound, explain, digest, animadvert
on, and embellish a monikin themethat the
accessory must be secondary to the principal
that the lesser must merge, not in your sense, but
in my sense, in the greaterand, by consequence,
that
You will accord me your pardon, my dear
Lord, but I hold
Nay, my good Sir John, I trust to your
intelligence
to be excused if I say
One word, my Lord Chatterino, I pray you,
in order that
A thousand, very cheerfully, Sir John, but
My Lord Chatterino!
Sir John Goldencalf!
Hereupon we both began talking at the same
time, the noble young monikin gradually
narrowing
down the direction of his observations to
the single person of Mrs. Vigilance Lynx, who, I
afterwards had occasion to know, was an
excellent
listener; and I, in my turn, after wandering
from eye to eye, settled down into a sort of
oration
that was especially addressed to the
understanding
of Captain Noah Poke, My auditor
contrived to get one ear entirely clear of the
bison's skin, and nodded approbation of what fell
from me, with a proper degree of human and
clannish spirit. We might possibly have harangued
in this desultory manner, to the present time, had
not the amiable Chatterissa advanced, and, with
the fact and delicacy which distinguish her sex,
by placing her pretty
patte
on the mouth of the
young nobleman, she effectually checked his
volubility
.
When a horse is running away, he usually
comes to a dead stop, after driving through lanes,
and gates, and turnpikes, the moment he finds
himself master of his own movements, in an open
field. Thus, in my own case, no sooner did I find
myself in sole possession of the argument, than I
brought it to a close. Dr. Reasono improved the
pause, to introduce a proposition that, the
experiment
already made by myself and Lord Chatterino
being evidently a failure, he and Mr. Poke should
retire and make an effort to agree upon an
entirely
new
programme
of the proceedings. This
happy thought suddenly restored peace; and, while
the two negotiators were absent, I improved the
opportunity to become better acquainted with the
lovely Chatterissa and her female Mentor. Lord
Chatterino, who possessed all the graces of
diplomacy
,
who could turn from a hot and angry
discussion
,
on the instant, to the most bland and
winning
courtesy, was foremost in promoting my
wishes, inducing his charming mistress to throw
aside the reserve of a short acquaintance, and to
enter, at once, into a free and friendly discourse.
Some time elapsed before the plenipotentiaries
returned; for it appears that, owing to a
constitutional
peculiarity, or, as he subsequently explained
it himself, a `Stunin'tun principle,' Captain Poke
conceived he was bound, in a bargain, to dispute
every proposition which came from the other party.
This difficulty would probably have proved
insuperable
,
had not Dr. Reasono luckily bethought
him of a frank and liberal proposal to leave every
other article, without reserve, to the sole dictation
of his colleague, reserving to himself the same
privilege for all the rest. Noah, after being well
assured that the philosopher was no lawyer,
assented
;
and the affair, once begun in this spirit
of concession, was soon brought to a close. And
here I would recommend this happy expedient to
all negotiators of knotty and embarrassing treaties,
since it enables each party to gain his point, and
probably leaves as few openings for subsequent
disputes, as any other mode that has yet been
adopted. The new instrument ran as follows, it
having been written, in duplicate, in English and in
Monikin. It will be seen that the pertinacity of
one of the negotiators gave it very much the
character
of a capitulation.
Protocol
of an interview, &c. &c. &c.
The contracting parties agree as follows, viz.
Article
1. There shall be an interview.
Art.
2. Agreed; provided all the parties can
come and go at pleasure.
Art.
3. The said interview shall be conducted,
generally, on philosophical and liberal principles.
Art.
4. Agreed; provided tobacco may be used
at discretion.
Art.
5. That either party shall have the
privilege
of propounding questions, and either party
the privilege of answering them.
Art.
6. Agreed; provided no one need listen,
or no one talk, unless so disposed.
Art.
7. The attire of all present shall be
conformable
to the abstract rules of propriety and
decorum.
Art.
8. Agreed; provided the bison-skins may
be reefed, from time to time, according to the
state of the weather.
Art.
9. The provisions of this protocol shall be
rigidly respected.
Art.
10. Agreed; provided no advantage be
taken by lawyers.
Lord Chatterino and myself pounced upon the
respective documents like two hawks, eagerly
looking for flaws, or the means of maintaining the
opinions we had before advanced, and which we
had both shown so much cleverness in supporting.
Why, my Lord, there is no provision for the
appearance of any Monikins at all at this
interview
!
The generality of the terms leaves it to be
inferred that all may come and go who may be so
disposed.
Your pardon, my Lord; article 8 contains a
direct allusion to
bison-skins
in the
plural
, and
under circumstances from which it follows, by a
just deduction, that it was contemplated that more
than
one
wearer of the said skins should be present
at the said interview.
Perfectly just, Sir John; but you will suffer
me to observe that by article 1, it is conditioned
that there shall be an interview; and by article 3,
it is furthermore agreed that the said interview
shall be conducted `on philosophical and
liberal
principles;' now, it need scarcely be urged, good
Sir John, that it would be the extreme of
illiberality
to deny to one party any privilege that was
possessed
by the other.
Perfectly just, my Lord, were this an affair
of mere courtesy; but legal constructions must be
made on legal principles, or else, as jurists and
diplomatists, we are all afloat on the illimitable
ocean of conjecture.
And yet article 10 expressly stipulates that
`no advantage shall be taken by lawyers.' By
considering articles 3, and 10, profoundly and in
conjunction, we learn that it was the intention of
the negotiators to spread the mantle of liberality,
apart from all the subtilties and devices of mere
legal practitioners, over the whole proceedings.
Permit me, in corroboration of what is now urged,
to appeal to the voices of those who framed the
very conditions about which we are now arguing.
Did
you
, sir, continued my Lord Chatterino,
turning to Captain Poke, with emphasis and
dignity
;
did you, sir, when you drew up this
celebrated
article 10did you deem that you were
publishing authority of which the lawyers could
take advantage?
A deep and very sonorous No, was the
energetic
reply of Mr. Poke.
My Lord Chatterino, then turning, with equal
grace, to the Doctor, first diplomatically waving
his tail three times, continued:
And you, sir, in drawing up article 3did you
conceive that you were supporting and
promulgating
illiberal
principles?
The question was met by a prompt negative;
when the young noble paused, and looked at me,
like one who had completely triumphed.
Perfectly eloquent, completely convincing,
irrefutably
argumentative, and unanswerably just, my
Lord, I put in; but I must be permitted to hint
that the validity of all laws is derived from the
enactment:
now the enactment, or, in the case of
a treaty, the virtue of the stipulation, is not derived
from the
intention
of the party who may happen
to
draw up a law
or
a clause
, but from the
assent
of the
legal deputies
. In the present instance, there
are two negotiators, and I now ask permission to
address a few questions to them, reversing the
order of your own interrogatories; and the result
may possibly furnish a clue to the
quo animo
, in a
new light. Addressing the philosopher, I
continued
Did
you
, sir, in assenting to article 10,
imagine that you were defeating justice,
countenancing
oppression, and succouring might to the
injury of right?
The answer was a solemn, and, I do not doubt,
a very conscientious, No.
And
you
, sir, turning to Captain Poke, did
you, in assenting to article 3, in the least conceive
that, by any possibility, the foes of humanity could
torture your approbation into the means of
determining
that the bison-skin wearers were not to be
upon a perfect footing with the best Monikins of
the land?
Blast me, if I did!
But, Sir John Goldencalf, the Socratic method
of reasoning
Was first resorted to by yourself, my Lord
Nay, good Sir
Permit me, my dear Lord
Sir John
My Lord
Vol. I. 14
Hereupon the gentle Chatterissa again advanced,
and by another timely interposition of her graceful
tact, she succeeded in preventing the reply. The
parallel of the runaway horse was acted over,
and I came to another stand-still. Lord
Chatterino
now gallantly proposed that the whole affair
should be referred, with full powers, to the ladies.
I could not refuse; and the plenipotentiaries retired,
under a growling accompaniment of Captain Poke,
who pretty plainly declared that women caused
more quarrels than all the rest of the world, and,
from the little he had seen, he expected it would
turn out the same with monikinas.
The female sex certainly possess a facility of
composition that is denied our portion of the
creation
.
In an incredibly short time, the referees
returned with the following
programme
.
Protocol
of an interview between, &c. &c.
The contracting parties agree as follows, viz.
Article
1. There shall be an amicable, logical,
philosophical, ethical, liberal, general, and
controversial
interview.
Art.
2. The interview shall be amicable
Art.
3. The interview shall be general.
Art.
4. The interview shall be logical.
Art.
5. The interview shall be ethical.
Art.
6. The interview shall be philosophical.
Art.
7. The interview shall be liberal.
Art.
8. The interview shall be controversial.
Art.
9. The interview shall be controversial,
liberal, philosophical, ethical, logical, general, and
amicable.
Art.
10. The interview shall be as particularly
agreed upon.
The cat does not leap upon the mouse with more
avidity than Lord Chatterino and myself pounced
upon the third
protocol
, seeking new grounds for
the argument that each was resolved on.
Auguste! cher Auguste!
exclaimed the lovely
Chatterissa, in the prettiest Parisian accent I
thought I had ever heardPour moi!
A moi!
Monseigneur, I put in, flourishing my
copy of the protocolI was checked in the midst
of this controversial ardor, by a tug at the
bisonskin
;
when, casting a look behind me, I saw
Captain
Poke winking and making other signs that he
wished to say a word in a corner.
I think, Sir John, observed the worthy sealer,
if we ever mean to let this bargain come to a
catastrophe
,
it might as well be done now. The females
have been cunning, but the deuce is in it if we
can't weather upon two women before the matter
is well over. In Stunin'tun, when it is thought
best to accommodate proposals, why we object
and raise a breeze in the beginning, but towards
the end we kinder soften and mollify, or else trade
would come to a stand. The hardest gale must
blow its pipe out. Trust to me to floor the best
argument the best monkey of them all can
agitate
!
This matter is getting serious, Noah, and I am
filled with an
espril de corps
. Do you not begin
yourself to feel human?
Kinder; but more bisonish than any thing
else. Let them go on, Sir John; and, when the
time comes, we will take them aback, or set me
down as a pettifogger.
The Captain winked knowingly; and I began to
see that there was some sense in his opinion. On
rejoining our friends, or allies, I scarce know
which to call them, I found that the amiable
Chatterissa
had equally calmed the diplomatic ardor of
her lover, again; and we now met on the best
possible
terms. The
protocol
was accepted by
acclamation
;
and preparations were instantly
commenced
for the lecture of Dr. Reasono.
CHAPTER XI.
A philosophy that is bottomed on something substantial
Some reasons plainly presented, and cavilling objections
put to flight, by a charge of logical bayonets.
Dr. Reasono
was quite as reasonable, in the
personal
embellishments of his lyceum, as any public
lecturer I remember to have seen, who was
required
to execute his functions in the presence of ladies.
If I say that his coat had been brushed, his tail
newly curled, and that his air was a little more than
usually solemnized, as Captain Poke described
it in a decent whisper, I believe all will be said
that is either necessary or true. He placed
himself
behind a footstool, which served as a table,
smoothed its covering a little with his paws, and
at once proceeded to business. It may be well to
add that he lectured without notes, and, as the
subject did not immediately call for experiments,
without any apparatus.
Waving his tail towards the different parts of
the room in which his audience were seated, the
philosopher commenced.
As the present occasion, my hearers, he said,
is one of those accidental calls upon science, to
which all belonging to the academies are liable,
and does not demand more than the heads of our
thesis to be explained, I shall not dig into the roots
of the subject, but limit myself to such general
remarks as may serve to furnish the outlines of our
philosophy, natural, moral and political
How, sir, I cried, have you a political as
well as a moral philosophy?
Beyond a question; and a very useful
philosophy
it is. No interests require more philosophy
than those connected with politics.To resume,
our philosophy, natural, moral and political,
reserving
most of the propositions, demonstrations, and
corollaries, for greater leisure, and a more
advanced
state of information in the class.
Prescribing
to myself these salutary limits, therefore, I
shall begin only with Nature.
Nature is a term that we use to express the
pervading and governing principle of created
things. It is known both as a generic and a specific
term, signifying in the former character the
elements
and combinations of omnipotence, as applied
to matter in general, and in the latter, its
particular
subdivisions, in connexion with matter in its
infinite varieties. It is moreover subdivided into its
physical and moral attributes, which admit also
of the two grand distinctions just named. Thus,
when we say Nature, in the abstract, meaning
physically, we would be understood as alluding to
those general, uniform, absolute, consistent, and
beautiful laws, which control and render
harmonious
,
as a great whole, the entire action,
affinities
,
and destinies of the universe; and when we
say Nature in the speciality, we would be
understood
to speak of the nature of a rock, of a tree,
of air, fire, water, and land. Again; in alluding
to a moral Nature in the abstract, we mean sin,
and its weaknesses, its attractions, its deformities;
in a word, its totality; while, on the other hand,
when we use the term, in this sense, under the
14*
limits of a speciality, we confine its signification
to the particular shades of natural qualities that
mark the precise object named. Let us illustrate
our positions by a few brief examples.
When we say `O Nature! how art thou
glorious
,
sublime, instructive!'we mean that her
laws emanate from a power of infinite intelligence
and perfection; and when we say `O Nature!
how art thou frail, vain and insufficient!' we mean
that she is, after all, but a secondary quality,
inferior
to that which brought her into existence, for
definite, limited, and, doubtless, useful purposes.
In these examples, we treat the principle in the
abstract.
The examples of nature in the speciality will
be more familiar, and, although in no degree more
true, will be better understood by the generality
of my auditors. Especial nature, in the physical
signification, is apparent to the senses, and is
betrayed in the outward forms of things, through
their force, magnitude, substance, and proportions;
and, in its more mysterious properties, to
examination
,
by their laws, harmony, and action.
Especial
moral nature is denoted in the different
propensities
,
capacities and conduct of the different
classes of all moral beings. In this latter sense
we have monikin nature, dog nature, horse nature,
hog nature, human nature
Permit me, Dr. Reasono, I interrupted, to
inquire if, by this classification, you intend to
convey
more than may be understood by the accidental
arrangement of your examples?
Purely the latter, I do assure you, Sir John.
And do you admit the great distinctions of
animal and vegetable natures?
Our academies are divided on this point. One
school contends that all living nature is to be
embraced
in a great comprehensive genus, while
another admits of the distinctions you have named.
I am of the latter opinion, inclining to the belief
that Nature herself has drawn the line between
the two classes, by bestowing on one the double
gift of the moral and physical nature, and by
with-holding
the former from the other. The existence
of the moral nature is denoted by the presence of
the will. The academy of Leaphigh has made an
elaborate classification of all the known animals,
of which the sponge is at the bottom of the list,
and the monikin at the top.
Sponges are commonly uppermost, growled
Noah.
Sir, said I, with a disagreeable rising at the
throat, am I to understand that your savans
account man an animal in a middle state between
a sponge and a monkey?
Really, Sir John, this warmth is quite unsuited
to philosophical discussionif you continue to
indulge in it, I shall find myself compelled to
postpone the lecture.
At this rebuke I made a successful effort to
restrain myself, although my
esprit de corps
nearly
choked me. Intimating, as well as I could, a
change of purpose, Dr. Reasono, who had stood
suspended over his table with an air of doubt,
waved his tail, and proceeded:
Sponges, oysters, crabs, sturgeons, clams, toads,
snakes, lizards, skunks, opossums, ant-eaters,
baboons
,
negroes, wood-chucks, lions, esquimaux,
sloths, hogs, hottentots, ourang-outangs, men and
monikins are, beyond a question, all animals. The
only disputed point among us is, whether they are
all of the same genus, forming varieties or species,
or whether they are to be divided into the three
great families of the
improvables
, the
unimprova
bles
, and the
retrogressives
. They who maintain
that we form but one great family, reason by
certain
conspicuous analogies, that serve as so many
links to unite the great chain of the animal world.
Taking man as a centre, for instance, they show
that this creature possesses, in common with every
other creature, some observable property. Thus,
man is, in one particular, like a sponge; in another,
he is like an oyster; a hog is like a man; the skunk
has one peculiarity of a man; the ourang-outang
another; the sloth another
King!
And so on, to the end of the chapter. This
school of philosophers, while it has been very
ingeniously supported, is not, however, the one
most in favor, just at this moment, in the academy
of Leaphigh
Just at this moment, Doctor!
Certainly, sir. Do you not know that truths,
physical as well as moral, undergo their
revolutions
,
the same as all created nature? The
academy
has paid great attention to this subject; and
it issues annually an almanack, in which the
different
phases, the revolutions, the periods, the
eclipses, whether partial or total, the distances
from the centre of light, the
apogee
and
perigee
of
all the more prominent truths, are calculated, with
singular accuracy; and by the aid of which the
cautious are enabled to keep themselves, as near
as possible, within the bounds of reason. We
deem this effort of the monikin mind as the
sublimest
of all its inventions, and as furnishing the
strongest known evidence of its near approach to
the consummation of our earthly destiny. This
is not the place to dwell on that particular point
of our philosophy, however; and, for the present,
we will postpone the subject.
Yet you will permit me, Dr. Reasono, in virtue
of clause 1, article 5,
protocol
No. 1, (which
protocol
,
if not absolutely adopted, must be supposed
to contain the
spirit
of that which was,) to inquire
whether the calculations of the revolutions of truth,
do not lead to dangerous moral extravagancies,
ruinous speculations in ideas, and serve to unsettle
society?
The philosopher withdrew a moment with my
Lord Chatterino, to consult whether it would be
prudent to admit of the validity of
protocol
No. 1,
even in this indirect manner; whereupon it was
decided
between them, that, as such admission would
lay open all the vexatious questions that had just
been so happily disposed of, clause 1 of article 5
having a direct connexion with clause 2; clauses
1 and 2 forming the whole article; and the said
article 5, in its entirety, forming an integral
portion
of the whole instrument; and the doctrine of
constructions enjoining that instruments are to be
construed, like wills, by their general, and not by
their especial, tendencies, it would be dangerous
to the objects of the interview to allow the
application
to be granted. But, reserving a protest
against the concession being interpreted into a
precedent, it might be well to concede that, as an
act of courtesy, which was denied as a right.
Hereupon, Dr. Reasono informed me that these
calculations of the revolutions of truth
did
lead to
certain moral extravagancies, and in many
instances
to ruinous speculations in ideas; that the
academy of Leaphigh, and so far as his
information
extended, the academy of every other country,
had found the subject of
truth
, more particularly
moral
truth, the one of all others the most difficult
to manage, the most likely to be abused, and the
most dangerous to promulgate. I was moreover
promised, at a future day, some illustrations of
this branch of the subject.
To pursue the more regular thread of my
lecture
,
continued Dr. Reasono, when he had
politely
made this little digression, we now divide
these portions of the created world into animated
and vegetable nature; the former is again divided
into the
improvable
and the
unimprovable
, and the
retrogressive
. The improvable embraces all those
species which are marching, by slow, progressive,
but immutable mutations, towards the perfection
of terrestrial life, or to that last, elevated, and
sublime condition of mortality, in which the
material
makes its final struggle with the immaterial
mind with matter. The improvable class of
animals
,
agreeably to the monikin dogmas,
commences
with those species in which matter has
the most unequivocal ascendency, and terminates
with those in which mind is as near perfection as
this mortal coil will allow. We hold that mind
and matter, in that mysterious union which
connects
the spiritual with the physical being,
commence
in the medium state, undergoing, not, as
some men have pretended, transmigrations of the
soul only, but such gradual and imperceptible
changes of both soul and body, as have peopled
the world with so many wonderful beings;
wonderful
,
mentally and physically; and all of which
(meaning all of the
improvable
class) are no more
than animals of the same great genus, on the high
road of tendencies, who are advancing towards
the last stage of improvement, previously to their
final translation to another planet, and a new
existence
.
The
retrogressive
class is composed of those
specimens
which, owing to their destiny, take a false
direction; which, instead of tending to the
immaterial
,
tend to the material; which gradually become
more and more under the influence of matter, until,
by a succession of physical translations, the will is
eventually lost, and they become incorporated with
the earth itself. Under this last transformation,
these purely materialized beings are chymically
analyzed in the great laboratory of nature, and
their component parts are separated:thus the
bones become rocks, the flesh earth, the spirits air,
the blood water, the grizzle clay, and the ashes of
the will are converted into the element of fire. In
this class we enumerate whales, elephants,
hippopotami
,
and divers other brutes, which visibly
exhibit
accumulations of matter that must speedily
triumph over the less material portions of their
natures
.
And yet, Doctor, there are facts that militate
against the theory; the elephant, for instance, is
accounted one of the most intelligent of all the
quadrupeds.
A mere false demonstration, sir. Nature
delights
in these little equivocations: thus, we have
false suns, false rainbows, false prophets, false vision,
and even false philosophy. There are entire races
of both our species, too, as the Congo and the
Esquimaux
,
for yours, and baboons and the common
monkeys, that inhabit various parts of the world
possessed by the human species, for ours, which are
mere shadows of the forms and qualities that
properly
distinguish the animal in its state of
perfection
.
How, sir; are you not, then, of the same
family
as all the other monkeys that we see hopping
and skipping about the streets?
No more, sir, than you are of the same family
as the flat-nosed, thick-lipped, low-browed,
ink-skinned
negro, or the squalid, passionless, brutalized
Esquimaux. I have said that nature delights in
vagaries; and all these are no more than some of
her mistifications. Of this class is the elephant,
who, while verging nearest to pure materialism,
makes a deceptive parade of the quality he is fast
losing. Instances of this species of playing trumps,
if I may so express it, are common in all classes
of beings. How often, for instance, do men, just
as they are about to fail, make a parade of wealth,
women seem obdurate an hour before they
capitulate
,
and diplomatists call Heaven to be a witness
of their resolutions to the contrary, the day before
they sign and seal! In the case of the elephant,
however, there is a slight exception to the general
rule, which is founded on an extraordinary struggle
between mind and matter, the former making an
effort that is unusual, and which may be said to
form an exception to the ordinary warfare between
these two principles, as it is commonly conducted
in the retrogressive class of animals. The most
infallible sign of the triumph of mind over matter,
is in the development of the tail
King!
Of the tail, Dr. Reasono?
By all means, sir,that seat of reason, the tail!
Pray, Sir John, what other portion of our frames
did you imagine was indicative of intellect?
Among men, Dr. Reasono, it is commonly
thought the head is the more honorable member,
and, of late, we have made analytical maps of this
part of our physical formation, by which it is
pretended
to know the breadth and length of a moral
quality, no less than its boundaries.
You have made the best use of your materials,
such as they were, and I dare say the map in
question
,
all things considered, is a very clever
performance
.
But in the complication and abstruseness of
this very moral chart (one of which I perceive
standing on your mantel-piece,) you may learn the
confusion which still reigns over the human
intellect
.
Now, in regarding us, you can understand
the very converse of your dilemma. How much
easier, for instance, is it to take a yard-stick, and
by a simple admeasurement of a tail, come to a
sound, obvious and incontrovertible conclusion as
to the extent of the intellect of the specimen, than
by the complicated, contradictory, self-balancing
and questionable process to which you are reduced!
Were there only this fact, it would abundantly
establish
the higher moral condition of the monikin
race, as it is compared with that of man.
Dr. Reasono, am I to understand that the
monikin
family seriously entertain a position so
extravagant
as this: that a monkey is a creature more
intellectual and more highly civilized than man?
Seriously, good Sir John!Why you are the
first respectable person it has been my fortune to
meet, who has even affected to doubt the fact. It
is well known that both belong to the
improveable
class of animals, and that monkeys, as you are
pleased to term us, were once men, with all their
passions, weaknesses, inconsistencies, modes of
philosophy
,
unsound ethics, frailties, incongruities and
subserviency to matter; that they passed into the
monikin state by degrees, and that large divisions
of them are constantly evaporating into the
immaterial
world, completely spiritualized and free from
the dross of flesh. I do not mean in what is
called
deathfor that is no more than an occasional
deposit of matter to be resumed in a new aspect,
and with a nearer approach to the grand results,
(whether of the
improveable
or of the
retrogressive
classes;) but those final mutations which transfer
us to another planet, to enjoy a higher state of
being
,
Vol. I. 15
and leaving us always on the high road
towards
final excellence.
All this is very ingenious, sir; but, before you
can persuade me into the belief that man is an
animal
inferior to a monkey, Dr. Reasono, you will
allow me to say that you must prove it.
Ay, ay, or me, either, put in Captain Poke,
waspishly.
Were I to cite my proofs, gentlemen,
continued
the philosopher, whose spirit appeared to be
much less moved by our doubts than ours were by
his positionI should, in the first place, refer you
to history. All the monikin writers are agreed in
recording the gradual translation of the species
from the human family
This may do very well, sir, for the latitude of
Leaphigh, but permit me to say that no human
historian
,
from Moses down to Buffon, has ever taken
such a view of our respective races. There is not
a word in any of all these writers on the subject.
How should there be, sir?History is not a
prediction, but a record of the past. Their silence
is so much negative proof in our favor. Does
Tacitus, for instance, speak of the French
revolution
?
Is not Herodotus silent on the subject of the
independence of the American continent?or do
any of the Greek and Roman writers give us the
annals of Stunin'tun,a city whose foundations
were most probably laid some time after the
commencement
of the Christian era? It is morally
impossible that men or monikins can faithfully
relate
events that have never happened; and as it has
never yet happened to any man, who is still a man,
to be translated to the monikin state of being, it
follows, as a necessary consequence, that he can
know nothing about it. If you want historical
proofs, therefore, of what I say, you must search
the monikin annals for the evidence. There it is to
be found, with an infinity of curious details; and I
trust the time is not far distant, when I shall have
great pleasure in pointing out to you some of
the most approved chapters of our best writers
on this subject. But we are not confined to the
testimony of history, in establishing our condition
to be of the secondary formation. The internal
evidence is triumphant: we appeal to our
simplicity
,
our philosophy, the state of the arts among us;
in short, to all those concurrent proofs which are
dependent on the highest possible state of
civilization
.
In addition to this, we have the infallible
testimony which is to be derived from the
development
of our tails. Our system of caudology is, in
itself, a triumphant proof of the high improvement
of the monikin reason.
Do I comprehend you aright, Dr. Reasono,
when I understand your system of caudology, or
tailology, to render it into the vernacular, to
dogmatize
on the possibility that the seat of reason in
a man, which to day is certainly in his brains, can
ever descend into a tail?
If you deem development, improvement and
simplification, a descent, beyond a question, sir.
But your figure is a bad one, Sir John; for ocular
demonstration is before you, that a monikin can
carry his tail as high as a man can possibly carry
his head. Our species, in this sense, is morally
nicked; and it costs us no effort to be on a level
with human kings. We hold, with you, that the
brain is the seat of reason, while the animal is in
what we call the human probation, but that it is a
reason undeveloped, imperfect and confused; cased,
as it were, in an envelope unsuited to its functions;
but that, as it gradually oozes out of this straitened
receptacle, towards the base of the animal, it
acquires
solidity, lucidity, and, finally, by elongation
and development, point. If you examine the human
brain, you will find it, though capable of being
stretched to a great length, compressed in a
diminutive
compass, involved and snarled; whereas the
same physical portion of the genus gets simplicity,
a beginning and an end, a directness and
consecutiveness
,
that are necessary to logic, and, as has just
been mentioned, a point, in the monikin seat of
reason
,
which, by all analogy, go to prove the
superiority
of the animal possessing advantages so
great.
Nay, sir, if you come to analogies, they will be
found to prove more than you may wish. In
vegetation
,
for instance, saps ascend for the purposes
of fructification and usefulness; and, reasoning from
the analogies of the vegetable world, it is far more
probable that tails have ascended into brains, than
that brains have descended into tails; and,
consequently
,
that men are much more likely to be an
improvement on monkeys, than monkeys an
improvement
on men.
I spoke with warmth, I know; for the doctrine
of Dr. Reasono was new to me; and, by this time,
my
esprit de corps
had pretty effectually blinded
reflection.
You gave him a red-hot shot that time, Sir
John, whispered Captain Poke at my elbow; now,
if you are so disposed, I will wring the necks of
all these little blackguards, and throw them out of
the window.
I immediately intimated that any display of brute
force would militate directly against our cause;
as the object, just at that moment, was to be as
immaterial as possible.
Well, well, manage it in your own way, Sir John,
and I'm quite as immaterial as you can wish; but
should these cunning varments ra'ally get the better
of us in the argument, I shall never dare look at Miss
Poke, or show my face ag'in in Stunin'tun.
This little aside was secretly conducted, while
Dr. Reasono was drinking a glass of
cau sucre
;
but he soon returned to the subject, with the
dignified
gravity that never forsook him.
Your remark touching saps has the usual savor
of human ingenuity, blended, however, with the
proverbial short-sightedness of the species. It is
very true that saps ascend for the purposes of
fructification
;
but what is this fructification, to which
you allude? It is no more than a false
demonstration
of the energies of the plant. For all the
purposes
of growth, life, durability, and the final
conversion of the vegetable matter into an element,
the root is the seat of power and authority; and, in
particular, the tap-root above, or rather below all
others. This tap-root may be termed the tail of
vegetation. You may pluck fruits with impunity
nay, you may even top all the branches, and the
tree shall survive; but, put the axe to the root, and
the pride of the forest falls!
All this was too evidently true to be denied, and
I felt worried and badgered; for no man likes to be
beaten in a discussion of this sort, and more
especially
by a monkey. I bethought me of the elephant,
and determined to make one more thrust, by the
aid of his powerful tusks, before I gave up the point.
I am inclined to think, Dr. Reasono, I put in
as soon as possible, that your
savans
have not
been very happy in illustrating their theory by
means of the elephant. This animal, besides being
a mass of flesh, is too well provided with intellect
to be passed off for a dunce; and he not only has
one
, but he might almost be said to be provided
with
two
tails.
15 *
That has been his chief misfortune, sir.
Matter
,
in the great warfare between itself and mind,
has gone on the principle of divide and conquer.
You are nearer the truth than you imagined, for
the trunk of the elephant is merely the abortion of a
tail; and yet, you see, it contains nearly all the
intelligence
that the animal possesses. On the subject of the
fate of the elephant, however, theory is confirmed
by actual experiment. Do not your geologists and
naturalists speak of the remains of animals, which
are no longer to be found among living things?
Certainly, sir; the mastodonthe megatherium,
iguanodon; and the plesiosaurus
And do you not also find unequivocal evidences
of animal matter incorporated with rocks?
This fact must be admitted, too.
These phenomena, as you call them, are no
more than the final deposits which nature has made
in the cases of those creatures in which matter has
completely overcome its rival, mind. So soon as
the will is entirely extinct, the being ceases to live;
or it is no longer an animal. It falls and reverts
altogether to the element of matter. The processes
of decomposition and incorporation are longer, or
shorter, according to circumstances; and these
fossil remains of which your writers say so much,
are merely cases that have met with accidental
obstacles to their final decomposition. As respects
our two species, a very cursory examination of their
qualities ought to convince any candid mind of the
truth of our philosophy. Thus, the physical part
of man is much greater in proportion to the
spiritual
,
than it is in the monikin; his habits are grosser
and less intellectual; he requires sauce and
condiments
in his food; he is farther removed from
simplicity
,
and, by necessary implication, from high
civilization; he eats flesh, a certain proof that the
material principle is still strong in the ascendant;
he has no
cauda
On this point, Dr. Reasono, I would inquire if
your scholars attach any weight to traditions?
The greatest possible, sir. It is the monikin
tradition that our species is composed of men
refined, of diminished matter and augmented minds,
with the seat of reason extricated from the
confinement
and confusion of the
caput
, and extended,
unravelled, and rendered logical and consecutive,
in the
cauda
.
Well, sir,
we
too have our traditions; and an
eminent writer, at no great distance of time, has
laid it down as incontrovertible, that men once
had
caud
.
A mere prophetic glance into the future, as
coming
events are known to cast their shadows before.
Sir, the philosopher in question establishes his
position, by pointing to the stumps.
He has unluckily mistaken a foundation-stone for
a ruin! Such errors are not unfrequent with the
ardent and ingenious. That men
will
have tails, I
make no doubt; but that they
have
ever reached
this point of perfection, I do most solemnly deny.
There are many premonitory symptoms of their
approaching this condition; the current opinions
of the day, the dress, habits, fashions, and
philosophy
of the species, encourage the belief; but
hitherto you have never reached the enviable
distinction
.
As to traditions, even your own are all
in favor of our theory. Thus, for instance, you
have a tradition that the earth was once peopled by
giants. Now, this is owing to the fact that men
were formerly more under the influence of matter,
and less under that of mind, than to-day. You admit
that you diminish in size, and improve in moral
attainments; all of which goes to establish the truth
of the monikin philosophy. You begin to lay less
stress on physical, and more on moral excellencies;
and, in short, many things show that the time for
the final liberation and grand development of your
brains, is not far distant. This much I very gladly
concede; for, while the dogmas of our schools are
not to be disregarded, I very cheerfully admit that
you are our fellow-creatures, though in a more
infant and less improved condition of society.
King!
Here Dr. Reasono announced the necessity of
taking a short intermission, in order to refresh
himself. I retired with Captain Poke, to have a
little communication with my fellow-mortal, under
the peculiar circumstances in which we were placed,
and to ask his opinion of what had been said. Noah
swore bitterly at some of the conclusions of the
monikin philosopher, affirming he should like no
better sport than to hear him lecture in the streets
of Stunin'tun, where, he assured me, such doctrine
would not be tolerated any longer than was
necessary
to sharpen a harpoon, or to load a gun.
Indeed, he did not know but the Doctor would be
incontinently kicked over into Rhode Island,
without
ceremony.
For that matter, continued the indignant old
sealer, I should ask no better sport, than to have
permission to put the big toe of my right foot, under
full sail, against the part of the blackguard where
his beloved tail is stepped. That would soon bring
him to reason. Why, as for his
caud
, if you
will believe me, Sir John, I once saw a man, on
the coast of Patagoniaa savage, to be sure, and
not a philosopher, as this fellow pretends to be
who had an outrigger of this sort, as long as a
ship's ring-tail-boom. And what was he, after all,
but a poor devil who did not know a sea-lion from
a grampus!
This assertion of Captain Poke relieved my mind
considerably; and, laying aside the bison-skin, I
asked him to have the goodness to examine the
localities
,
with some particularity, about the
termination
of the dorsal bone, in order to ascertain if there
were any encouraging signs to be discovered.
Capt. Poke put on his spectacles, for time had
brought the worthy mariner to their use, as he
said, whenever he had occasion to read fine print;
and, after some time, I had the satisfaction to hear
him declare, that if it was a
cauda
I wanted, there
was as good a place to step one, as could be found
about any monkey in the universe; and you have
only to say the word, Sir John, and I will just step
into the next room, and by the help of my knife
and a little judgment in choosing, I'll fit you out
with a jury-article, which, if there be any ra'al
vartue in this sort of thing, will qualify you at once
to be a judge, or, for that matter, a bishop.
We were now summoned again to the
lecture-room
,
and I had barely time to thank Captain Poke
for his obliging offer, which circumstances just
then, however, forbade my accepting.
CHAPTER XII.
Better and betterA higher flight of reasonMore obvious
truths, deeper philosophy, and facts that even an ostrich
might digest.
I GLADLY quit what I fear some present may
have considered the personal part of my lecture,
resumed Dr. Reasono, to turn to those portions
of the theme that should possess a common interest,
awaken common pride, and excite common
felicitations
.
I now propose to say a few words on that
part of our natural philosophy which is connected
with the planetary system, the monikin location,
and, as a consequence from both, the creation of
the world.
Although dying with impatience to be
enlightened
on all these interesting points, you will grant
me leave to inquire,
en passant
, Dr. Reasono, if
your
savans
receive the Mosaie account of the
creation or not.
As far as it corroborates our own system, sir,
and no farther. There would be a manifest
inconsistency
in our giving an antagonist validity to any
hostile theory, let it come from Moses or Aaron;
as one of your native good sense and subsequent
cultivation will readily perceive.
Permit me to intimate, Dr. Reasono, that the
distinction your philosophers take in this matter, is
directly opposed to a very arbitrary canon in the
law of evidence, which dictates the necessity of
repudiating the whole of a witness's testimony,
when we repudiate a part.
That may be a human, but it is not a monikin,
distinction. So far from admitting the soundness
of the principle, we hold that no monikin is ever
wholly right, or that he will be wholly right, so long
as he remain in the least under the influence of
matter; and we therefore winnow the false from
the true, rejecting the former as worse than useless,
while we take the latter as the nutriment of facts.
I now repeat my apologies for so often
interrupting
you, venerable and learned sir; and I
entreat
you will not waste another moment in replying
to my interrogatories, but proceed at once to an
explanation of your planetary system, or of any
other little thing it may suit your convenience to
mention. When one listens to a real philosopher,
one is certain to learn something that is either
useful
or agreeable, let the subject be what it may.
By the monikin philosophy, gentlemen,
continued
Dr. Reasono, we divide the great component
parts of this earth into land and water. These two
principles we term the
primary
elements. Human
philosophy has added air and fire to the list; but
these we reject either entirely, or admit them only
as
secondary
elements. That neither air nor fire is
a
primary
element, may be proved by experiment.
Thus, air can be formed, in the quality of gases;
can be rendered pure or foul; is dependent on
evaporation
,
being no more than ordinary matter in a
state of high rarefaction. Fire has no independent
existence; requires fuel for its support, and is
evidently
a property that is derived from the
combinations
of other principles. Thus, by putting two or
more billets of wood together, by rapid friction you
produce fire. Abstract the air suddenly, and your
fire becomes extinct; abstract the wood, and you
have the same result. From these two experiments
it is shown that fire has no independent existence,
and therefore is not an element. On the other hand,
take a billet of wood and let it be completely
saturated
with water: the wood acquires a new
property
,
(as also by the application of fire, which
converts
it into ashes and air,) for its specific gravity is
increased, it becomes less inflammable, emits vapor
more readily, and yields less readily to the blow of
the axe. Place the same billet under a powerful
screw, and a vessel beneath. Compress the billet,
and by a sufficient application of force, you will
have the wood, perfectly dry, left beneath the
screw, and the vessel will contain water. Thus
is it shown that land (all vegetable matter being no
more than fungi of the earth) is a
primary
element,
and that water is also a
primary
element; while air
and fire are not.
Having established the elements, I shall, for
brevity's sake, suppose the world created. In the
beginning, the orb was placed in vacuum,
stationary
,
and with its axis perpendicular to the plane of
what is now called its orbit. Its only revolution was
the diurnal.
And the changes of the seasons?
Had not yet taken place. The days and nights
were equal; there were no eclipses; the same stars
were always visible. This state of the earth is
supposed, from certain geological proofs, to have
continued about a thousand years, during which
time the struggle between mind and matter was
solely confined to quadrupeds. Man is thought to
have made his appearance, so far as our documents
go to establish the fact, about the year of the world
one thousand and three. About this period, too, it
is supposed that fire was generated by the friction
of the earth's axis, while making the diurnal
movement
;
or, as some imagine, by the friction of the
periphery of the orb, rubbing against vacuum at
the rate of so many thousand miles in a minute.
The fire penetrating the crust, soon got access to the
bodies of water that fill the cavities of the earth.
From this time is to be dated the existence of a
new and most important agent in the terrestrial
phenomena, called
steam
. Vegetation now began
to appear, as the earth received warmth from
within
Pray, sir, may I ask in what manner all the
animals existed previously?
By feeding on each other. The strong devoured
the weak, until the most diminutive of the
animalcula
was reached, when these turned on their
persecutors
,
and, profiting by their insignificance,
commenced devouring the strongest. You find
daily parallels to this phenomenon in the history
of man. He who, by his energy and force, has
triumphed over his equals, is frequently the prey of
the insignificant and vile. You doubtless know that
the polar regions, even in the original attitude of
the earth, owing to their receiving the rays of the
sun obliquely, must have possessed a less genial
climate than the parts of the orb that lie between
the arctic and the antarctic circles. This was a
wise provision of Providence to prevent a
premature
occupation of those chosen regions, or to cause
them to be left uninhabited, until mind had so far
mastered matter, as to have brought into existence
the first monikin.
May I venture to ask to what epoch you refer
the appearance of the first of your species?
To the Monikin Epocha, beyond a doubt, sir
but if you mean to ask in what year of the world
this event took place, I should answer, about the
year 4017. It is true, that certain of our writers
affect to think that divers men were approaching
to the sublimation of the monikin mind, previously to
this period; but the better opinion is, that these cases
were no more than what are termed premonitory.
Vol. I. 16
Thus, Socrates, Plato, Confucius, Aristotle, Euclid,
Zeno, Diogenes, and Seneca, were merely so many
admonishing types of the future condition of man,
indicating their near approach to the monikin, or
to the final translation.
And Epicurus
Was an exaggeration of the material principle,
that denoted the retrogression of a large portion of
the race towards brutality and matter. These
phenomena
are still of daily occurrence.
Do you then hold the opinion, for instance, Dr.
Reasono, that Socrates is now a monikin
philosopher
,
with his brain unravelled and rendered
logically
consecutive, and that Epicurus is transformed
perchance into a hippopotamus or a rhinoceros,
with tusks, horns, and hide?
You quite mistake our dogmas, Sir John. We
do not believe in transmigration in the individual
at all, but in the transmigration of classes. Thus,
we hold that whenever a given generation of men, in
a peculiar state of society, attain, in the aggregate,
a certain degree of moral improvement, or
mentality
,
as we term it in the schools, that there is an
admixture
of their qualities in masses, some believe by
scores, others think by hundreds, and others again
pretend by thousands; and if it is found, by the
analysis that is regularly instituted by nature, that
the proportions are just the material is consigned
to the monikin birth; if not, it is repudiated, and
either kneaded anew for another human
experiment
,
or consigned to the vast stores of dormant
matter. Thus all individuality, so far as it is
connected
with the past, is lost.
But, sir, existing facts contradict one of the
most important of your propositions; while you
admit that a want of a change in the seasons would
be a consequence of the perpendicularity of the
earth's axis to the plane of its present orbit, this
change in the seasons is a matter not to be denied.
Flesh and blood testify against you here, no less
than reason.
I spoke of things as they were, sir, previously
to the birth of the monikinia; since which time a
great, salutary, harmonious, and contemplated
alteration
has occurred. Nature had reserved the polar
regions for the new species, with divers obvious and
benevolent purposes. It was rendered uninhabitable
by the obliquity of the sun's rays; and though
matter
,
in the shape of mastodons and whales, with an
instinct of its antagonist destination, had frequently
invaded their precincts, it was only to leave the
remains of the first embedded in fields of ice,
memorials
of the uselessness of struggling against
destiny, and to furnish proofs of the same great
truth in the instance of the others; who, if they
did
enter the polar basins as masters of the great deep,
either left their bones there, or returned in the same
characters as they went. From the appearance of
animal nature on the earth, down to the period
when the monikin race arose, the regions in
question
were not only uninhabited, but virtually
uninhabitable
.
When, however, Nature, always wary,
wise, beneficent, and never to be thwarted, had
prepared the way, those phenomena were exhibited
that cleared the road for the new species. I have
alluded to the internal struggle between fire and
water, and to their progeny, steam. This new
agent was now required to act. A moment's
attention to the manner in which the next great
step in the progress of civilization was made, will
show with what foresight and calculation our
common
mother had established her laws. The earth
is flattened at the poles, as is well imagined by
some of the human philosophers, in consequence
of its diurnal movement commencing while the ball
was still in a state of fusion, which naturally threw
off a portion of the unkneaded matter, towards the
periphery. This was not done without the design
of accomplishing a desired end. The matter that
was thus accumulated at the equator, was
necessarily
abstracted from other parts; and, in this
manner
,
the crust of the globe became thinnest at the
poles. When a sufficiency of steam had been
generated
in the centre of the ball, a safety-valve was
evidently necessary to prevent a total disruption.
As there was no other machinist than Nature, she
worked with her own tools, and agreeably to her
own established laws. The thinnest portions of the
crust opportunely yielded to prevent a catastrophe,
when the superfluous and heated vapor escaped, in
a right line with the earth's axis, into vacuum.
This phenomenon occurred, as nearly as we have
been able to ascertain, about the year 700 before
the Christian era commenced, or some two
centuries
previously to the birth of the first monikins.
And why so early, may I presume to inquire,
Doctor?
Simply that there might be time for the new
climate to melt the ice that had accumulated about
the islands and continents of that region, (for it
was only at the southern extremity of the earth
that the explosion had taken place,) in the course
of so many centuries. Two hundred and seventy
years of the active and unremitted agency of steam
sufficed for this end; since the accomplishment of
which, the monikin race has been in the
undisturbed
enjoyment of the whole territory, together
with its blessed fruits.
Am I to understand, asked Captain Poke,
with more interest than he had before manifested
in the philosopher's lecture, that your folks, when
at hum', live to the south'ard of the belt of ice that
we mariners always fall in with somewhere about
the parallel of 77 south latitude?
Precisely soalas! that we should, this day,
be so far from those regions of peace, delight,
intelligence
,
and salubrity! But the will of Providence
be done!doubtless, there is a wise motive for our
captivity and sufferings, which may yet lead to the
further glory of the monikin race!
Will you have the kindness to proceed with
your explanations, Doctor? If you deny the annual
revolution of the earth, in what manner do you
account for the changes of the seasons, and other
astronomical phenomena, such as the eclipses which
so frequently occur?
You remind me that the subject is not yet
exhausted
,
the philosopher hurriedly rejoined, hastily
and covertly dashing a tear from his eye.
Prosperity
produced some of its usual effects, among
the founders of our species. For a few centuries,
they went on multiplying in numbers, elongating
and rendering still more consecutive their
caud
improving in knowledge and the arts, until some
spirits, more audacious than the rest, became restive
under the slow march of events, which led them
towards perfection at a rate ill-suited to their fiery
impatience. At this time, the mechanic arts were
at the highest pitch of perfection amongst uswe
have since, in a great measure, abandoned them,
as unsuited to, and unnecessary for, an advanced
state of civilizationwe wore clothes, constructed
canals, and effected other works that were greatly
esteemed among the species from which we had
emigrated. At this time, also, the whole monikin
family lived together as one people, enjoyed the
same laws, and pursued the same objects. But a
16 *
political sect arose in the region, under the direction
of misguided and hot-headed leaders, who brought
down upon us the just judgment of Providence, and
a multitude of evils that it will require ages to
remedy. This sect soon had recourse to religious
fanaticism and philosophical sophisms, to attain its
ends. It grew rapidly in power and numbers; for
we monikins, like men, as I have had occasion to
observe, are seekers of novelties. At last it
proceeded
to absolute overt acts of treason against
the laws of Providence itself. The first violent
demonstration of its madness and folly, was setting
up the doctrine that injustice had been done the
monikin race, by causing the safety-valve of the
world to be opened within their region. Although
we were manifestly indebted to this very
circumstance
for the benignity of our climate, the value
of our possessions, the general healthfulness of our
familiesnay, for our separate existence itself, as
an independent species, yet did these excited and
ill-judging wretches absolutely wage war upon the
most benevolent and the most unequivocal friend
they had. Specious premises led to theories,
theories
to declamations, declamation to combination,
combination to denunciation, and denunciation to
open hostilities. The matter in dispute was debated
for two generations, when the necessary degree of
madness having been excited, the leaders of the
party, who by this time had worked themselves,
through their hobby, into the general control of the
monikin affairs, called a meeting of all their
partisans
,
and passed certain resolutions, which will
never be blotted from the monikin memory, so fatal
were their consequences, so ruinous, for a time,
their effects! They were conceived in the
following
terms:
At
a full and overflowing meeting of the most
monikinized of the monikin race, holden at the house
of Peleg Pat, (we still used the human appellations,
at that epoeh,) in the year of the world 3,007, and
of the monikin era 317, Plausible Shout was called
to the chair, and Ready Quill was named secretary.
After several excellent and eloquent addresses
from all present, it was unanimously resolved as
follows, viz.
That steam is a curse, and not a blessing; and
that it deserves to be denounced by all patriotic
and true monikins.
That we deem it the height of oppression and
injustice in Nature, that she has placed the great
safety-valve of the world, within the lawful limits
of the monikin territories.
That the said safety-valve ought to be removed
forthwith; and that it shall be so removed,
peaceably
if it can, forcibly if it must.
That we cordially approve of the sentiments of
John Jaw, our present estimable chief magistrate,
the incorruptible partisan, the undaunted friend of
his friends, the uncompromising enemy of steam,
and the sound, pure, orthodox, and true monikin.
That we recommend the said Jaw to the
confidence
of all monikins.
That we call upon the country to sustain us in
our great, holy, and glorious design, pledging
ourselves
,
posterity, the bones of our ancestors, and all
who have gone before or who may come after
us, to the faithful execution of our intentions.
Signed,
Plausible Shout
, Chairman.
Ready Quill
, Secretary.
No sooner were these resolutions promulgated,
(for instead of being passed at a full meeting, it is
now understood they were drawn up between
Messrs. Shout and Quill, under the private
dictation
of Mr. Jaw,) than the public mind began
seriously to meditate proceeding to extremities.
That perfection in the mechanic arts which had
hitherto formed our pride and boast, now proved
to be our greatest enemy. It is thought that the
leaders of this ill-directed party meant, in truth,
to confine themselves to certain electioneering
effects; but who can stay the torrent, or avert the
current of prejudice! The stream was setting
against steam; the whole invention of the species
was put in motion; and in one year from the
passage
of the resolutions I have recited, mountains
were transported, endless piles of rocks were
thrown into the gulf, arches were constructed, and
the hole of the safety-valve was hermetically
sealed. You will form some idea of the waste of
intelligence and energy on this occasion, when I
add, that it was found, by actual observation, that
this artificial portion of the earth was thicker,
stronger, and more likely to be durable than the
natural. So far did- infatuation lead the victims,
that they actually caused the whole region to be
sounded, and, having ascertained the precise
locality
of the thinnest portion of the crust, John Jaw,
and all the most zealous of his followers, removed
to the spot, where they established the seat of
their government in triumph. All this time Nature
rested upon her arms, in the quiet of conscious
force. It was not long, however, before our
ancestors
began to perceive the consequences of their
act, in the increase of the cold, in the scarcity of
fruits, and in the rapid augmentation of the ice.
The monikin enthusiasm is easily awakened in
favor of any plausible theory, but it invariably
yields to physical pressure. No doubt the human
race, better furnished with the material of physical
resistance, does not exhibit so much of this
weakness
,
but
Do not flatter us with the exception, Doctor.
I find so many points of resemblance between us,
that I really begin to think we must have had the
same origin; and if you would only admit that
man is of the secondary formation and the
monikins
of the primary, I would accept the whole of
your philosophy without a moment's delay.
As such an admission would be contrary to
both fact and doctrine, I trust, my dear sir, you
will see the utter impossibility of a Professor in
the University of Leaphigh making the
concession
,
even in this remote part of the world.As I
was about to observe, the people began to betray
uneasiness at the increasing and constant
inclemency
of the weather; and Mr. John Jaw found it
necessary to stimulate their passions by a new
development of his principles. His friends and
partisans were all assombled in the great square
of the new capital, and the following resolutions
were, to use the language of a handbill that is still
preserved in the archives of the Leaphigh
Historical
Society, (for it would seem they were printed
before they were passed,) unanimously,
enthusiastically
,
and finally adopted, viz.
Resolved, That this meeting has the utmost
contempt for steam.
Resolved, That this meeting defies snow, and
sterility, and all other natural disadvantages.
Resolved, That we will live for ever.
Resolved, That we will henceforward go naked,
as the most effectual means of setting the frost at
defiance.
Resolved, That we are now over the thinnest
part of the earth's crust in the polar regions.
Resolved, That henceforth we will support no
monikin for any public trust, who will not give a
pledge to put out all his fires, and to dispense with
cooking altogether.
Resolved, That we are animated by the true
spirit of patriotism, reason, good faith, and
firmness
.
Resolved, That this meeting now adjourn
sine die
.
We are told that the last resolution was just
carried by acclamation, when Nature arose in her
might, and took ample vengeance for all her
wrongs. The great boiler of the earth burst, with
a tremendous explosion, carrying away, as the
thinnest part of the workmanship, not only Mr.
John Jaw, and all his partisans, but forty thousand
square miles of territory. The last that was seen
of them was about thirty seconds after the
occurrence
of the explosion, when the whole mass
disappeared
near the northern horizon, going at a
rate a little surpassing that of a cannon-ball which
has just left its gun.
King! exclaimed Noah; that is what we
sailors call, to cut and run.
Was nothing ever heard of Mr. Jaw and his
companions, my good Doctor?
Nothing that could be depended on. Some of
our naturalists assume that the monkeys which
frequent the other parts of the earth are their
descendants, who, stunned by the shock, have lost
their reasoning powers, while, at the same time,
they show glimmerings of their origin. This is,
in truth, the better opinion of our
savans;
and it
is usual with us, to distinguish all the human
species
of monkeys by the name of the lost
monikins
.
Since my captivity, chance has thrown
me in the way of several of these animals, who
were equally under the control of the cruel
Savoyards
;
and in conversing with them, in order to
inquire into their traditions and to trace the
analogies
of language, I have been led to think there is
some foundation for the opinion. Of this,
however
,
hereafter.
Pray, Dr. Reasono, what became of the forty
thousand square miles of territory?
Of that, we have a better account; for one of
our vessels, which was far to the northward, on an
exploring expedition, fell in with it in longitude 2
from Leaphigh, latitude 6 S., and by her means
it was ascertained that divers islands had been
already formed by falling fragments; and, judging
from the direction of the main body when last
seen, the fertility of that part of the world, and
various geological proofs, we hold that the great
western Archipelago is the deposit of the
remainder
.
And the monikin region, sir,what was the
consequence of this phenomenon to that part of
the world?
Awfulsublimevariousand durable! The
more important, or the personal consequences,
shall be mentioned first. Fully one-third of the
monikin species was scalded to death. A great
many contracted asthmas and other diseases of
the lungs, by inhaling steam. Most of the bridges
were swept away by the sudden melting of the
snows, and large stores of provisions were spoilt
by the unexpected appearance and violent
character
of the thaw. These may be enumerated among
the unpleasant consequences. Among the pleasant,
we esteem a final and agreeable melioration of the
climate, which regained most of its ancient
character
,
and a rapid and distinct elongation of our
caud
, by a sudden acquisition of wisdom.
The secondary, or the terrestrial consequences,
were as follow.By the suddenness and force
with which so much steam rushed into space,
finding
its outlet several degrees from the pole, the
earth was canted from its perpendicular attitude,
and remained fixed with its axis having an
inclination
of 23 27 to the plane of its orbit. At the
same time, the orb began to move in vacuum, and,
restrained by antagonist attractions, to perform
what is called its annual revolution.
I can very well understand, friend Reasono,
observed Noah, why the 'arth should heel under
so sudden a flaw, though a well-ballasted ship
would right again when the puff was over; but I
cannot understand how a little steam leaking out
at one end of a craft should set her a-going at the
rate we are told this world travels?
If the escape of the steam were constant, the
diurnal motion giving it every moment a new
position
,
the earth would not be propelled in its orbit,
of a certainty, Captain Poke; but as, in fact, this
escape of the steam has the character of pulsation,
being periodical and regular, nature has ordained
that it shall occur but once in the twenty-four hours,
and this at such a time as to render its action
uniform
,
and its impulsion always in the same
direction
.
The principle on which the earth receives
this impetus, can be easily illustrated by a familiar
experiment. Take, for instance, a double-barrelled
fowling-piece, load both barrels with extra
quantities
of powder, introduce a ball and
two
wads
into each barrel, place the breech within 4X628/1000
inches of the abdomen, and take care to fire both
barrels at once. In this case, the balls will give
an example of the action of the forty thousand
square miles of territory, and the person
experimenting
will not fail to imitate the impulsion, or
the backward movement, of the earth.
While I do not deny that such an experiment
would be likely to set both parties in motion, friend
Reasono, I do not see why the 'arth should not
finally
stop, as the man would be sure to do, after he
had got through with hopping, and kicking, and
swearing.
The reason why the earth, once set in motion
in vacuum, does not stop, can also be elucidated
by experiment, as follows.Take Captain Noah
Poke, provided as he is by nature with legs and
the power of motion; lead him to the
Place
Vend
me;
cause him to pay three sous, which will gain
him admission to the base of the column; let him
ascend to the summit; thence let him leap with all
his energy, in a direction at right angles with the
shaft of the column, into the open air; and it will
be found that, though the original impulsion would
not probably impel the body more than ten or
twelve feet, motion would continue until it had
reached the earth.Corollary: hence it is proved,
that all bodies in which the
vis inertia
has been
overcome, will continue in motion, until they come
in contact with some power capable of stopping
them.
King!Do you not think, Mr. Reasono, that the
'arth makes its circuit, as much owing to this said
steam of yours shoving, as it were, always a little
on one side, acting thereby in some fashion as a
rudder, which causes her to keep waring, as we
seamen call it, and as big crafts take more room
than small ones in waring, why, she is compelled
to run so many millions of miles before, as it might
be, she comes up to the wind ag'in? Now, there
is reason in such an idee; whereas, I never could
Vol. I. 17
reconcile it to my natur', that these little bits of
stars should keep a craft like the 'arth in her
course, with such a devil of a way on her, as we
know in reason she must have, to run so far in a
twelve-month. Why, the smallest yawand, for
a hooker of her keel, a thousand miles would n't
be a broader yaw than a hundred feet in a ship
the smallest yaw would send her aboard of the
Jupiter, or the Marcury, when there would be a
smashing of out-board work such as mortal never
before witnessed!
We rather lean to the opinion of the efficacy
of attraction, sir;nor do I see that your
proposition
would at all obviate your own objection.
Then, sir, I will just explain myself. Let us
suppose there was a steamer with a hundred miles
of keel; let us suppose the steam up, and the craft
with a broad offing; let us suppose her helm lash'd
hard a-port, and she going at the rate of ten
thousand
knots the hour, without bringing up or
shortening
sail for years at a time. Now, all this being
admitted, what would be her course? Why, sir,
any child could tell you, she would keep turning
in a circle of some fifty or a hundred thousand
miles in circumference; and such, it appears to me,
it is much more rational to suppose is the natur' of
the 'arth's traversing, than all this steering-small
among stars and attractions.
There is truly something very plausible,
Captain
Poke, in your suggestion; and I propose that
you shall profit by the first occasion to lay your
opinions on the subject, more at large, before the
Academy of Leaphigh.
With all my heart, Doctor; for I hold that
knowledge, like good liquor, is given to be passed
round from one to another, and not to be gulped
in a corner by any particular individle. And
now I'm throwing out hints of this natur', I will
just intimate another, that you may add to your
next demonstration, by way of what you call a
corollary:which is this,that is to sayif all
you tell us about the bursting of the boiler and the
polar kick be true, then is the 'arth the first
steam-boat
that was ever invented, and the boastings of
the French, and the English, and the Spaniards,
and the Italians, on this point, are no more than
so much smoke.
And of the Americans, too, Captain Poke,
I ventured to observe.
Why, Sir John, that is as it may happen.I
don't well see how Fulton could have stolen the
idee, seeing that he did not know the Doctor,
and most probably never heard of Leaphigh in his
life.
We all smiled, even to the amiable Chatterissa,
at the nicety of the navigator's distinctions; and
the philosopher's lecture, in its more didactic
form, being now virtually at an end, a long and
desultory
conversation took place, in which a
multitude
of ingenious questions were put by Captain
Poke and myself, and which were as cleverly
answered
by the Doctor and his friends.
At length, Dr. Reasono, who, philosopher as he
was, and much as he loved science, had not given
himself all this trouble, without a view to what
are called ulterior considerations, came out with
a frank
expos
of his wishes. Accident had
apparently
combined all the means for gratifying the
burning desire I betrayed to be let into further
details
of the monikin polity, morals, philosophy, and
all the other great social interests of the part of
the world they inhabit. I was wealthy beyond
bounds, and the equipment of a proper vessel
would be an expenditure of no moment; both the
Doctor and Lord Chatterino were good practical
geographers, after they were once within the
parallel
of 77 south, and Captain Poke, according to
his own account of himself, had passed half his life
in poking about among the sterile and uninhabited
islands of the frozen ocean. What was there to
prevent the most earnest wishes of all present
from being gratified? The Captain was out of
employment, and no doubt would be glad to get
the command of a good tight sea-boat; the
strangers pined for home, and it was my most
ardent wish to increase my stake in society, by
taking a further interest in monikins.
On this hint, I frankly made a proposal to the
old sealer, to undertake the task of restoring these
amiable and enlightened strangers to their own
fire-sides and families. The Captain soon began
to discover a little of his Stunin'tun propensity;
for, the more I pressed the matter on him, the
more readily he found objections. The several
motives he urged for declining the proposal, may
be succinctly given as follows:
It was true that he wanted employment, but
then he wanted to see Stunin'tun too; he
doubted
whether monkeys would make good sailors; it
was no joke to run in among the ice, and it might
be still less of one to find our way back again; he
had seen the bodies of dead seals and bears that
were frozen as hard as stone, and which might, for
any thing he knew, have lain in that state a
hundred
years, and, for his part, he should like to be
buried when he was good for nothing else; how
did he know these monikins might not catch the
men, when they had once fairly got them in their
country, and strip them, and make them throw
summersets
,
as the Savoyards had compelled the
Doctor
,
and even the Lady Chatterissa, to do?he knew
he should break his neck the very first flap-jack;
if he were ten years younger, perhaps he should
like the frolic; he did not believe the right sort of
craft could be found in England, and, for his part,
he liked sailing under the stars and stripes; he
didn't know but he might go, if he had a crew
of Stunin'tunners; he always knew how to get
along with such people; he could scare one by
threatening to tell his
marm
how he behaved, and
bring another to reason by hinting that the gals
would shy him, if he wasn't more accommodating;
then there might be no such place as Leaphigh,
after all; or, if there was, he might never find
it; as for wearing a bison-skin under the
equator
,
it was quite out of the question, a human skin
being a heavy load to carry in the calm latitudes;
and finally, that he didn't exactly see what he was
to get by it.
These objections were met, one by one,
reversing
the order in which they were made, and
commencing
with the last.
I offered a thousand pounds sterling as the
reward
.
This proposal brought a gleam of
satisfaction
into Noah's eyes, though he shook his head,
as if he thought it very little. It was then
suggested
that there was no doubt we should discover
certain islands that were well stored with seals,
and that I would waive all claims as owner, and
that hereafter he might turn these discoveries to
his own private account. At this bait he nibbled,
and, at one time, I thought he was about to suffer
himself to be caught. But he remained obstinate.
After trying all our united rhetoric, and doubling
the amount of the pecuniary offer, Dr. Reasono
luckily bethought him of the universal engine of
human weakness, and the old sealer, who had
resisted moneyan influence of known efficacy
17*
at Stunin'tunambition, the secret of new sealing
grounds, and all the ordinary inducements that
might be thought to have weight with men of his
class, was, in the end, hooked by his own vanity!
The philosopher cunningly expatiated on the
pleasure
there would be in reading a paper before the
academy of Leaphigh, on the subject of the captain's
peculiar views touching the earth's annual
revolution
,
and of the virtue of sailing planets with their
helms lashed hard-a-port, when all the dogmatical
old navigator's scruples melted away like snow in
a thaw.
CHAPTER XIII.
A chapter of preparationsDiscrimination in characterA
tight fit, and other conveniences, with some judgment.
I shall pass lightly over the events of the
succeeding
month. During this time, the whole party
was transferred to England, a proper ship had been
bought and equipped, the family of strangers were
put in quiet possession of their cabins, and I had
made all my arrangements for being absent from
England for the next two years. The vessel was
a stout-built, comfortable ship of about three
hundred
tons burthen, and had been properly
constructed
to encounter the dangers of the ice. Her
accommodations were suitably arranged to meet
all the exigencies of both monikin and human wants,
the apartments of the ladies being very properly
separated from those of the gentlemen, and
otherwise
rendered decorous and commodious. The
Lady Chatterissa very pleasantly called their
private
room the
gynece
, which, as I afterwards
ascertained
,
was a term for the women's apartments,
obtained from the Greek, the monikins being quite
as much addicted as we are ourselves, to showing
their acquirements by the introduction of words
from foreign tongues.
Noah showed great care in the selection of the
ship's company, the service being known to be
arduous, and the duties of a very responsible
character
.
For this purpose, he made a journey
expressly
to Liverpool, (the ship lying in the Greenland
Dock at London,) where he was fortunate enough
to engage five Yankees, as many Englishmen, two
Norwegians and a Swede, all of whom had been
accustomed to cruising as near the poles as
ordinary
men ever succeed in reaching. He was also
well suited in his cook and mates; but I observed
that he had great difficulty in finding a cabin-boy
to his mind. More than twenty applicants were
rejected, some for the want of one qualification, and
some for the want of another. As I was present
at several examinations of different candidates for
the office, I got a little insight into his manner of
ascertaining their respective merits.
The invariable practice was, first, to place a
bottle
of rum, and a pitcher of water, before the lad,
and to order him to try his hand at mixing a glass
of grog. Four applicants were incontinently rejected
for manifesting a natural inaptitude at hitting the
juste milieu
, in this important part of the duty of a
cabin-boy. Most of the candidates, however, were
reasonably expert in the art; and the captain soon
came to the next requisite, which was, to say Sir,
in a tone, as Noah expressed it, somewhere
between
the snap of a steel-trap and the mendicant
whine of a beggar. Fourteen were rejected for
deficiencies on this score, the captain remarking
that most of them were the sa'ciest blackguards
he had ever fallen in with. When he had, at
length, found one who could mix a tumbler of
grog, and answer Sir, to his liking, he proceeded
to make experiments on their abilities in carrying
a soup-tureen over a slushed plank; in wiping plates
without a napkin, and without using their
shirt-sleeves
;
in snuffing candles with their fingers; in
making a soft bed with few materials besides
boards; in mixing the various compounds of burgoo,
lob-skous, and dough, (which he affectedly
pronounced
duff
); in fattening pigs on beef-bones, and
ducks on the sweepings of the deck; in looking at
molasses without licking his lips; and in various other
similar accomplishments, which he maintained were
as familiar to the children of Stunin'tun, as their
singing-books and the ten commandments. The
nineteenth candidate to my uninstructed eyes seemed
perfect; but Noah rejected him for the want of a
quality that he declared was indispensable to the
quiet of the ship. It appeared he was too bony
about an essential part of his anatomy, a peculiarity
that was very dangerous to a captain, as he
himself
was once so unfortunate as to put his great toe
out of joint, by kicking one of these ill-formed
youngsters with unpremeditated violence; a thing
that was very apt to happen to a man in a hurry.
Luckily, number twenty passed, and was
immediately
promoted to the vacant birth. The very
next day the ship put to sea, in good condition, and
with every prospect of a fortunate voyage.
I will here state that a general election occurred
the week before we sailed; and I ran down to
Householder and got myself returned, in order to
protect the interests of those who had a natural
right to look up to me for that small favor.
We discharged the pilot when we had the Scilly
Islands over the taffrail, and Mr. Poke took
command
of the vessel, in good earnest. Coming down
channel, he had done little more than rummage
about in the cabin, examine the lockers, and make
his foot acquainted with the anatomy of poor Bob,
as the cabin-boy was called; who, judging from the
amount of the captain's practice, was admirably
well suited for his station, in the great requisite of
a kickee. But, the last hold of the land loosened
by the departure of the pilot, our navigator came
forth in his true colours, and showed the stuff of
which he was really made. The first thing he did
was to cause a pull to be made on every halyard,
bowline and brace in the ship; he then rattled off
both mates, in order to show them (as he afterwards
told me in confidence) that he was captain of his
own vessel; gave the people to understand he did
not like to speak twice on the same subject and on
the same occasion, which he said was a privilege
he very willingly left to congress-men and women;
and then he appeared satisfied with himself and all
around him.
A week after we had taken our departure, I
ventured to ask Captain Poke if it might not be well
enough to take an observation, and to resort to
some means in order to know where the ship was.
Noah treated this idea with great disrespect. He
could see no use in wearing out quadrants without
any necessity for it. Our course was south, we
knew, for we were bound to the south pole; all we
had to do was to keep America on the starboard,
and Africa on the larboard, hand. To be sure, there
was something to be said about the trades, and a
little allowance to be made for currents, now and
then; but he and the ship would get to be better
acquainted before a great while, and then all would
go on like clockwork. A few days after this
conversation
,
I was on deck just as day dawned, and to
my surprise Noah, who was in his birth, called out
to the mate, through the sky-light, to let him know
exactly how the land bore. No one had yet seen
any land; but at this summons we began to look
about us, and sure enough there was an island
dimly visible in the eastern board! Its position by
compass was immediately communicated to the
captain, who seemed well satisfied with the result.
Renewing his admonition to the officer of the deck
to take care and keep Africa on the larboard hand,
he turned over in his bed to resume his nap.
I afterwards understood from the mates, that we
had made a very capital fall upon the trades, and
that we were getting on wonderfully well, though
it was quite as great a mystery to them as it was
to me, how the captain could know where the ship
was; for he had not touched his quadrant, except
to wipe it with a silk handkerchief, since we left
England. About a fortnight after we had passed
the Cape de Verds, Noah came on deck in a great
rage, and began to storm at the mate and the man
at the wheel for not keeping the ship her course.
To this the former answered with spirit, that the
only order he had received in a fortnight, was to
keep her jogging south, allowing for variation, and
that she was heading at that moment according to
orders. Hereupon Noah gave Bob, who happened
to pass him just then, a smart application
posteriori
,
and swore that the compass was as big a fool
as the mate; that the ship was two points off her
course; that south was hereaway, and not
there-away
;
that he knew by the feel of the wind that it
had no northin' in it, and we had got it away on
the quarter, whereas it ought to be for'ard of the
beam; that we were running for Rio instead of
Leaphigh, and that if we ever expected to get to
the latter country, we must haul up on a good taut
bowline. The mate, to my surprise, suddenly
acquiesced
,
and immediately brought the ship by the
wind. He afterwards told me, in a half whisper,
that the second mate having been sharpening some
harpoons, had unwittingly left them much too close
to the binnacle; and that, in fact, the magnet had
been attracted by them, so as to deceive the man
at the wheel and himself, fully twenty degrees as to
the real points of the compass. I must say this
little occurrence greatly encouraged me, leaving
no doubt about our eventual and safe arrival as
far, at least, as the boundary of ice which separates
the human from the monikin region. Profiting by
this feeling of security, I now began to revive the
intercourse with the strangers, which had been
partially
interrupted by the novel and disagreeable
circumstances of a sea life.
The Lady Chatterissa and her companion, as is
much the case with females at sea, rarely left the
gynece; but, as we drew near the equator, the
philosopher
and the young peer passed most of their
time on deck, or aloft. Dr. Reasono and I spent
half of the mild nights in discussing subjects
connected
with my future travels; and, as soon as we
were well clear of the rain and the thunder and
lightning of the calm latitudes, Captain Poke,
Robert, and myself, began to study the language of
Leaphigh. The cabin-boy was included in this
arrangement, Noah intimating we should find it
convenient to take him on shore with us, since a
wish to conceal my destination had induced me to
bring no servant along. Luckily for us, the
monikin
ingenuity had greatly diminished the labor of
the acquisition. The whole language was spoken
and written on a system of decimals, which
rendered
it particularly easy, after the elementary
principles
were once acquired. Thus, unlike most human
tongues, in which the rule usually forms the
exception
,
no departure from its laws was ever allowed,
under the penalty of the pillory. This provision,
the captain protested, was the best rule of them all,
and saved a vast deal of trouble; for, as he knew
by experience, a man might be a perfect adept in
the language of Stunin'tun, and then be laughed at
in New-York for his pains. The
comprehensiveness
of the tongue was also another great
advantage
;
though, like all other eminent advantages or
excessive good, it was the next-door neighbor to as
great an evil. Thus, as my Lord Chatterino
obligingly
explained,
we-witch-it-me-cum
, means
Madam, I love you from the crown of my head
to the tip of my tail; and as I love no other half as
well, it would make me the happiest monikin on
earth, if you would consent to become my wife,
that we might be models of domestic propriety
before all eyes, from this time henceforth and for
ever. In short, it was the usual and the most solemn
expression for asking in marriage; and, by the laws
of the land, was binding on the proposer until as
formally declined by the other party. But,
unluckily
,
the word we-switch-it-me-cum, means
Madam
,
I love you from the crown of my head to the
tip of my tail; and,
if I did not love another better
,
it would make me the happiest monikin on earth,
if you would consent to become my wife, that we
might be models of domestic propriety before all
eyes, from this time henceforth and for ever.
Now this distinction, subtle and insignificant as it
was to the eye and the ear, caused a vast deal of
heart-burning and disappointment among the young
people of Leaphigh. Several serious lawsuits had
grown out of this cause, and two great political
parties had taken root in the unfortunate mistake
of a young monikin of quality, who happened to
lisp, and who used the fatal word
indiscreetly-That
feud, however, was now happily appeased,
having lasted only a century; but it would be wise,
as we were all three bachelors, to take note of the
distinction. Captain Poke said he thought, on the
whole, he was sufficiently safe, as he was much
accustomed to the use of the word
switchel
; but
he thought it might be very well to go before some
consul, as soon as the ship anchored, and enter a
formal protest of our ignorance of all these niceties,
lest some advantage should be taken of us by the
reptiles of lawyers; that he in particular was not a
bachelor, and that Miss Poke would be as furious
as a hurricane, if, by an accident, he should happen
to forget himself. The matter was deferred for
future deliberation.
About this time, too, I had some more interesting
communications with Dr. Reasono, on the subject
of the private histories of all the party of which he
was the principal member. It would seem that the
philosopher, though rich in learning, and the
proprietor
of one of the best developed
caud
in the
entire monikin world, was poor in the more vulgar
attributes of monikin wealth. While he bestowed
freely, therefore, from the stores of his philosophy,
and through the medium of the academy of
Leap-high
,
on all his fellows, he was obliged to seek an
especial recipient for his surplus knowledge, in the
shape of a pupil, in order to provide for the small
remains of the animal that still lingered in his habits.
Lord Chatterino, the orphan heritor of one of the
noblest and wealthiest, as well as one of the most
ancient houses of Leaphigh, had been put under his
instruction at a very tender age, as had my Lady
Chatterissa under that of Mrs. Lynx, with very
much the same objects. This young and
accomplished
pair had early distinguished each other, in
monikin society, for their unusual graces of person,
general attainments, mutual amiableness of
disposition
,
Vol. I. 18
harmony of thought, and soundness of
principles
.
Every thing was propitious to the gentle
flame which was kindled in the vestal bosom of
Chatterissa, and which was met by a passion so
ardent, and so respectful, as that which glowed in
the heart of young No. 8 purple. The friends of the
respective parties, so soon as the budding sympathy
between them was observed, in order to prevent
the blight of wishes so appropriate, had called in
the aid of the matrimonial surveyor-general of
Leaphigh, an officer especially appointed by the
king in council, whose duty it is to take cognizance
of the proprieties of all engagements that are likely
to assume a character as grave and durable as that
of marriage. Dr. Reasono showed me the
certificate
issued from the Marriage Department on this
occasion, and which, in all his wanderings, he had
contrived to conceal within the lining of the
Spanish
hat the Savoyards had compelled him to wear,
and which he still preserved as a document that
was absolutely indispensable on his return to
Leap-high
;
else he would never be permitted to travel a
foot in company with two young people of birth
and of good estates, who were of the different sexes.
I translate the certificate, as literally as the poverty
of the English language will allow.
Extract
from the Book of Fitness, Marriage
Department
,
Leaphigh, season of nuts, day of
brightness.
Vol. 7243, p. 82.
Lord Chatterino: Domains; 126,952 acres of
land; meadow, arable and wood in just proportions.
Lady Chatterissa: Domains; 115,999 acres of
land; mostly arable.
Decree, as of record; it is found that the lands
of my Lady Chatterissa possess in quality what
they want in quantity.
Lord Chatterino: Birth; sixteen descents pure;
one bastardyfour descents purea suspicion
one descent purea certainty.
Lady Chatterissa: Birth; six descents pure
three bastardieseleven descents purea
certainty
a
suspicionunknown.
Decree as of record; it is found that the
advantage
is on the side of my Lord Chatterino, but the
excellence of the estate on the other side is believed
to equalize the parties.
(Signed) No. 6 ermine. A true copy,
(Counter signed) No. 1,000,003 ink-color.
Ordered, that the parties make the Journey of
Trial together, under the charge of Socrates
Reasono
,
Professor of Probabilities in the University
of Leaphigh, L. L. D., F. U. D. G. E., and of Mrs.
Vigilance Lynx, licensed duenna.
The Journey of Trial is so peculiar to the
monikin
system, and it might be so usefully introduced
into our own, that it may be well to explain it.
Whenever it is found that a young couple are
agreeable (to use a peculiarly anglicized
anglicism
),
in all the more essential requisites of
matrimony
,
they are sent on the journey in question,
under the care of prudent and experienced mentors,
with a view to ascertain how far they may be able to
support, in each other's society, the ordinary
vicissitudes
of life. In the case of candidates of the more
vulgar
classes, there are official overseers, who usually
drag them through a few mud-puddles, and then
set them to work at some hard labor that is
especially
profitable to the public functionaries, who
commonly get the greater part of their own year's
work done in this manner. But, as the moral
provisions
of all laws are invented less for those who
own 126,952 acres of land, divided into meadow,
arable and wood, in just proportions, than for those
whose virtues are more likely to yield to the fiery
ordeal of temptation, the rich and noble, after
making a proper and useful manifestation of their
compliance with the usage, ordinarily retire to
their country-seats, where they pass the period of
probation as agreeably as they can; taking care
to cause to be inserted in the Leaphigh gazette,
however, occasional extracts from their letters,
describing the pains and hardships they are
compelled
to endure, for the consolation and edification
of those who have neither birth nor country-houses.
In a good many instances the journey is actually
performed by proxy. But the case of my Lord
Chatterino and my Lady Chatterissa formed an
exception even to these exceptions. It was thought
by the authorities, that the attachment of a pair so
illustrious offered a good occasion to distinguish the
Leaphigh impartiality; and, on the well-known
principle which induces us sometimes to hang an
Earl in England, the young couple was
commanded
actually to go forth with all useful clat, (secret
orders being given to their guardians to allow
every possible indulgence, at the same time,) in
order that the lieges might see and exult in the
sternness and integrity of their rulers.
Dr. Reasono had accordingly taken his
departure
from the capital for the mountains, where he
instructed his wards in a practical commentary on
the ups and downs of life, by exposing them on the
verges of precipices and in the delights of the most
fertile valleys, (which, as he justly observed, was
the greater danger of the two,) leading them over
flinty paths, hungry and cold, in order to try their
tempers; and setting up establishments with the
most awkward peasants for servants, to ascertain
the depth of Chatterissa's philosophy; with a
variety
of similar ingenious devices, that will readily
suggest themselves to all who have any
matrimonial
experience, whether they live in palaces or
cottages. When this part of the trial was
successfully
terminated, (the result having shown that the
gentle Chatterissa was of proof, so far as mere
temper
was concerned,) the whole party was ordered
off to the barrier of ice, which divides the monikin
from the human region, with a view to ascertain
whether the warmth of their attachment was of a
nature likely to resist the freezing collisions of the
world. Here, unfortunately, (for the truth must be
said,) an unlucky desire of Dr. Reasono, who was
already F.U.D.G.E., but who had a devouring
ambition to become also M.O.R.E., led him into the
extreme imprudence of pushing through an opening,
where he had formerly discovered an island, on an
ancient expedition of the same sort; and on which
island he thought he saw a rock, that formed a
stratum of what he believed to be a portion of the
43,000 square miles, that were discomposed by
the great eruption of the earth's boiler. The
philosopher
foresaw a thousand interesting results that
were dependent on the ascertaining of this
important
fact; for all the learning of Leaphigh having
been exhausted, some five hundred years before, in
establishing the
greatest
distance to which any
fragment
had been thrown on that memorable occasion,
great attention had latterly been given to the
discovery
of the
least
distance any fragment had been
hurled. Perhaps I ought to speak tenderly of the
consequences
of a learned zeal, but it was entirely owing
to this indiscretion that the whole party fell into the
hands of certain mariners who were sealing on the
northern shores of this very island, (friends and
18 *
neighbours, as it afterwards appeared, of Captain
Poke,) who remorselessly seized upon the travellers,
and sold them to a homeward-bound Indiaman,
which they afterwards fell in with, near the island
of St. HelenaSt. Helena! the tomb of him who is
a model to all posterity, for the moderation of his
desires, the simplicity of his character, a deep
veneration
for truth, profound reverence for justice,
unwavering faith, and a clear appreciation of all
the nobler virtues!
We came in sight of the island in question, just
as Dr. Reasono concluded his interesting narrative;
and, turning to Captain Poke, I solemnly asked
that discerning and shrewd seaman,
If he did not think the future would fully
avenge itself of the pastif history would not do
ample justice to the mighty deadif certain names
would not be consigned to everlasting infamy for
chaining a hero to a rock; and whether
his
country,
the land of freemen, would ever have disgraced
itself, by such an act of barbarism and vengeance?
The Captain heard me very calmly; then
deliberately
helping himself to some tobacco, he
replied:
Harkee, Sir John. At Stunin'tun, when we
catch a ferocious crittur', we always put it in a cage.
I'm no great mathematician, as I've often told you;
but if my dog bites me once, I kick himtwice, I
beat himthrice, I chain him.
Alas!there are minds so unfortunately
constituted
,
that they have no sympathies with the
sublime
.
All their tendencies are direct and common
sense-like. To such men, Napoleon appears little
better than one who lived among his fellows more
in the character of a tiger than in that of a man.
They condemn him because he could not reduce
his own sense of the attributes of greatness to the
level of their homebred morality. Among this
number, it would now seem, was to be classed
Captain Noah Poke.
A wish to relate the manner in which Dr.
Reasono and his companions fell into human
hands, has caused me to overlook one or two
matters of lighter moment, that should not, in
justice to myself, however, be entirely omitted.
When we had been at sea two days, a very
agreeable surprise for the monikin party, was
prepared and executed. I had caused a certain
number of jackets and trowsers to be made of
the skins of different animals, such as dogs, cats,
sheep, tigers, leopards, hogs, &c. &c., with the
proper accompaniments of snouts, hoofs, and
claws; and, when the ladies came on deck, after
breakfast, their eyes were no longer offended by
our rude innovations upon nature, but the whole
crew were flying about the rigging, like so many
animals of the different species named. Noah
and myself appeared in the characters of sea-lions,
the former having intimated that he understood the
nature of that beast better than any other. Of
course, this delicate attention was properly
appreciated
,
and handsomely acknowledged.
I had taken the precaution to order
imitation-skins
to be made of cotton, which were worn in
the low latitudes; and, as we got near the
Falkland
Islands, the real skins were resumed, with
promptitude, and I might add, with pleasure.
Noah had, at first, raised some strong
objections
to the scheme, saying that he should not feel
safe in a ship manned and officered altogether by
wild beasts; but, at last, he came to enjoy the
thing as a good joke, never failing to hail the men,
not by their names as formerly, but, as he
expressed
it himself, by their natur's; calling out
You cat, scatch this; You tiger, jump here;
You hog, out of that dirt; You dog, scamper
there; You horse, haul away, and divers other
similar conceits, that singularly tickled his fancy.
The men themselves took up the ball, which they
kept rolling, embellished with all sorts of nautical
witticisms; their surnamethey had but one,
viz. Smithbeing entirely dropped for the new
appellations. Thus, the sounds of Tom Dog,
Jack Cat, Bill Tiger, Sam Hog, and
Dick Horse, were flying about the decks, from
morning to night.
Good humour is a great alleviator of bodily
privation. From the time the ship lost sight of
Staten Land, we had heavy weather, with hard
gales from the southward and westward; and we
had the utmost difficulty in making our southing.
Observations now became a very difficult matter,
the sun being invisible for a week at a time. The
marine instinct of Noah, at this crisis, was of the
last importance to all on board. He gave us the
cheering assurance, however, from time to time,
that we were going south, although the mates
declared that they knew not where the ship was,
or whither she was running; neither sun, moon, nor
star having now been seen for more than a week.
We had been in this state of anxiety and doubt
for about a fortnight, when Captain Poke suddenly
appeared on deck, and called for the cabin-boy,
in his usual stentorian and no-denial voice, by the
name of You Bob Ape; for the duty of Robert
requiring that he should be much about the persons
of the monikins, I had given him a dress of apes'
skins, as a garb that would be more congenial to
their tastes than that of a pig, or a weasel. Bob
Ape was soon forthcoming, and, as he approached
his master, he quietly turned his face from him,
receiving, as a matter of course, three or four
smart admonitory hints, by way of letting him
know that he was to be active in the performance
of the duty on which he was about to be sent.
On this occasion I made an odd discovery. Bob
had profited by the dimensions of his lower
garment
,
which had been cut for a much larger
boy, (one of those who had broken down in
essaying
the true Doric of Sir,) by stuffing it with
an old union-jacka sort of sarvice, as he
afterwards told me, that saved him a good deal
of wear and tear of skin. To return to passing
events, however: when Robert had been duly
kicked
,
he turned about manfully, and demanded the
captain's pleasure. He was told to bring the largest
and the fairest pumpkin he could find, from the
private stores of Mr. Poke, that navigator never
going to sea without a store of articles, that he
termed Stunin'tun food. The Captain took the
pumpkin between his legs, and carefully peeled off
the whole of its greenish-yellow coat, leaving it a
globe of a whitish colour. He then asked for the
tar-bucket; and, with his fingers, traced various
marks, which were pretty accurate outlines of the
different continents and the larger islands of the
world. The region near the south pole, however,
he left untouched; intimating that it contained
certain sealing islands, which he considered pretty
much as the private property of the Stunin'tunners.
Now, Doctor, he said, pointing to the
pumpkin
,
there is the 'arth, and here is the tar-pot
just mark down the position of your island of
Leaphigh, if you please, according to the best
accounts your academy has of the matter. Make
a dab, here and there, if you happen to know of
any rocks and shoals. After that, you can lay
down the island where you were captured, giving
a general idee of its headlands and of the trending
of the coast.
Dr. Reasono took a fidd, and with its end he
traced all the desired objects with great readiness
and skill. Noah examined the work, and seemed
satisfied that he had fallen into the hands of a
monikin who had very correct notions of bearings
and distances, one, in short, on whose local
knowedge
it might do to run even in the night. He
then projected the position of Stunin'tun, an
occupation
in which he took great delight, actually
designing the meeting-house and the principal
tavern; after which, the chart was laid aside.
CHAPTER XIV.
How to steer smallHow to run the gauntlet with a ship
How to go clearA new-fashioned screw-dock, and certain
mile-stones.
Captain Poke
no longer deliberated about the
course we were to steer. With his pumpkin for
a chart, his instinct for an observation, and his
nose for a compass, the sturdy sealer stood boldly
to the southward; or, at least, he ran dead before a
stiff gale, which, as he more than once affirmed,
was as true a norther as if bred and born in the
Canadas.
After coursing over the billows, at a tremendous
rate, for a day and a night, the Captain appeared
on deck, with a face of unusual meaning, and a
mind loaded with its own reflections, as was
proved by his winking knowingly whenever he
delivered himself of a sentiment; a habit that he
had most probably contracted, in early youth, at
Stunin'tun, for it seemed to be quite as inveterate
as it was thorough-bred.
We shall soon know, Sir John, he observed,
hitching the sea-lion skin into symmetry, whether
it is sink or swim!
Pray explain yourself, Mr. Poke, cried I, in
a little alarm. If any thing serious is to happen,
you are bound to give timely notice.
Death is always untimely to some crittur's, Sir
John.
Am I to understand, sir, that you mean to cast
away the ship?
Not if I can help it, Sir John; but a craft that
is foreordained to be a wrack, will be a wrack, in
spite of reefing and bracing. Look ahead, you
Dick Lionay, there you have it!
There we had it, sure enough! I can only
compare the scene which now met my eyes, to a
sudden view of the range of the Oberland Alps,
when the spectator is unexpectedly placed on the
verge of the precipice of the Weissenstein. There
he would see before him a boundless barrier of
glittering ice, broken into the glorious and
fantastic
forms of pinnacles, walls and valleys; while
here, we saw all that was sublime in such a view,
heightened by the fearful action of the boisterous
ocean, which beat upon the impassable boundary,
in ceaseless violence.
Good God! Captain Poke, I exclaimed, the
instant I caught a glimpse of the formidable
danger
that menaced us, you surely do not mean to
continue madly on, with such a warning of the
consequences in plain view?
What would you have, Sir John? Leaphigh
lies on the t'other side of these ice-islands?
But you need not run the ship against them
why not go round them?
Because
they
go round the 'arth, in this
latitude
.
Now is the time to speak, Sir John. If we
are bound to Leaphigh, we have the choice of
three pretty desperate chances; to go through, to
go under, or to go over that there ice. If we are
to put back, there is not a moment to lose, for it
may be even now questioned whether the ship
would claw off, as we are, with a sending sea,
and this heavy norther.
I believe I would, at that moment, gladly have
given up all my social stakes to be well rid of the
adventure. Still pride, that substitute for so many
virtues, the greatest and the most potent of all
hypocrites, forbade my betraying the desire to
retreat. I deliberated, while the ship flew; and
when, at length, I turned to the captain to suggest
a doubt that might, at an earlier notice, possibly
have changed the whole aspect of affairs, he
bluntly
told me it was too late. It was safer to proceed
than to return, if, indeed, return were possible, in
the present state of the winds and waves. Making
a merit of necessity, I braced my nerves to meet
the crisis, and remained a submissive, and,
apparently
,
a calm spectator, of that which followed.
The Walrus, (such was the name of our good
ship,) by this time, was under easy canvas, and
yet, urged by the gale, she rolled down, with
alarming velocity, towards the boundary of foam,
where the congealed and the still liquid element
held their strife. The summits of the frozen crags
waved in their glittering glory, in a way just to
show that they were afloat; and I remembered
to have heard that, at times, as their bases melted,
entire mountains had been known to roll over,
engulphing all that lay beneath. To me it seemed
but a moment, before the ship was fairly
over-shadowed
by these shining cliffs, which gently
undulating, waved their frozen summits nearly a
thousand feet in air. I looked at Noah, in alarm,
for it appeared to me, that he intentionally
precipitated
us to destruction. But, just as I was about
to remonstrate, he made a sign with his hand, and
the vessel was brought to the wind. Still retreat
was impossible; for the heave of the sea was too
powerful, and the wind too heavy, to leave us any
hope of long keeping the Walrus from drifting
down upon the ragged peaks that bristled in icy
glory to leeward. Nor did Captain Poke,
himself
,
seem to entertain any such design; for, instead
of hugging the gale, in order to haul off from the
danger, he had caused the yards to be laid perfectly
square, and we were now running, at a great rate,
in a line nearly parallel with the frozen coast,
though gradually setting upon it.
Keep full! Let her go through water, you Jim
Tiger, said the old sealer, whose professional ardor
was fairly aroused. Now, Sir John, unluckily, we
are on the wrong side of these ice-mountains, for
the plain reason, that Leaphigh lies to the south'ard
of them. We must be stirring, therefore, for no
craft that was ever launched could keep off these
crags, with such a gale driving home upon them,
for more than an hour or two. Our great concern,
at present, is to look out for a hole to run into.
Why have you come so close to the danger,
with your knowledge of the consequences?
To own the truth, Sir John, natur' is natur',
and I'm getting to be a little near-sighted as I grow
old; besides, I'm not so sartain that danger is the
more dangerous, for taking a good steady look
plump in its face.
Noah raised his hand, as much as to say he
wished no answer, and both of us were
immediately
occupied in gazing anxiously to leeward. The
ship was just opening a small cove in the ice, which
Vol. I. 19
might have been a cable's length in depth and a
quarter of a mile across its outer, or the widest,
part. Its form was regular, being that of a
semicircle
;
but, at its bottom, the ice, instead of
forming
a continued barrier, like all the rest we had
yet passed, was separated by a narrow opening,
that was bounded on each side by a frowning
precipice
.
The two bergs were evidently drawing
nearer to each other, but there was still a strait,
or a watery gorge between them, of some two
hundred feet in width. As the ship plunged
onward
,
the pass was opened, and we caught a
glimpse of the distant view to leeward. It was
merely a glimpsethe impatient Walrus allowing
us but a moment for examination,but it appeared
sufficient for the purposes of the old sealer. We
were already across the mouth of the cove, and
within a cable's length of the ice again; for as we
drew near what may be called the little cape, we
found ourselves once more in closer proximity to
the menacing mountain. It was a moment when
all depended on decision; and, fortunately, our
sealer, who was so wary and procrastinating in a
bargain, never had occasion to make two drafts
on his thoughts, in situations of emergency. As
the ship cleared the promontory on the eastern
side of the cove, we again opened a curvature of
the ice, which gave a little more water to leeward.
Tacking was impossible, and the helm was put
hard-a-weather. The bow of the Walrus fell off,
and as she rose on the next wave, I thought its
send would carry us helplessly down upon the
berg. But the good craft, obedient to her rudder,
whirled round, as if sensible herself of the
danger
,
and, in less time than I had ever before known
her to ware, we felt the wind on the other quarter.
Our cats and dogs bestirred themselves, for there
was no one there, Captain Noah Poke excepted,
whose heart did not beat quick and hard. In much
less time than usual, the yards were braced up on
the other tack, and the ship was ploughing heavily
against the sea, with her head to the westward.
It is impossible to give one who has never been in
such a situation, a just idea of the feverish
impatience
,
the sinking and mounting of hope, as we
watch the crab-like movement of a vessel, that is
clawing off a lee shore, in a gale. In the present
case, it being well known that the sea was
fathomless
,
we had run so near the danger that not even
the smallest of its horrors was veiled from sight.
While the ship labored along, I saw the clouds
fast shutting in to windward, by the interposition
of the promontory of ice,the certain sign that
our drift was rapid,and, as we drew nearer to
the point, breathing became labored and even
audible. Here Noah took a chew of tobacco, I
presume on the principle of enjoying a last quid,
should the elements prove fatal; and then he went
to the wheel in person.
Let her go through the water, he said, easing
the helm a littlelet her jog ahead, or we shall
lose command of her in this devil's-pot!
The vessel felt the slight change, and drew
faster through the foaming brine, bringing us, with
increasing velocity, nearer to the dreaded point.
As we came up to the promontory, the water fell
back in spray on the decks, and there was an
instant
when it appeared as if the wind was about
to desert us. Happily the ship had drawn so far
ahead, as to feel the good effects of a slight
change of current that was caused by the air
rushing obliquely into the cove; and, as Noah, by
easing the helm still more, had anticipated this
alteration, which had been felt adversely but a
moment before, while struggling to the eastward
of the promontory, we drew swiftly past the icy
cape, opening the cove handsomely, with the ship's
head falling off fast towards the gorge.
There was but a minute, or two, for squaring
the yards and obtaining the proper position to
windward of the narrow strait. Instead of
running
down in a direct line for the latter, Captain
Poke kept the ship on such a course as to lay it
well open, before her head was pointed toward
the passage. By this time, the two bergs had
drawn so near each other as actually to form an
arch across its mouth; and this too, at a part so
low as to render it questionable whether there
was sufficient elevation to permit the Walrus to
pass beneath. But retreat was impossible, the
gale urging the ship furiously onward. The width
of the passage was now but little more than a
hundred feet, and it actually required the nicest
steerage to keep our yard-arms clear of the
opposite
precipices, as the vessel dashed, with
foaming
bows, into the gorge. The wind drew through
the opening with tremendous violence, fairly
howling
,
as if in delight at discovering a passage by
which it might continue its furious career. We
may have been aided by the sucking of the wind
and the waves, both of which were irresistibly
drawn towards the pass, or it is quite probable
that the skill of Captain Poke did us good service,
on this awful occasion; but, owing to the one
or the other, or to the two causes united, the
Walrus shot into the gorge so accurately, as to
avoid touching either of the lateral margins of the
ice. We were not so fortunate, however, with
the loftier spars; for, scarcely was the vessel
beneath
the arch, when she lifted on a swell, and
her main-top-gallant-mast snapped off in the cap.
The ice groaned and cracked over our heads;
and large fragments fell both ahead and astern of
us, several of them even tumbling upon our decks.
One large piece came down within an inch of the
extremity of Dr. Reasono's tail, just escaping the
dire calamity of knocking out the brains of that
profound and philo-monikin philosopher. In another
instant, the ship was through the pass, which
completely
closed, with the crash of an earthquake, as
soon as possible afterwards.
Still driven by the gale, we ran rapidly towards
the south, along a channel less than a quarter of a
mile in width, the bergs evidently closing on each
side of us, and the ship, as if conscious of her
jeopardy
,
doing her utmost, with Captain Poke still at
the wheel. In little more than an hour, the worst
was over; the Walrus issuing into an open basin
of several leagues in extent, which was, however,
completely encircled by the frozen mountains.
Here Noah took a look at the pumpkin, after which
he made no ceremony in plumply telling Dr.
Reasono
that he had been greatly mistaken in laying
down the position of Captivity Island, as he
himself
had named the spot where the amiable
strangers
had fallen into human hands. The philosopher
was a little tenacious of his opinion; but what is
argument in the face of facts? Here was the
pumpkin
,
and there were the blue waters! The Captain
now quite frankly declared that he had great doubts
whether there was any such place as Leaphigh at
all; and as the ship had a capital position for such
an object, he bluntly, though privately, proposed to
me, that we should throw all the monikins
over-board
,
project the entire polar basin on his chart,
as being entirely free from islands, and then go a
sealing. I rejected the propositions, firstly, as
premature
;
secondly, as inhuman; thirdly, as
inhospitable
;
19 *
fourthly, as inconvenient; and lastly, as
impracticable.
There might have arisen a disagreeable
controversy
between us, on this point; for Mr. Poke had
begun to warm, and to swear that one good seal,
of the true quality of fur, was worth a hundred
monkeys; when most happily the panther at the
mast-head cried out that two of the largest of the
mountains, to the southward of us, were
separating
,
and that he could discern a passage into
another basin. Hereupon Captain Poke
concentrated
his oaths, which he caused to explode like
a bomb, and instantly made sail, again, in the
proper direction. By three o'clock, P. M., we had
run the gauntlet of the bergs, a second time, and
were at least a degree nearer the pole, in the basin
just alluded to.
The mountains had now entirely disappeared
in the southern board; but the sea was covered,
far as the eye could reach, with field-ice. Noah
stood on, without apprehension; for the water had
been smooth ever since we entered the first
opening
,
the wind not having rake enough to knock up
a swell. When about a mile from the margin of
the frozen and seemingly interminable plain, the
ship was brought to the wind, and hove-to.
Ever since the vessel left the docks, there had
been six sets of spars of a form so singular, lying
among the booms, that they had often been the
subject of conversation between the mates and
myself, neither of the former being able to tell
their uses. These sticks were of no great length,
some fifteen feet at the most, of sound English
oak. Two or three pairs were alike, for they
were in pairs, each pair having one of the sides
of a shape resembling different parts of the ship's
bottom, with the exception that they were chiefly
concave, while the bottom of a vessel is mainly
convex. At one extremity each pair was firmly
connected by a short, massive, iron link, of about
two feet in length; and, at its opposite end, a
large eye-bolt was driven into each stick, where
it was securely forelocked. When the Walrus was
stationary, we learned, for the first time, the uses
of these unusual preparations. A pair of the
timbers
,
which were of great solidity and strength,
were dropped over the stern, and, sinking beneath
the keel, their upper extremities were separated,
by means of lanyards turned into the eye-bolts.
The lanyards were then brought forward to the
bilge of the vessel, where, by the help of tackles,
the timbers were rowsed up in such a manner,
that the link came close to the false-keel, and the
timbers themselves were laid snug against each
side of the ship. As great care had been taken, by
means of marks on the vessel, as well as in forming
the skids themselves, the fit was perfect. No less
than five pairs were secured in and near the bilge,
and as many more were distributed forward and
aft, according to the shape of the bottom.
Fore-and-aft
pieces, that reached from one skid to the
other, were then placed between those about the
bilge of the ship, each of them having a certain
number of short ribs, extending upwards and
downwards. These fore-and-aft pieces were laid
along the water-line, their ends entering the skids
by means of mortices and tenons, where they were
snugly bolted. The result of the entire
arrangement
was to give the vessel an exterior protection
against the field-ice, by means of a sort of
network
of timber, the whole of which had been so
accurately fitted in the dock, as to bear equally
on her frame. These preparations were not fairly
completed before ten o'clock on the following
morning, when Noah stood directly for an opening
in the ice before us, which, just about that time
began to be apparent.
We sha'n't go so fast for our armour,
observed
the cautious old sealer; but what we
want in heels, we'll make up in bottom.
For the whole of that day, we worked our
devious
course, by great labor, and at uncertain
intervals, to the southward; and at night, we
fastened
the Walrus to a floe, in waiting for the
return of light. Just as the day dawned, however,
I heard a tremendous grating sound against the
side of the vessel; and, rushing on deck, I found
that we were completely caught between two
immense fields, which seemed to be attracted
towards each other for no other apparent purpose
than to crush us. Here it was that the expedient
of Captain Poke made manifest its merits.
Protected
by the massive timbers, and false ribs, the
bilge of the ship resisted the pressure; and as,
under such circumstances, something must yield,
luckily nothing but the attraction of gravitation
was overcome. The skids, through their
inclination
,
acted as wedges, the links pressing against
the keel; and, in the course of an hour, the
Walrus
was gradually lifted out of the water,
maintaining
her upright position, in consequence of the
powerful nip of the floes. No sooner was this
experiment handsomely effected, than Mr. Poke
jumped upon the ice, and commenced an
examination
of the ship's bottom.
Here's a dry dock for you, Sir John!
exclaimed
the old sealer, chuckling. I'll have a
patent for this, the moment I put foot ag'in in
Stunin'tun.
A feeling of security, to which I had been a
stranger ever since we entered the ice, was created
by the composure of Noah, and by his
self-congratulation
at what he called his project to get a
look at the Walrus's bottom. Notwithstanding all
the fine declarations of exultation and success,
however, that he flourished among us who were
not mariners, I was much disposed to think that,
like other men of extraordinary genius, he had
blundered on the grand result of his ice-screws,
and that it was not foreseen and calculated. Let
this be as it may, however, all hands were soon
on the floe, with brooms, scrapers, hammers, and
nails, and the opportunity of repairing and
cleaning
was thoroughly improved.
For four-and-twenty hours the ship remained
in the same attitude, stiff as a church, and some
of us began to entertain apprehensions, that she
might be kept on her frozen blocks for ever. The
accident had happened, according to the statements
of Captain Poke, in lat. 78 13 26although I
never knew in what manner he ascertained the
important particular of our precise situation.
Thinking
it might be well to get some more accurate
ideas on this subject, after so long and ticklish a
run, I procured the quadrant from Bob Ape, and
brought it down upon the ice, where I made it a
point, as an especial favor, the weather being
favorable and the proper hour near, that our
commander
would correct his instinct by a solar
observation
.
Noah protested that your old seaman,
especially if a sealer and a Stunin'tunner, had no
occasion for such geometry-operations, as he
termed them; that it might be well enough,
perhaps
necessary, for your counting-house,
silk-gloved
captains, who run between New-York and
Liverpool, to be rubbing up their glasses and
polishing their sextants, for they hardly ever knew
where they were, except at such times; but as for
himself, he had little need of turning star-gazer at
his time of life, and that, as he had already told
me, he was getting to be near-sighted, and had
some doubts whether he could discern an object
like the sun, that was known to be so many
thousands
of millions of miles from the earth. These
scruples, however, were overcome by my
cleaning
the glasses, preparing a barrel for him to stand
on, that he might be at the customary elevation
above his horizon, and putting the instrument into
his hands, the mates standing near, ready to make
the calculations, when he gave the sun's
declination
.
We are drifting south'ard, I know, said Mr.
Poke, before he commenced his sightI feel it
in my bones. We are, at this moment, in 79 36
14having made a southerly drift of more than
eighty miles, since yesterday noon. Now, mind
my words, and see what the sun will say about it.
When the calculations were made, our latitude
was found to be 79 35 47. Noah was somewhat
puzzled by the difference, for which he could in
no plausible way account, as the observation had
been unusually good and certain. But an
opinionated
and an ingenious man is seldom at a loss to
find a sufficient reason to establish his own
correctness
,
or to prove the mistakes of others.
Ay, I see how it is, he said, after a little
cogitation; the sun must be wrongit should be
no wonder if the sun did get a little out of his track,
in these high, cold latitudes. Yes, yes: the sun
must be wrong.
I was too much delighted at being certain we
were going on our course to dispute the point,
and the great luminary was abandoned to the
imputation of sometimes being in error. Dr.
Reasono took occasion to say, in my private ear,
that there was a sect of philosophers in Leaphigh,
who had long distrusted the accuracy of the
planetary
system, and who had even thrown out hints
that the earth, in its annual revolution, moved in
a direction absolutely contrary to that which
Nature
had contemplated when she gave the original
polar impulse; but that, as regarded himself, he
thought very little of these opinions, as he had
frequent
occasion to observe that there was a large
class of monikins whose ideas always went up hill.
For two more days and as many nights, we
continued to drift with the floes to the southward,
or as near as might be, towards the haven of our
wishes. On the fourth morning, there was a
suitable
change in the weather; both thermometer
and barometer rose; the air became more bland,
and most of our cats and dogs, notwithstanding
we were still surrounded by the ice, began to cast
their skins. Dr. Reasono noted these signs, and
stepping on the floe he brought back with him a
considerable fragment of the frozen element.
This was carried to the camboose, where it was
subjected to the action of fire, which, within a
given number of minutes, pretty much as a matter
of course, as I thought, caused it to melt. The whole
process was watched with an anxiety the most
intense
,
by the whole of the monikins, however; and
when the result was announced, the amiable and
lovely Chatterissa clapped her pretty little
pattes
with joy, and gave all the other natural
indications
of delight, which characterize the emotions
of that gentle sex of which she was so bright an
ornament. Dr. Reasono was not backward in
explaining
the cause of so much unusual exhilaration,
for hitherto her manner had been characterized
by the well-bred and sophisticated restraint which
marks high training. The experiment had shown,
by the infallible and scientific tests of monikin
chemistry, that we were now within the influence
of a steam-climate, and there could no longer be
any rational doubt of our eventual arrival in the
polar basin.
The result proved that the philosopher was right.
About noon the floes, which all that day had
begun
to assume what is termed a `sloppy character,'
suddenly gave way, and the Walrus settled down
into her proper element, with great equanimity and
propriety. Captain Poke lost no time in
unshipping
the skids; and, a smacking breeze, that was
well saturated with steam, springing up from the
westward, we made sail. Our course was due
south, without regard to the ice, which yielded
before
our bows like so much thick water, and, just
as the sun set, we entered the open sea, rioting in
the luxuriance of its genial climate, in triumph.
Sail was carried on the ship all that night; and
just as the day dawned, we made the first
mile-stone
,
a proof, not to be mistaken, that we were
now actually in the monikin region. Dr. Reasono
had the goodness to explain to us the history of
these aquatic phenomena. It would seem that
when the earth exploded, its entire crust,
throughout
the whole of this part of the world, was
started
upward in such a way as to give a very
uniform
depth to the sea, which in no place exceeds
four fathoms. It follows, as a consequence, that
no prevalence of northerly winds can force the
icebergs beyond 78 of south latitude, as they
invariably
ground on reaching the outer edge of
the polar bank. The floes, being thin, are
melted
of course; and thus, by this beneficent
prevention
,
the monikin world is kept entirely free from
the very danger to which a vulgar mind would be
the most apt to believe it is the most exposed.
A congress of nations had been held, about five
centuries since, which was called the
Holy-philo-marine-safety-and-find-the-way
Alliance. At this
Congress the high contracting parties agreed
to name a commission to make provision,
generally
,
for the secure navigation of the seas. One
of the expedients of this commission, which, by
the way, is said to have been composed of very
illustrious monikins, was to cause massive blocks
of stone to be laid down, at measured distances,
throughout the whole of the basin, and in which
other stone uprights were secured. The
necessary
inscriptions were graved on proper tablets, and
as we approached the one already named, I
observed
that it had the image of a monikin, carved
also in stone, with his tail extended in a right line,
pointing, as Mr. Poke assured me, S. and by W.
half W. I had made sufficient progress in the
monikin language, to read, as we glided past this
water-markTo Leaphigh, 15 miles. One
monikin mile, however, we were next told, was
equal to nine English statute miles; and,
consequently
,
we were not quite so near our port as
was at first supposed. I expressed great
satisfaction
at finding ourselves so fairly on the road,
however
,
and paid Dr. Reasono some well-merited
compliments on the high state of civilization to
which his species had evidently arrived. The day
was not distant, I added, when, it was reasonable
to suppose, our own seas would have floating
restaurants
and
cafs
, with suitable pot-houses for the
mariners; though I did not well see how we were
to provide a substitute for their own excellent
organization
of mile-stones. The Doctor received
my compliments with a proper modesty, saying
that he had no doubt mankind would do all that
lay in their power to have good eating and
drinking-houses
,
wherever they could be established;
but, as to the marine mile-stones, he agreed with
Vol. I. 20
me, that there was little hope of their being
planted
,
until the crust of the earth should be driven
upward, so as to rise within four fathoms of the
surface of the water. On the other hand, Captain
Poke held this latter improvement very cheap. He
affirmed it was no sign of civilization at all, for, as a
man became civilized, he had less need of primers
and finger-boards; and, as for Leaphigh, any
tolerable
navigator might see it bore S. by W. half W.
allowing for variation, distant 135 English miles.
To these objections I was silent, for I had had
frequent
occasions to observe that men very often
underrate any advantage of which they have
come into the enjoyment by a providential
interposition
.
Just as the sun was in the meridian, the cry of
`land ahead' was heard from aloft. The monikins
were all smiles and gratitude; the crew was
excited
by admiration and wonder; and, as for
myself
,
I was literally ready to jump out of my skin,
not only with delight, but, in some measure also,
from the exceeding warmth of the atmosphere. Our
cats and dogs began to uncase; Bob was obliged
to unmask his most exposed frontier, by removing
the union-jack; and Noah himself fairly appeared
on deck in his shirt and night-cap. The amiable
strangers were too much occupied to be
particular
,
and I slipped into my state-room to change my
toilet to a dress of thin silk, that was painted to
resemle the skin of a polar bear,a contradiction
between appearances and the substance of things,
that is much too common in our species ever to be
deemed out of fashion.
We neared the land with great rapidity,
impelled
by a steam-breeze, and just as the sun sunk
in the horizon our anchor was let go, in the outer
harbor of the city of Aggregation.
CHAPTER XV.
An arrival; forms of reception; several new christenings;
an official document, and terra firma.
It
is always agreeable to arrive safe, at the end
of a long, fatiguing and hazardous journey. But
the pleasure is considerably augmented when the
visit is paid to a novel region, with a
steam-climate
,
and which is peopled by a new species. My
own satisfaction, too, was coupled with the
reflection
that I had been of real service to four very
interesting and well-bred strangers, who had been
cast, by an adverse fortune, into the hands of
humanity
,
and who owed to me a boon far more
precious
than that of life itself,a restoration to their
natural and acquired rights, their proper stations
in society, and sacred liberty! The reader will
judge, therefore, with what inward
self-congratulation
I now received the acknowledgments of the
whole monikin party, and listened to their most
solemn protestations ever to consider, not only all
they might jointly and severally possess in the way
of estates and dignities, at my entire disposal, but
their persons as my slaves. Of course, I made as
light as possible of any little service I might have
done them, protesting, in my turn, that I looked
upon the whole affair more in the light of a party
of pleasure than a tax, reminding them that I had
not only obtained an insight into a new philosophy,
but that I was already, thanks to the decimal
system
,
a tolerable proficient in their ancient and
learned language. These civilities were scarcely
well over, before we were boarded by the boat of
the port-captain.
The arrival of a human ship was an event likely
to create excitement in a monikin country; and,
as our approach had been witnessed for several
hours, preparations had been made to give us a
proper reception. The section of the academy to
whom is committed the custody of the Science
of Indications, was hastily assembled, by order
of the King, who, by the way, never speaks
except
through the mouth of his oldest male first
cousin, who, by the fundamental laws of the realm,
is held responsible for all his official acts, (in
private
,
the King is allowed almost as many
privileges
as any other monikin,) and who, as is due
to him in simple justice, is permitted to exercise,
in a public point of view, the functions of the eyes,
ears, nose, conscience, and tail of the monarch.
The
savans
were active, and as they proceeded
with method, and on well-established principles,
their report was quickly made. It contained, as
we afterwards understood, seven sheets of
premises
,
eleven of argument, sixteen of conjecture,
and two lines of deduction. This heavy draft on
the monikin intellect, was duly achieved by
dividing
the work into as many parts as there were
members of the section present, viz. forty. The
substance of their labors was, to say that the vessel
in sight was a strange vessel; that it came to a
strange country, on a strange errand, being
manned
by strangers; and that its objects were more
likely to be peaceful than warlike, since the glasses
of the academy did not enable them to discover
any means of annoyance, with the exception of
certain wild beasts, who appeared, however, to be
peaceably occupied in working the ship. All this
was sententiously expressed in the purest monikin
language. The effect of the report was to cause
all hostile preparations to be abandoned.
No sooner did the boat of the port-captain return
to the shore, with the news that the strange ship
had arrived with my Lord Chatterino, my Lady
Chatterissa and Dr. Reasono, than there was a
general burst of joy along the strand. In a very
short time, the Kingalias his eldest first cousin
of the male genderordered the usual
compliments
to be paid to his distinguished subjects. A
deputation of young Lords, the hopes of Leaphigh,
came off to receive their colleague; whilst a bevy
of beautiful maidens, of noble birth, crowded
around the smiling and graceful Chatterissa,
gladdening
her heart with their caressing manners and
felicitations. The noble pair left us in separate
boats, each attended by an appropriate escort.
We overlooked the little neglect of forgetting to
take leave of us, for joy had quite set them both
beside themselves. Next came a long procession
composed of high numbers, all of the
brown-study-color
.
These learned and dignified persons were
a deputation from the academy, which had sent
forth no less than forty of its number to receive
Dr. Reasono. The meeting between these loving
friends of monikinity and of knowledge, was
conducted
on the most approved principles of reason.
Each section (there are forty in the academy of
Leaphigh) made an address, to all of which the
Doctor returned suitable replies, always using
exactly the same sentiments, but varying the subject
by transpositions, as dictionaries are known to be
composed by the ingenious combinations of the
twenty-six letters of the alphabet. Dr. Reasono
withdrew with his coadjutors, to my surprise,
paying
not a whit more attention to Captain Poke and
myself, than would be paid, in any highly civilized
country of Christendom, on a similar occasion, by
a collection of the learned, to the accidental
presence
20*
of two monkeys. I thought this augured
badly, and began to feel as became Sir John
Goldencalf, Bart., of Householder Hall, in the
Kingdom of Great Britain, when my sensations
were nipped in the bud by the arrival of the
Officers
of Registration and Circulation. It was the
duty of the latter to give us the proper passports
to enter into and to circulate within the country,
after the former had properly enregistered our
numbers and colors, in such a way as to bring us
within the reach of taxation. The officer of
Registration
was very expeditious from long
practice
.
He decided, at once, that I formed a new
class by myself; of which, of course, I was No. 1.
The Captain and his two mates formed another,
Nos. 1, 2 and 3. Bob had a class also to himself,
and the honors of No. 1; and the crew formed a
fresh class, being numbered according to height,
as the register deemed their merits to be altogether
physical. Next came the important point of color,
on which depended the quality of the class or
caste
,
the numbers merely indicating our respective
stations
in the particular divisions. After a good deal
of deliberation, and many interrogatories, I was
enregistered as No. 1, flesh-color, Noah as No. 1,
sea-water-color, and his mates 2 and 3,
accordingly
.
Bob as No. 1, smut-colour; and the crew
as Nos. 1, 2, 3, &c. tar-color. The officer now
called upon an assistant to come forth with a sort
of knitting-needle heated red-hot, in order to affix
the official stamp to each in succession. Luckily
for us all, Noah happened to be the first to whom
the agent of the stamp-office applied, to uncase
and to prepare for the operation. The result
was one of those bursts of eloquent and logical
vituperation, and of remonstrating outcries, to
which any new personal exaction never failed
to give birth in the sealer. His discourse on this
occasion might be divided into the several
following
heads, all of which were very ingeniously
embellished by the usual expletives and imagery
He was not a beast to be branded like a horse,
nor a slave to be treated like a Congo nigger; he
saw no use in applying the marks to men, who
were sufficiently distinguished from monkeys
already
;
Sir John had a handle before his name, and
if he liked it, he might carry his name behind his
body, by way of counterpoise, but, for his part,
he wanted no outriggers of the sort, being
satisfied
with plain Noah Poke; he was a republican,
and it was anti-republican for a man to carry
about with him graven images; he thought it
might be even flying in the face of the Scriptures,
or, what was worse, turning his back on them;
he said that the Walrus had her name, in good
legible characters, on her starn, and that might
answer for both of them; he protested, dn his
eyes, that he wouldn't be branded like a thief; he
incontinently wished the keeper of the privy-seal
to the dl; he insisted there was no use in the
practice, unless one threw all aback and went starn
foremost into society, a rudeness at which human
natur' revolted; he knew a man at Stunin'tun who
had five names, and he should like to know what
they would do with him, if this practice should
come into fashion there; he had no objection to a
little paint, but no red-hot knitting-needle should
make acquaintance with his flesh, so long as he
walked his quarter-deck.
The keeper of the seals listened to this
remonstrance
with singular patience and decorum; a
forbearance that was probably owing to his not
understanding a word that had been said. But
there is a language that is universal, and it is not
less easy to comprehend when a man is in a
passion
,
than it is to comprehend any other irritated
animal. The officer of the Registration
Department
,
on this hint, politely inquired of me, if some
part of his official duties were not particularly
disagreeable to No. 1, sea-water-color. On my
admitting that the captain was reluctant to be
branded, he merely shrugged his shoulders, and
observed, that the exactions of the public were
seldom
agreeable, but that duty was duty, that the
stamp-act was peremptory, and not a foot of ours
could touch Leaphigh, until we were all checked
off in this manner, in exact conformity with the
registration. I was much puzzled what to do, by
this indomitable purpose to perform his duty in the
officer; for, to own the truth, my own cuticle had
quite as much aversion to the operation, as that of
Captain Poke himself. It was not the principle,
so much as the novelty of its application, which
distressed me; for I had travelled too much not to
know that a stranger rarely enters a
civilized
country without being more or less skinned, the
merest savages only permitting him to pass
unscathed
.
It suddenly came to my recollection
that the monikins had left all the remains of their
particular stores on board, consisting of an ample
supply of delicious nuts. Sending for a bag of the
best of them, I ordered it to be put into the
register's
boat, informing him, at the same time, that I
was conscious they were quite unworthy of him,
but that I hoped, such as they were, he would
allow me to make an offering of them to his wife.
This attention was properly felt and received; and
a few minutes afterwards, a certificate in the
following
words was put into my hands, viz.
Leaphigh, season of promise, day of
performance
:
Whereas
, certain persons of the human
species have lately presented themselves to be
enregistered, according to the statute `For the
promotion of order and classification, and for the
collection of contributions;' and
whereas
, these
persons are yet in the second class of the animal
probation, and are more subject to bodily
impressions
than the higher, or monikin species; Now,
know all monikins, &c., that they are
stamped
in
paint, and that only by their numbers; each class
among them being easily to be distinguished from
the others, by outward and indelible proofs.
Signed,
No. 8,020 office-color.
I was told that all we had to do now, was to
mark ourselves with paint or tar, as we might
choose, the latter being recommended for the
crew; taking no farther trouble than to number
ourselves; and, when we went ashore, if any of
the gens-d'armes inquired why we had not the
legal impression on our persons, which quite
possibly
would be the case, as the law was absolute
in its requisitions, all we had to do was to show
the certificate; but, if the certificate was not
sufficient, we were men of the world, and
understood
the nature of things so well, that we did not
require to be taught so simple a proposition in
philosophy
,
as that which says, like causes produce
like effects; and he presumed I could not have so
far overrated his merits, as to have sent the whole
of my nuts into his boat. I avow that I was not
very sorry to hear the officer throw out these
hints, for they convinced me that my journey
through Leaphigh would be accompanied with
less embarrassment than I had anticipated, since
I now plainly perceived that monikins act on
principles
that are not very essentially different from
those of the human race in general.
The complaisant register and the keeper of the
privy-seal took their departure together, when we
forthwith proceeded to number ourselves in
compliance
with his advice. As the principle was
already settled, we had no difficulty with its
application
,
Noah, Bob, myself, and the largest of the
seamen being all No's. 1, and the rest ranking in
order. By this time it was night. The guard-boats
began to appear on the water, and we deferred
disembarking until morning.
All hands were early afoot. It had been arranged
that Captain Poke and myself, attended by Bob, as a
domestic, were to land, in order to make a journey
through the island, while the Walrus was to be left in
charge of the mates and the crew; the latter having
permission to go ashore, from time to time, as is
the practice with all seamen in port. There was
a great deal of preliminary scrubbing and shaving,
before the whole party could appear on deck,
properly
attired for the occasion. Mr. Poke wore a
thin dress of linen, admirably designed to make him
look like a sea-lion; a conceit that he said was not
only agreeable to his feelings and habits, but which
had a cool and pleasant character, that was
altother
suited to a steam-climate. For my own part,
I agreed with the worthy sealer, seeing but little
difference between his going in this garb, and his
going quite naked. My dress was made, on a design
of my own, after the social-stake system; or, in
other words, it was so arranged as to take an
interest
in half of the animals of Exeter 'Change, to
which
menagerie
the artist, by whom it had been
painted, was sent expressly, in order to consult
nature. Bob wore the effigy, as his master called
it, of a turnspit.
The monikins were by far too polished to crowd
about us when we landed, with an impertinent and
troublesome curiosity. So far from this, we were
permitted to approach the capital itself without let
or hindrance. As it is less my intention to describe
physical things than to dwell upon the philosophy
and the other moral aspects of the Leaphigh world,
little more will be said of their houses, domestic
economy, and other improvements in the arts, than
may be gathered incidentally, as the narrative shall
proceed. Let it suffice to say, on these heads, that
the Leaphigh monikins, like men, consult, or think
they consultwhich, so long as they know no
better
,
amounts to pretty much the same thingtheir
own convenience in all things, the pocket alone
excepted; and that they continue very laudably to
do as their fathers did before them, seldom making
changes, unless they may happen to possess the
recommendation of being exotics; when, indeed,
they are sometimes adopted, probably on account
of their possessing the merit of having been proved
suitable to another state of things.
Among the first persons we met, on entering the
great square of Aggregation, as the capital of
Leaphigh
is called when rendered into English, was
my Lord Chatterino. He was gaily promenading
with a company of young nobles, who all seemed
to be enjoying their youth, health, rank and
privileges
,
with infinite gusto. We met this party in a
way to render an escape from mutual recognition
impossible. At first I thought, from his averted
eye, that it was the intention of our late shipmate
to consider our knowledge of each other as one of
those accidental acquaintances which, it is known,
we all form at watering-places, on journeys, or in
the country, and which it is ill-mannered to press
upon others in town; or, as Captain Poke afterwards
expressed it, like the intimacy between an
Englishman
and a Yankee, that has been formed in the
house of the latter, on better wine than is met with
anywhere else, and which was never yet known to
withstand the influence of a British fog. Why, Sir
John, the sealer added, I once tuck (he meant to
say
took
, not
tucked
) a countryman of yours under
my wing, at Stunin'tun, during the last war. He
was a prisoner, as we make prisoners; that is, he
went and did pretty much as he pleased; and the
fellow had the best of every thingmolasses that a
spoon would stand up in, pork that would do to
slush down a top-mast, and New-England rum,
that a king might sit down to, but could not get up
fromwell, what was the end on't? why, as sure
as we are among these monkeys, the fellow
booked
me. Had I
booked
but the half of what he guzzled,
the amount, I do believe, would have taken the
transaction out of any justice's court in the state.
He said my molasses was meagre, the pork lean,
and the liquor infernal. There were truth and
gratitude
for you! He gave the whul account, too, as a
specimen of what he called American living!
Hereupon I reminded my companion, that an
Englishman did not like to receive even favors, on
compulsion; that when he meets a stranger in his
own country, and is master of his own actions, no
man understands better what true hospitality is, as
I hoped one day to show him, at Householder Hall:
as to his first remark, he ought to remember that
an Englishman considered America as no more
than the country, and that it would be ill-mannered
to press an acquaintance made there.
Noah, like most other men, was very reasonable
on all subjects that did not interfere with his
prejudices
or his opinions; and he very readily admitted
the general justice of my reply.
It's pretty much as you say, Sir John, he
continued
.
In England you may press men, but it
wun't do to press hospitality. Get a volunteer in this
way, and he is as good a fellow as heart can wish.
I shouldn't have cared so much about the chap's
book, if he had said nothin' ag'in the rum. Why,
Sir John, when the English bombarded Stunin'tun
with eighteen-pounders, I proposed to load our old
twelve with a gallon out of the very same cask,
for I do think it would have huv' the shot the best
part of a mile!
But this digression is leading me from
the narrative. My Lord Chatterino turned his head
a little on one side, as we were passing; and I was
deliberating whether, under the circumstances, it
would be well-bred to remind him of our old
acquaintance
,
when the question was settled by the
decision of Captain Poke, who placed himself in
such a position that it was no easy matter to get
round him, through him, or over him; or who laid
himself what he called athwart hawse.
Good morning, my Lord, said the
straight-forward
seaman, who generally went at a subject,
as he went at a seal. A fine warm day; and the
smell of the land, after so long a passage, is quite
agreeable to the nose, whatever its ups and downs
may be to the legs.
The companions of the young peer looked
amazed
;
and some of them, I thought, notwithstanding
gravity and earnestness are rather characteristic
of the monikin physiognomy, betrayed a slight
disposition
to laugh. Not so with my Lord
Chatterino
himself.
He examined us a moment through a glass, and
then seemed suddenly and, on the whole, agreeably
struck at seeing us.
How, Goldencalf! he cried, in surprise, you
Vol. I. 21
in Leaphigh! This is, indeed, an unexpected
satisfaction
;
for it will now be in my power to prove
some of the facts that I am telling my friends, by
actual observation. Here are two of the humans,
gents, of whom I was but this moment giving you
some account
Observing a disposition to merriment in his
associates
,
he continued, looking exceedingly grave:
Restrain yourselves, gentlemen, I pray you.
These are very worthy people, I do assure you, in
their own way, and are not at all to be ridiculed.
I scarcely know, even in our own marine, a better
or a bolder navigator than this honest seaman; and,
as for the one in the parti-colored skin, I will take
upon myself to say, that he is really a person of
some consideration in his own little circle. He is,
I believe, a member of parparparam I right,
Sir John?a member of
Parliament, my Lordan M. P.
AyI thought I had itan M. P. or a member
of parliament in his own country, which, I dare
say, now, is some such thing among his people, as
a public proclaimer of those laws which come from
His Majesty's eldest first-cousin of the masculine
gender, may be among us. Some such thingeh
nowehis it not, Sir John?
I dare say it is, my Lord.
All very true, Chatterino, put in one of the
young monikins, with a very long, elaborated tail,
which he carried nearly perpendicularbut what
would be even a law-
maker
to say nothing of law-
breakers
like ourselvesamong men! You should
remember, my dear fellow, that a mere title, or a
profession, is not the criterion of true greatness; but
that the prodigy of a village may be a very
common
monikin in town.
Pohpohinterrupted Lord Chatterino, thou
art ever for refining, HightailSir John
Goldencalf
is a very respectable person in the island of
aaawhat do you call that said island of
yours, Goldencalf?aa
Great Britain, my Lord.
Ay, Great Breeches, sure enough: yes, he is
a respectable personI can take it upon myself
to say, with confidence, a very respectable person,
in Great Breeches. I dare say he owns no small
portion of the island himself. How much, now,
Sir John, if the truth were told?
Only the estate and village of Householder,
my Lord, with a few scattered manors, here and
there.
Well, that is a very pretty thing, there can be
no doubt,then you have money at use?
And who is the debtor? sneeringly inquired
the jack-a-napes Hightail.
No other, my Lord Hightail, than the realm
of Great Britain.
Exquisite, that, egad! A noble's fortune in the
custody of the realm of aGreeka
Great Breeches, interrupted my Lord
Chatterino
;
who, notwithstanding he swore he was
excessively angry with his friend for his obstinate
incredulity, very evidently had to exercise some
forbearance to keep from joining in the general
laugh. It is a very respectable country, I do
protest; and I scarcely remember to have tasted
better gooseberries than they grow in that very
island.
What! have they really gardens, Chatterino?
Certainlyafter a fashionand houses, and
public conveyancesand even universities.
You do not mean to say, certainly, that they
have a system!
Why, as to system, I believe they are a little
at sixes and sevens. I really can't take it upon
myself to say that they have a system.
Oh, yes, my Lord,of a certainty we have
onethe Social-stake System.
Ask the creature, whispered audibly the filthy
coxcomb Hightail, if he himself, now, has any
income.
How is it, Sir John,have you an income?
Yes, my Lord, of one hundred and twelve
thousand sovereigns a year.
Of what?of what? demanded two or three
voices, with well-bred, subdued eagerness.
Of sovereignswhy that means kings!
It would appear that the Leaphighers, while
they obey only the King's eldest first-cousin of the
masculine gender, perform all their official acts in
the name of the sovereign himself, for whose person
and character they pretty uniformly express the
profoundest veneration; just as we men express
admiration for a virtue that we never practise.
My declaration, therefore, produced a strong
sensation
,
and I was soon required to explain myself.
This I did, by simply stating the truth.
Oh, gold, y'clept sovereigns! exclaimed three
or four, laughing heartily. Why then, your
famous Great Breeches people, after all,
Chatterino
,
are so little advanced in civilization, as to use
gold! Harkee, SignioraaBoldercraft, have
you no currency in `promises'?
I do not know, sir, that I rightly comprehend
the question.
Why, we poor barbarians, sir, who live as
you see us, only in a state of simplicity and
nature
,there
was irony in every syllable the
impudent
scoundrel uttered,we poor wretches,
or rather our ancestors, made the discovery, that,
for the purposes of convenience, having, as you
perceive, no pockets, it might be well to convert
all our currency into `promises.' Now, I would
ask if you have any of that coin?
Not as coin, sir, but as collateral to coin, we
have plenty.
He speaks of collaterals in currency, as if he
were discussing a pedigree! Are you really,
Mynherr Shouldercalf, so little advanced in your
country, as not to know the immense advantages
of a currency of `promises'?
As I do not understand exactly what the
nature
of this currency is, sir, I cannot answer as
readily as I could wish.
Let us explain it to him; for, I vow, I am
really curious to hear his answer. Chatterino, do
you, who have some knowledge of the thing's
habits, be our interpreter.
The matter is thus, Sir John. About five
hundred
years ago, our ancestors having reached that
pass in civilization when they came to dispense
with the use of pockets, began to find it necessary
to substitute a new currency for that of the metals,
which it was inconvenient to carry, of which they
might be robbed, and which also were liable to be
counterfeited. The first expedient was to try a
lighter substitute. Laws were passed giving value
to linen and cotton, in the raw material; then,
compounded and manufactured; next, written on,
and reduced in bulk, until, having passed through
the several gradations of wrapping-paper,
brown-paper
,
foolscap and blotting-paper, and having set
the plan fairly at work, and got confidence
thoroughly
established, the system was perfected by
a
coup de main;
`promises' in words, were
substituted
for all other coin. You see the advantage
at a glance.A monikin can travel, without
pockets
or baggage, and still carry a million; the
money
21 *
cannot be counterfeited, nor can it be stolen
or burned.
But, my Lord, does it not depreciate the value
of property?
Just the contrary:an acre that formerly
could be bought for one promise, would now bring
a thousand.
This certainly is a great improvement, unless
frequent failures
Not at all; there has not been a bankruptcy
in Leaphigh since the law was passed making
promises a legal tender.
I wonder no Chancellor of the Exchequer
ever thought of this, at home!
So much for your Great Breeches,
Chatterino
!
And then there was another and a very
general
laugh. I never before felt so deep a sense of
national humility.
As they have universities, cried another
coxcomb
,
perhaps this person has attended one of
them.
Indeed, sir, I answered, I am regularly
graduated.
It is not easy to see what he has done with
his knowledge,for, though my sight is none of
the worst, I can not trace the smallest sign of a
cauda
about him.
Ah! Lord Chatterino good-naturedly
explained
,
the inhabitants of Great Breeches carry their
brains in their heads.
Their heads!
Heads!
That's excellent, by His Majesty's
prerogative
!
Here's civilization, with a vengeance!
I now thought that the general ridicule would
overwhelm me. Two or three came closer, as if
in pity or curiosity; and, at last, one cried out
that I actually wore clothes.
Clothesthe wretch! Chatterino, do all your
human friends wear clothes?
The young peer was obliged to confess the truth:
and then there arose such a clamor as may be
fancied took place among the peacocks, when they
discovered the daw among them in masquerade.
Human nature could endure no more; and,
bowing
to the company, I wished Lord Chatterino,
very hurriedly good morning, and proceeded
towards the tavern.
Don't forget to step into Chatterino-house,
Goldencalf, before you sail, cried my late fellow
traveller, looking over his shoulder, and nodding
in quite a friendly way towards me.
King! exclaimed Captain Poke. That
blackguard
ate a whole bread-locker-full of nuts, on our
outward passage, and, now, he tells us to step into
his Chatterino-house, before we sail!
I endeavoured to pacify the sealer, by an appeal
to his philosophy. It was true that men never
forgot
obligations, and were always excessively
anxious
to reapy them; but the monikins were an
exceedingly
instructed species; they thought more
of their minds than of their bodies, as was plain
by comparing the smallness of the latter with the
length and development of the seat of reason;
and one of his experience should know that
good-breeding
is decidedly an arbitrary quality, and that
we ought to respect its laws, however opposed to
our own previous practices.
I dare say, friend Noah, you may have
observed
some material difference in the usages of
Paris, for instance, and those of Stunin'tum.
That I have, Sir John, that I have; and
altogether
to the advantage of Stunin'tun be they.
We are all addicted to the weakness of
believing
our own customs best; and it requires that
we should travel much, before we are able to
decide
on points so nice.
And do you not call me a traveller! Haven't I
been sixteen times a sealing, twice a whaling,
without
counting my cruise over-land, and this last run
to Leaphigh!
Ay, you have gone over much land and much
water, Mr. Poke; but your stay in any given place
has been just long enough to find fault. Usages
must be worn, like a shoe, before one can judge of
the fit.
It is possible Noah would have retorted, had not
Mrs. Vigilance Lynx, at that moment, come
wriggling
by, in a way to show she was much satisfied
with her safe return home. To own the truth,
while striving to find apologies for it, I had been a
little
contrari
, as the French term it, by the
indifference
of my Lord Chatterino, which, in my secret
heart, I was not slow in attributing to the manner
in which a peer of the realm of Leaphigh regarded,
de haut en bas
, a mere Baronet of Great Britain
or Great Breeches, as the young noble so
pertinaciously
insisted on terming our illustrious island.
Now, as Mrs. Vigilance was of russet-color, a
caste of an inferior standing, I had little doubt that
she would be as glad to own an intimacy with Sir
John Goldencalf of Householder Hall, as the other
might be willing to shuffle it off.
Good morrow, good Mrs. Vigilance, I said
familiarly, endeavoring to wriggle in a way that
would
have shaken a tail, had it been my good
fortune
to be the owner of oneGood morrow,
good Mrs. VigilanceI'm glad to meet you again
on shore.
I do not remember that Mrs. Vigilance, during
the whole period of our acquaintance, was
particularly
squeamish, or topping in her deportment.
On the contrary, she had rather made herself
remarkable
for a modest and commendable reserve.
But, on the present occasion, she disappointed all
reasonable expectation, by shrinking on one side,
uttering a slight scream, and hurrying past as if
she thought we might bite her. Indeed, I can only
compare her deportment to that of a female of our
own, who is so full of vanity as to fancy all eyes
on her, and who gives herself airs about a dog or
a spider, because she thinks they make her look so
much the more interesting. Conversation was quite
out of the question; for the duenna hurried on,
bending her head downward, as if heartily ashamed
of an involuntary weakness.
Well, good madam, said Noah, whose stern
eye followed her movements until she was quite lost
in the crowd, you would have had a sleepless
v'yage, if I had fore-imagined this! Sir John,
these people stare at us as if we were wild beasts!
I cannot say I am of your way of thinking,
Captain Poke. To me they seem to take no more
notice of us, than we should take of two curs in the
streets of London.
I begin, now, to understand what the parsons
mean when they talk of the lost condition of man.
It's ra'ally awful to witness to what a state of
unfeelingness
a people can be abandoned! Bob, get
out of the way, you grinning blackguard.
Hereupon Bob received a salutation which would
have demolished his stern-frame, had it not been
for the union-jack. Just then I was glad to see
Dr. Reasono advancing towards us, surrounded by
a group of attentive listeners, all of whom, by their
years, gravity and deportment, I made no question
were
savans
. As he drew near, I found he was
discoursing of the marvels of his late voyage.
When within six feet of us the whole party stopped,
the Doctor continuing to descant, with a very
proper gesticulation, and in a way to show that his
subject was of infinite interest to his listeners.
Accidentally turning his eye in our direction, he
caught a glimpse of our figures, and making a few
hurried apologies to those around him, the
excellent
philosopher came eagerly forward, with both
hands extended. Here was a difference, indeed,
between his treatment and that of Lord Chatterino
and the duenna! The salutation was warmly
returned; and the Doctor and myself stepped a
little apart, as he lost no time in informing me he
wished to say a word in private.
My dear Sir John, the philosopher began,
our arrival has been the most happily-timed thing
imaginable! All Leaphigh, by this time, is filled
with the subject; and you can scarcely conceive
the importance that is attached to the event. New
sources of trade, scientific discoveries, phenomena
both moral and physical, and results that it is
thought may serve to raise the monikin
civilization
still higher than ever. Fortunately, the
academy
holds its most solemn meeting of the year this
very day, and I have been formally requested to
give the assembly an outline of those events which
have lately passed before my eyes. The King's
eldest first-cousin of the masculine gender is to
attend openly; and it is even conjectured, in a way
to be quite authentic, that the King himself will be
present in his own royal person.
How! I exclaimed; have you a mode, in
Leaphigh, of rendering conjectures certain?
Beyond a doubt, sir, or what would our
civilization
be worth? As to the King's Majesty, we
always deal in the most direct ambiguities. Now,
as respects many of our ceremonies, the sovereign
is known morally to be present, when he may be
actually and physically eating his dinner at the
other extremity of the island; this important
illustration
of the royal ubiquity is effected by means of
a legal fiction. On the other hand, the King often
indulges his natural propensities, such as curiosity,
love of fun, or detestation of ennui, by coming
in person, when, by the court-fiction, he is thought
to be seated on his throne, in his own royal palace.
Oh! as to all these little accomplishments and graces
in the art of Truths, we are behind no people in the
universe!
I beg pardon, Doctorso his Majesty is
expected
to be at the academy, this morning?
In a private box. Now this affair is of the last
importance to me as a
savant
, to you as a human
beingfor it will have a direct tendency to raise
your whole species in the monikin estimationand,
lastly, to learning. It will be indispensably
necessary
that you should attend, with as many of your
companions as possiblemore especially the better
specimens. I was coming down to the landing, in
the hope of meeting you; and a messenger has
gone off to the ship to require that the people be
sent ashore forthwith. You will have a tribune to
yourselves; and, really, I do not like to express
beforehand what I think concerning the degree of
attention you will all receive; but this much I think
I can sayyou will see.
This proposition, Doctor, has taken me a little
by surprise, and I hardly know what answer to
give.
You cannot say no, Sir John; for, should his
Majesty hear that you have refused to come to a
meeting at which he is to be present, it would
seriously, and, I might add, justly offend him:
nor could I answer for the consequences.
Why, I was told that all the power was in the
hands of his Majesty's eldest first-cousin of the
masculine
gender; in which case I thought I might
snap my fingers at his Majesty himself.
Not in opinion, Sir John, which is one of the
three estates of the government. Ours is a
government
of three estatesviz. the Law, Opinion, and
Practice. By law the king rules, by practice his
cousin rules, and by opinion the king again rules.
Thus is the strong point of practice balanced by
law and opinion. This it is that constitutes the
harmony and perfection of the system. No, it
would never do to offend his Majesty.
Although I did not very well comprehend the
Doctor's argument, yet, as I had often found in
human society, theories political, moral, theological,
and philosophical, that everybody had faith in, and
which nobody understood, I thought discussion
useless, and gave up the point by promising the
Doctor to be at the academy in half an hour, which
was the time named for our appearance. Taking
the necessary directions to find the place, we
separated
;
he to hasten to make his preparations, and I
to reach the tavern, in order to deposit our baggage,
that no decency might be overlooked on an
occasion
so solemn.
END OF VOL. I.Dear Mr.
Goldencalf
,
I have this moment heard of your being in town, and
am exceedingly rejoiced to learn it. A long intimacy with
your late excellent and most loyal father, justifies my
claiming
you for a friend, and I waive all ceremony, (official, of
course, is meant, there being no reason for any other
between
us,) and beg to be admitted for half an hour.
Dear Mr. Goldencalf,
Your's, very faithfully and sincerely,
Pledge
.
Goldencalf
, Esquire.
Monday evening.Dearvery dear, naydearest
Anna
:
I met your old neighbor , this morning, on the
boulevards, and during an interview of an hour we did little
else but talk of thee. Although it has been my most ardent
and most predominant wish to open my heart to the whole
species, yet, Anna, I fear I have loved thee alone! Absence,
so far from expanding, appears to contract my affections, too
many of which centre in thy sweet form and excellent
virtues
.
The remedy I proposed is insufficient, and I begin to
think that matrimony alone can leave me master of sufficient
freedom of thought and action, to turn the attention I ought
to the rest of the human race. Thou hast been with me in
idea, in the four corners of the earth, by sea and by land,
in dangers and in safety, in all seasons, regions and
situations
,
and there is no sufficient reason why those who are
ever present in the spirit, should be materially separated.
Thou hast only to say a word, to whisper a hope, to breathe
a wish, and I will throw myself, a repentant truant, at thy
feet, and implore thy pity. When united, however, we will
not lose ourselves in the sordid and narrow paths of
selfishness
,
but come forth again, in company, to acquire a new
and still more powerful hold on this beautiful creation, of
which, by this act, I acknowledge thee to be the most divine
portion.
Dearest, dearest Anna, thine and the species',
For ever,
John Goldencalf
.
To Miss
Etherington
.Goodnay, Dear
John
,
Thy letter was put into my hands yesterday. This is
the fifth answer I have commenced, and you will therefore
see that I do not write without reflection. I know thy
excellent
heart, John, better than it is known to thyself. It has
either led thee to the discovery of a secret of the last
importance
to thy fellow-creatures, or it has led thee cruelly
astray. An experiment so noble and so praiseworthy, ought
not to be abandoned, on account of a few momentary
misgivings
concerning the result. Do not stay thy eagle flight,
at the instant thou art soaring so near the sun! Should
we both judge it for our mutual happiness, I can become thy
wife at a future day. We are still young, and there is no
urgency for an immediate union. In the mean time, I will
endeavor to prepare myself to be the companion of a
philanthropist
,
by practising on thy theory, and, by expanding my
own affections, render myself worthy to be the wife of one
who has so large a stake in society, and who loves so many
and so truly.
Thine imitator and friend,
Without change,
Anna Etherington
.
To Sir
John Goldencalf
, Bart.
P. S. You may perceive that I am in a state of
improvement
,
for I have just refused the hand of Lord M'Dee, because
I found I loved all his neighbors, quite as well as I loved the
young peer himself.At
a full and overflowing meeting of the most
monikinized of the monikin race, holden at the house
of Peleg Pat, (we still used the human appellations,
at that epoeh,) in the year of the world 3,007, and
of the monikin era 317, Plausible Shout was called
to the chair, and Ready Quill was named secretary.
After several excellent and eloquent addresses
from all present, it was unanimously resolved as
follows, viz.
That steam is a curse, and not a blessing; and
that it deserves to be denounced by all patriotic
and true monikins.
That we deem it the height of oppression and
injustice in Nature, that she has placed the great
safety-valve of the world, within the lawful limits
of the monikin territories.
That the said safety-valve ought to be removed
forthwith; and that it shall be so removed,
peaceably
if it can, forcibly if it must.
That we cordially approve of the sentiments of
John Jaw, our present estimable chief magistrate,
the incorruptible partisan, the undaunted friend of
his friends, the uncompromising enemy of steam,
and the sound, pure, orthodox, and true monikin.
That we recommend the said Jaw to the
confidence
of all monikins.
That we call upon the country to sustain us in
our great, holy, and glorious design, pledging
ourselves
,
posterity, the bones of our ancestors, and all
who have gone before or who may come after
us, to the faithful execution of our intentions.
Signed,
Plausible Shout
, Chairman.
Ready Quill
, Secretary.